      "identifier" : [
         "65347"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "Technical and Bibliographic Notes / Notes techniques et bibliographiques The Institute has attempted to obtain the best original copy available for filming. Features of this copy which may be bibliographically unique, which may alter any of the images in the reproduction, or which may significantly change the usual method of filming are checked below. Coloured covers / Couverture de couleur D Covers damaged I Couverture endommagée Coversrestored and/or larninated I Couverture restaurée et/ou pelliculée Cover title rnissing / Le titre de couverture manque Coloured maps / Cartes géographiques en couleur Coloured ink (i.e. other than blue or black) I Encre de couleur (i.e. autre que bleue ou noire) Coloured plates and/or illustrations / Planches et/ou illustrations en couleur D Bound with other material / Relié avec d'autres documents D Only edition available / Seule édition disponible D Tight binding may cause shadows or distortion along interior margin / La reliure serrée peut causer de l'ombre ou de la distorsion le long de la marge intérieure. Blank leaves added during restorations may appear within the text. Whenever possible, these have been omitted from filming / Il se peut que certaines pages blanches ajoutées lors d'une restauration apparaissent dans le texte, mais, lorsque cela était possible, ces pages n'ont pas été filmées. F Additional comments I Commentaires supplémentaires: This item is filmed at the reduction ratio checked below / Ce document est filmé au taux de réduction indiqué ci-dessous. L'institut a microfilmé le meilleur exemplaire qu'il lui a été possible de se procurer. Les détails de cet exem- plaire qui sont peut-être uniques du point de vue bibli- ographique, qui peuvent modifier une image reproduite, ou qui peuvent exiger une modification dans la métho- de normale de filmage sont indiqués ci-dessous. El El Coloured pages I Pages de couleur Pages damaged i Pages endommagées Pages restored and/or laminated / Pages restaurées et/ou pelliculées Pages discoloured, stained or foxed I Pages décolorées, tachetées ou piquées El Pages detached / Pages détachées Showthrough / Transparence SQuality of print varies / Qualité inégale de l'impression l Includes supplementary material I Comprend du matériel supplémentaire E Pages wholly or partially obscured by errata slips, tissues, etc., have been refilmed to ensure the best possible image / Les pages totalement ou partiellement obscurcies par un feuillet d'errata, une pelure, etc., ont été filmées à nouveau de façon à obtenir la meilleure image possible. E Opposing pages with varying colouration or discolourations are filmed twice to ensure the best possible image / Les pages s'opposant ayant des colorations variables ou des décolorations sont filmées deux fois afin d'obtenir la meilleure image. possible. lOx 14x 18x 22x 26x 30x 12x 16x 20x 24x 28x 32x",
         "riz~",
         "CHRONICLES OF CANADA Edited by George M.Wrong and H. H. Langton In thirty-two volumes 12 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA BY WILLIAM WOOD Part IV The Beginnings of British Canada",
         "\"\"\"01 O- r-",
         "THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA A Chronicle of Carleton BY WILLIAM WOOD TORONTO GLASGOW, BROOK \u0026 COMPANY 1916",
         "161153 Copyright In al Cotintries subscribing to the Berne Convention L /",
         "TO WILLIAM DOUW LIGHTHALL AUTHOR, PATRIOT, FRIEND",
         "CONTENTS Page I. GUY CARLETON, 1724-1759 . i II. GENERAL MURRAY, 1759-1766 . . 4 III. GOVERNOR CARLETON, 1766-1774 . . . 40 IV. INVASION, 1775 . . . 60 V. BELEAGUERMENT, 1775-1776. . . 93 VI. DELIVERANCE, 1776 . . . 130 VII. THE COUNTERSTROKE, 1776-1778 . . 143 VIII. GUARDING THE LOYALISTS, 1782-1783 162 IX. FOUNDING MODERN CANADA, 1786-1796 181 X. 'NUNC DIMITTIS,' 1796-1808 . . . 225 BIBLIOGRAPHICAL NOTE . . . 229 INDEX , . . . . 232 ix",
         "ILLUSTRATIONS THE FIGHT AT THE SAULT-AU-MATELOT From a colour drawing by C. W. Jefferys. SIR GUY CARLETON, LORD DORCHESTER From an engraving by A. H. Ritchie. JAMES MURRAY . . . . . From an engraving in the Dominion Archives. BRITISH POSSESSIONS IN NORTH AMERICA, 1763-1775 . Map by Bartholomew. THE ISLAND OF MONTREAL AND QUEBEC CITY . . . . . . From a map by Captain Carver and other officers, published in London in r776. RICHARD MONTGOMERY From an engraving in the John Ross Robertson Collection, Toronto Public Library. BENEDICT ARNOLD . . . . From an engraving in the John Ross Robertson Collection, Toronto Public Library. Frontispiece Facing page 6 32 64 96 ,,128 xi",
         "CHAPTER I GUY CARLETON 1724-1759 GUY CARLETON, first Baron Dorchester, was born at Strabane, County Tyrone, on the 3rd of September 1724, the anniversary of Cromwell's two great victories and death. He came of a very old family of English country gentlemen which had migrated to Ireland in the seventeenth century and intermarried with other Anglo-Irish families equally devoted to the service of the British Crown. Guy's father was Christopher Carle- ton of Newry in County Down. His mother was Catherine Ball of County Donegal. His father died comparatively young; and, when he was himself fifteen, his mother married the rector of Newry, the Reverend Thomas Skelton, whose influence over the six step- children of the household worked wholly for their good. At eighteen Guy received his first com- F.B.C.",
         "2 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA mission as ensign in the 25th Foot, then known as Lord Rothes' regiment and now as the King's Own Scottish Borderers. At twenty- three he fought gallantly at the siege of Bergen-op-Zoom. Four years later (1751) he was a lieutenant in the Grenadier Guards. He was one of those quiet men whose sterling value is appreciated only by the few till some crisis makes it stand forth before the world at large. Pitt, Wolfe, and George II all re- cognized his solid virtues. At thirty he was still some way down the list of lieutenants in the Grenadiers, while Wolfe, two years his junior in age, had been four years in command of a battalion with the rank of lieutenant- colonel. Yet he had long been ' my friend Carleton ' to Wolfe, he was soon to become one of ' Pitt's Young Men,' and he was enough of a ' coming man' to incur the king's dis- pleasure. He had criticized the Hanoverians ; and the king never f orgave him. The third George ' gloried in the name of Englishman.' But the first two were Hanoverian all through. And for an English guardsman to disparage the Hanoverian army was considered next door to lèse-majesté. Lady Dorchester burnt all her husband's private papers after his death in 18o8; so we",
         "GUY CARLETON have lost some of the most intimate records concerning him. But ' grave Carleton ' ap- pears so frequently in the letters of his friend Wolfe that we can see his character as a young man in almost any aspect short of self-revela- tion. The first reference has nothing to do with affairs of state. In 1747 Wolfe, aged twenty, writing to Miss Lacey, an English girl in Brussels, and signing himself ' most sin- cerely your friend and admirer,' says: 'I was doing the greatest injustice to the dear girls to admit the least doubt of their con- stancy. Perhaps with respect to ourselves there may be cause of complaint. Carleton, I 'n afraid, is a recent example of it.' From this we may infer that Carleton was less \u003c grave ' as a young man than Wolfe f ound him later on. Six years afterwards Wolfe strongly recommended him for a position which he had himself been asked to fill, that of military tutor to the young Duke of Richmond, who was to get a cornpany in Wolfe's own regiment. Writing home fron Paris in 1753 Wolfe tells his mother that the duke ' wants some skilful man to travel with him through the Low Countries and into Lorraine. I have proposed my friend Carleton, whom Lord Albemarle approves of.' Lord Albemarle was the British 3",
         "4 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ambassador to France ; so Carleton got the post and travelled under the happiest auspices, while learning the frontier on which the Belgian, French, and British allies were to fight the Germans in the Great World War of 1914. It was during this military tour of fortified places that Carleton acquired the engineering skill which a few years later proved of such service to the British cause in Canada. in 1754 George Washington, at that time a young Virginian officer of only twenty-two, fired the first shot in what presently became the world-wide Seven Years' War. The im- mediate result was disastrous to the British arms ; and Washington had to give up the command of the Ohio by surrendering Fort Necessity to the French on-of all dates-the 4th of July ! In 1755 came Braddock's de- feat. In 1756 Montcalm arrived in Canada and won his first victory at Oswego. In 1757 Wolfe distinguished himself by formulating the plan which, if properly executed, would have prevented the British fiasco at Rochefort on the coast of France. But Carleton re- mained as undistinguished as before. He simply became lieutenant-colonel command- ing the 72nd Foot, now the Seaforth High-",
         "GUY CARLETON 5 landers. In 1758 his chance appeared to have corne at last. Amherst had asked for his services at Louisbourg. But the king had neither forgotten nor forgiven the remarks about the Hanoverians, and so refused point- blank, to Wolfe's ' very great grief and dis- appointment. . . . It is a public loss Carleton's not going.' Wolfe's confidence in Carleton, either as a friend or as an officer, was stronger than ever. Writing to George Warde, after- wards the famous cavalry leader, he said: 'Accidents may happen in the family that may throw my little affairs into disorder. Carleton is so good as to say he will give what help is in his power. May I ask the same favour of you, my oldest friend ?' Writing to Lord George Sackville, of whonmi we shall hear more than enough at the crisis of Carleton's career, Wolfe said: 'Amherst will tell you his opinion of Carleton, by which you will probably be better convinced of our loss.' Again, ' We want grave Carleton for every-purpose of the war.' And yet again, after the fall of Louis- bourg: ' If His Majesty had thought proper to let Carleton corne with us as engineer it would have cut the matter much shorter and we might now be ruining the walls of Quebec and completing the conquest of New France.'",
         "6 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA A little later on Wolfe blazes out with indigna- tion over Carleton's supersession by a junior. ' Can Sir John Ligonier [the commander-in- chief] allow His Majesty to remain unac- quainted with the merit of that officer, and can he see such a mark of displeasure without endeavouring to soften or clear the matter up a little ? A man of honour has the right to expect the protection of his Colonel and of the Commander of the troops, and he can't serve without it. If I was in Carleton's place I wouldn't stay an hour in the Army after being aimed at and distinguished in so remarkable a manner.' But Carleton bided his time. At the beginning of 1759 Wolfe was ap- pointed to command the army destîned to besiege Quebec. He immediately submitted Carleton's name for appointment as quarter- master-general. Pitt and Ligonier heartily approved. But the king again refused. Ligo- nier went back a second time to no purpose. Pitt then sent him in for the third time, saying, in a tone meant for the king te over- hear : ' Tell His Majesty that in order to render the General [Wolfe] completely re- sponsible for his conduct he should be made, as far as possible, inexcusable if he should fail; and that whatever an officer entrusted",
         "SIR (;UY C.\\R1iE''ON, LORD DI'IS1i Irflhl ali nr Iv \\ 1 ~lI~",
         "GUY CARLETON 7 with such a service of confidence requests ought therefore to be granted.' The king then consented. Thus began Carleton's long, de- voted, and successful service for Canada, the Empire, and the Crown. Early in this memorable Empire Year of 1759 he sailed with Wolfe and Saunders from Spithead. On the 3oth of April the fleet rendezvoused at Halifax, where Admiral Durell, second-in-command to Saunders, had spent the winter with a squadron intended to block the St Lawrence directly navigation opened in the spring. Durell was a good commonplace officer, but very slow. He had lost many hands from sickness during a par- ticularly cold season, and he was not enter- prising enough to start cruising round Cabot Strait before the month of May. Saunders, greatly annoyed by this delay, sent him off with eight men-of-war on the 5th of May. Wolfe gave him seven hundred soldiers under Carleton. These forces were sufficient to turn back, capture, or destroy the twenty-three French merchantmen which were then bound for Quebec with supplies and soldiers as rein- forcements for Montcalm. But the French ships were a week ahead of Durell ; and, when he landed Carleton at Isle-aux-Coudres on the",
         "8 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA 28th of May, the last of the enemy's transports had already discharged her cargo at Quebec, sixty miles above. Isle-aux-Coudres, so named by Jacques Cartier in 1535, was a point of great strategic importance ; for it commanded the only channel then used. It was the place Wolfe had chosen for his winter quarters, that is, in case of failure before Quebec and supposing he was not recalled. None but a particularly good officer would have been appointed as its first commandant. Carleton spent many busy days here preparing an advanced base for the coming siege, while the subsequently famous Captain Cook was equally busy ' a- sounding of the channell of the Traverse ' which the fleet would have to pass on its way to Quebec. Some of Durell's ships destroyed the French 'long-shore batteries near this Traverse, at the lower end of the island of Orleans, while the rest kept ceaseless watch to seaward, anxiously scanning the offing, day after day, to make out the colours of the first. fleet up. No one knew what the French West India fleet would do ; and there was a very disconcerting chance that it might run north and slip into the St Lawrence, ahead of Saunders, in the same way as the French",
         "GUY CARLETON reinforcements had just slipped in ahead of Durell. Presently, at the first streak of dawn on the 23rd of June, a strong squadron was seen advancing rapidly under a press of sail. Instantly the officers of the watch called all hands up from below. The boatswains' whistles shrilled across the water as the sea- men ran to quarters and cleared the decks for action. Carleton's camp was equally astir. The guards turned out. The bugles sounded. The men fell in and waited. Then the flag- ship signalled ashore that the strangers had just answered correctly in private code that all was well and that Wolfe and Saunders were aboard. Next to Wolfe himself Carleton was the busiest man in the army throughout the siege of Quebec. In addition to his arduous and very responsible duties as quartermaster- general, he acted as inspector of engineers and as a special-service officer for work of an exceptionally confidential nature. As quarter- master-general he superintended the supply and transport branches. Considering that the army was operating in a devastated hostile country, a thousand miles away from its bases at Halifax and Louisbourg, and that the inter- action of the different services-naval and 9",
         "io THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA military, Imperial and Colonial-required ad- justinent to a nicety at every turn, it was wonderful that so much was done so well with means which were far from being adequate. War prices of course ruled in the British camp. But they compared very favourably with the famine prices in Quebec, where most 'luxuries' soon became unobtainable at any price. There were no canteen or camp-follower scandals under Carleton. Then, as now, every soldier had a regulation ration of food and a regulation allowance for his service kit. But 'extras' were always acceptable. The price-list of these ' extras ' reads strangely to modern ears. But, under the circumstances, it was not exorbitant, and it was slightly tempered by being reckoned in Halifax cur- rency of four dollars to the pound instead of five. The British Tommy Atkins of that and many a later day thought Canada a wonderful country for making money go a long way when he could buy a pot of beer for twopence and get back thirteen pence Halifax currency as change for his English shilling. Beef and ham ran from ninepence to a shilling a pound. Muttcn was a little dearer. Salt butter was eightpence to one-and-threepence. Cheese was tenpence ; potatoes from five to ten shillings",
         "GUY CARLETON a bushel. ' A reasonable loaf of good soft Bread ' cost sixpence. Soap was a shilling a pound. Tea was prohibitive for all but the officers. ' Plain Green Tea and very Badd' was fifteen shillings, 'Couchon' twenty shillings, ' Hyson' thirty. Leaf tobacco was tenpence a pound, roll one-and-tenpence, snuff two - and - threepence. Sugar was a shilling to eighteen pence. Lemons were six- pence apiece. The non-intoxicating ' Bad Sproos Beer ' was only twopence a quart and helped to keep off scurvy. Real beer, like wine and spirits, was more expensive. ' Bristol Beer' was eighteen shillings a dozen, ' Bad malt Drink from Hellifax' ninepence a quart. Rum and claret were eight shillings a gallon each, port and Madeira ten and twelve re- spectively. The term ' Bad' did not then mean noxious, but only inferior. It stood against every low-grade article in the price- list. No goods were over-classified while Carleton was quartermaster-general. The engineers were under-staffed, under- manned, and overworked. There were no Royal Engineers as a permanent and compre- hensive corps till the time of Wellington. Wolfe complained bitterly and often of the lack of men and materials for scientific siege 11",
         "12 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA work. But he ' relied on Carleton' to good purpose in this respect as well as in many others. In his celebrated dispatch to Pitt he mentions Carleton twice. It was Carleton whom he sent to seize the west end of the island of Orleans, so as to command the basin of Quebec, and Carleton whom he sent to take prisoners and gather information at Pointe- aux-Trembles, twenty miles above the city. Whether or not he revealed the whole of his final plan to Carleton is probably more than we shall ever know, since Carleton's papers were destroyed. But we do know that he did not reveal it to any one else, not even to his three brigadiers, Monckton, Townshend, and Murray. Carleton was wounded in the head during the Battle of the Plains; but soon returned to duty. Wolfe showed his confidence in him to the last. Carleton's was the only name mentioned twice in the will which Wolfe handed over to Jervis, the future Lord St Vincent, the night before the battle. ' I leave to Colonel Oughton, Colonel Carleton, Colonel Howe, and Colonel Warde a thousand pounds each.' ' Al my books and papers, both here and in England, I leave to Colonel Carleton.' Wolfe's mother, who died five years later,",
         "GUY CARLETON showed the same confidence by appointing Carleton her executor. With the fall of Quebec in 1759 Carleton disappears from the Canadian scene till 1766. But so many pregnant events happened in Canada during these seven years, while so few happened in his own career, that it is much more important for us to follow her history than his biography. In 1761 he was wounded at the storming of Port Andro during the attack on Belle Isle off the west coast of France. In 1762 he was wounded at Havana in the West Indies. After that he enjoyed four years of quietness at home. Then came the exceedingly diffi- cult task of guiding Canada through twelve years of turbulent politics and most sub- versive war. 13",
         "CHAPTER II GENERAL MURRAY 1759-1766 BOTH armies spent a terrible winter after the Battle of the Plains. There was better shelter for the French in Montreal than for the British among the ruins of Quebec. But in the matter of food the positions were reversed. Never- theless the French gallantly refused the truce offered them by Murray, who had now suc- ceeded Wolfe. They were determined to make a supreme effort to regain Quebec in the spring ; and they were equally determined that the habitants should not be free to supply the British with provisions. In spite of the state of war, however, the French and British officers, even as prisoners and captors, began to make friends. They had found each other foemen worthy of their steel. A distinguished French officer, the Comte de Malartic, writing to Lévis, Mont- calm's successor, said: 'I cannot speak too 14",
         "GENERAL MURRAY highly of General Murray, although he is oui enemy.' Murray, on his part, was equally loud and generous in his praise of the French. The Canadian seigneurs found fellow-gentle. men among the British officers. The priests and nuns of Quebec found many fellow- Catholics among the Scottish and Irish troops, and nothing but courteous treatment from the soldiers of every rank and form of religion. Murray directed that 'the compliment of the hat ' should be paid to all religious processions. The Ursuline nuns knitted long stockings for the bare-legged Highlanders when the winter came on, and presented each Scottish officer with an embroidered St Andrew's Cross on the 3oth of November, St Andrew's Day. The whole garrison won the regard of the town by giving up part of their rations for the hungry poor; while the habitants from the surrounding country presently began to find out that the British were honest to deal with and most humane, though sternly just, as conquerors. In the following April Lévis made his desperate throw for victory ; and actually did succeed in defeating Murray outside the walls of Quebec. But the British fleet came up in May ; and that summer three British 15",
         "16 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA armies converged on Montreal, where the last doomed remnants of French power-on the St Lawrence stood despairingly at bay. When Lévis found his two thousand effective French regulars surrounded by eight times as many British troops he had no choice but to lay down the arms of France for ever. On the 8th of September 1760 his gallant little army was included in the Capitulation of Montreal, by which the whole of Canada passed into the possession of the British Crown. Great Britain had a different general idea for each one of the four decades which im- mediately followed the conquest of Canada. In the sixties the general idea was to kill re- fractory old French ways with a double dose of new British liberty and kindness, so that Canada might gradually become the loyal fourteenth colony of the Empire in America. But the fates were against this benevolent scheme. The French Canadians were firmly wedded to their old ways of life, except in so far as the new liberty enabled them to throw off irksome duties and restraints, while the new English-speaking ' colonists' were so few, and mostly so bad, that they became the cause of endless discord where harmony was",
         "r JAMES AMURRA' Frm an engravxing in the Dominion Archives",
         "GENERAL MURRAY 17 essential. In the seventies the idea was to restore the old French-Canadian life so as not only to make Canada proof against the dis- affection of the Thirteen Colonies but also to make her a safe base of operations against rebellious Americans. In the eighties the great concern of the government was to make a harmonious whole out of two very widely differing parts-the long-settled French Cana- dians and the newly arrived United Empire Loyalists. In the nineties each of these parts was set to work out its own salvation under its own provincial constitution. Carleton's is the only personality which links together ail four decades-the would- be American sixties, the French-Canadian seventies, the Anglo-French-Canadian eighties, and the bi-constitutional nineties-though, as mentioned already, Murray ruled Canada for the first seven years, 1759-66. James Murray, the first British governor of Canada, was a younger son of the fourth Lord Elibank. He was just over forty, warm- hearted and warm-tempered, an excellent French scholar, and every inch a soldier. He had been a witness for the defence of Mordaunt at the court-martial held to try F.B.C. B",
         "18 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the authors of the Rochefort fiasco in 1757. Wolfe, who was a witness on the other side, referred to him later on as ' my old antagonist Murray.' But Wolfe knew a good man when he saw one and gave his full confidence to his ' old antagonist ' both at Louisbourg and Quebec. Murray was not born under a lucky star. He saw three defeats in three successive wars. He began his service with the abor- tive attack on pestilential Cartagena, where Wolfe's father was present as adjutant- general. In mid-career he lost the battle of Ste Foy.' And his active military life ended with his surrender of Minorca in 1782. But he was greatly distinguished for honour and steadfastness on all occasions. An admiring contemporary described him as a model of all the military virtues except prudence. But he had more prudence and less genius than his admirer thought; and he showed a marked talent for general government. The problem before him was harder than his superiors could believe. He was expected to prepare for assimilation some sixty-five thousand 'new 1 See The Winning of Canada, chap. viii. See also, for the best account of this battle and other events of the year between Wolfe's victory and the surrender of Montreal, The Fa/I of Canada, by George M. Wrong. Oxford, 1914.",
         "GENERAL MURRAY subjects' who were mostly alien in religion and wholly alien in every other way. But, for the moment, this proved the least of his many difficulties because no immediate re- sults were required. While the war went on in Europe Canada remained nominally a part of the enemy's dominions, and so, of course, was subject to military rule. Sîr Jeffery Amherst, the British commander-in-chief in America, took up his headquarters in New York. Under him Murray commanded Canada from Quebec. Under Murray, Colonel Burton commanded the district of Three Rivers while General Gage commanded the district of Montreal, which then extended to the western wilds.1 Murray's first great trouble arose in 1761. It was caused by an outrageous War Office order that fourpence a day should be stopped from the soldiers to pay for the rations they had always got free. Such gross injustice, coming in time of war and applied to soldiers who richly deserved reward, made the veterans ' mad with rage.' Quebec promised to be the scene of a wild mutiny. Murray, like all his officers, thought the stoppage nothing short of robbery. But he threw himself into the ' See The War Chief of the Ottawas, chap. iii.",
         "20 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA breach. He assembled the officers and ex- plained that they must die to the last man rather than allow the mutineers a free hand. He then held a general parade at which he ordered the troops to march between two flag- poles on pain of instant death, promising to kill with his own hands the first man who refused. He added that he was ready to hear and forward any well-founded complaint, but that, since insubordination had been openly threatened, he would insist on subordination being publicly shown. Then, amid tense silence, he gave the word of command-Quick, March !-while every officer felt his trigger. To the immense relief of all concerned the men stepped off, marched straight between the flags and back to quarters, tamed. The criminal War Office blunder was rectified and peace was restored in the ranks. ' Murray's Report' of 1762 gives us a good view of the Canada of that day and shows the attitude of the British towards their new possession. Canada had been conquered by Great Britain, with some help from the American colonies, for three main reasons: first, to strike a death-blow at French dominion in America; secondly, to increase the oppor- tunities of British seaborne trade; and, thirdly,",
         "GENERAL MURRAY 21 to enlarge the area available for British settle- ment. When Murray was instructed to pre- pare a report on Canada he had to keep all this in mind; for the government wished to satisfy the public both at home and in the colonies. He had to examine the military strength of the country and the disposition of its population in case of future wars with France. He had to satisfy the natural curiosity of men like the London merchants. And he had to show how and where English- speaking settlers could go in and make Canada not only a British possession but the fourteenth British colony in North America. Burton and Gage were also instructed to report about their own districts of Three Rivers and Montreal. The documents they prepared were tacked on to Murray's. By June 1762 the work was completed and sent on to Amherst, who sent it to England in ample time to be studied there before the opening of the impending negotiations for peace. Murray was greatly concerned about the military strength of Quebec, then, as always, the key of Canada. Like the unfortunate Montcalm he found the walls of Quebec badly built, badly placed, and falling into ruins i",
         "2z THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA and he thought they could not be defended by three thousand men against ' a well conducted Coup-de-main.' He proposed to crown Cape Diamond with a proper citadel, which would overawe the disaffected in Quebec itself and defend the place against an outside enemy long enough to let a British fleet corne up to its relief. The rest of the country was de- fended by little garrisons at Three Rivers and Montreal as well as by several small detach- ments distributed among the trading-posts where the white men and the red met in the depths of the western wilderness. The relations between che British garrison and the French Canadians were so excellent that what Gage reported from Montreal might be taken as equally true of the rest of the country: 'The Soldiers live peaceably with the Inhabitants and they reciprocally acquire an affection for each other.' The French Canadians numbered sixty-five thousand al- together, exclusive of the fur traders and coureurs de bois. Barely fifteen thoisand lived in the three little towns of Quebec, Montreal, and Three Rivers; while over fifty thousand lived in the country. Nearly all the officials had gone back to France. The three classes of greatest importance were the",
         "GENERAL MURRAY 23 seigneurs, the clergy, and the hr bitants. The laWyers were not of much account ; the petty commercial classes of less account still. The coureurs de bois and other fur traders formed an important link between the savage and the civilized life of the country. Apart from furs the trade of Canada was contemptibly small in the eyes of men like the London merchants. But the opportunity of fostering all the fur trade that could be carried down the St Lawrence was very well worth while ; and if there was no other exist- ing trade worth capturing there seemed to be some kinds worth creating. Murray held out well-grounded hopes of the fisheries and forests. 'A Most immense Cod Fishery can be estab- lished in the River and Gulph of St Lawrence. A rich tract of country on the South Side of the Gulph will be settled and improved, and a port or ports furnished with every material requisite to repair ships.' He then went on to enumerate the other kinds of fishery, the abundance of whales, seals, and walruses in the Gulf, and of salmon up all the tributary rivers. Burton recommends immediate attention to the iron mines behind Three Rivers. All the governors expatiate on the vast amount of forest wealth and remind the home govern-",
         "24 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ment that under the French régime the king, when making out patents for the seigneurs, reserved the right of taking wood for ship- building and fortifications from any of the signeuries. Agriculture was found to be in a very backward state. The habitants would raise no more than they required for their own use and for a little local trade. But the fault was attributed to the gambling attractions of the fur trade, to the bad governmental system, and to the frequent interruptions of the corvée, a kind of forced labour which was meant to serve the public interest, but which Bigot and other thievish officials always turned to their own private advantage. On the whole, the reports were most encouraging in the prospects they held out to honest labour, trade, and government. While Murray and his lieutenants had been collecting information for their reports the home government had been undergoing many changes for the worse. The master-states- man Pitt had gone out of power and the back- stairs politician Bute had come in. Pitt's ' bloody and expensive war '-the war that, more than any other, laid the foundations of the present British Empire-was to be ended",
         "GENERAL MURRAY on any terms the country could be persuaded to bear. Thus the end of the Seven Years' War, or, as the British part of it was more correctly called, the 'Maritime War,' was no more glorious in statesmanship than its be- ginning had been in arms. But the spirit of its mighty heart still lived on in the Empire's grateful memories of Pitt and quickened the English-speaking world enough to prevent any really disgraceful surrender of the hard-won fruits of victory. The Treaty of Paris, signed on the ioth of February 1763, and the king's proclamation, published in October, were duly followed by the inauguration of civil government in Canada. The incompetent Bute, anxious to get Pitt out of the way, tried to induce him to become the first British governor of the new colony. Even Bute probably never dared to hope that Pitt would actually go out to CanacIa. But he did hope to lower his prestige by making him the holder of a sine- cure at home. However this rnay be, Pitt, mightiest of all parliamentary ministers of war, refused to be mado either a jobber or an exile ; whereupon Murray's position was changed from a military command into that of ' Governor and Captain-General.' 25,",
         "26 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA The changes which ensued in the laws of Canada were heartily welcomed so far as the adoption of the humaner criminal code of England was concerned. The new laws re- lating to debtor and creditor also gave general satisfaction, except, as we shall presently see, when they involved imprisonment for debt. But the tentative efforts to introduce English civil law side by side with the old French code resulted in great confusion and much discontent. The land laws had become so unworkable under this dual system that they had to be left as they were. A Court of Common Pleas was set up specially for the benefit of the French Canadians. If either party demanded a jury one had to be sworn in; and French Canadians were to be jurors on equal terms with 'the King's Old Subjects.' The Roman Catholic Church was to be com- pletely tolerated but not in any way estab- lished. Lord Egremont, in giving the king's instructions to Murray, reminded him that the proviso in the Treaty of Paris-as far as the Laws of Great Britain permit - should govern his action whenever disputes arose. It must be remembered that the last Jacobite rising was then a comparatively recent affair, and that France was equally ready to upset",
         "GENERAL MURRAY either the Protestant succession in England or the British régime in Canada. The Indians were also an object of special solicitude in the royal proclamation. 'The Indians who live under our Protection should not be molested in the possession of such parts of our Dominions and Territories as, not hav- ing been ceded to or purchased by Us, are reserved to them.' The home government was far in advance of the American colonists in its humane attitude towards the Indians. The comrnon American attitude then and long afterwards-indeed, up to a time well within living memory-was that Indians were a kind of human vermin to be exterminated without mercy, unless, of course, more money was to be made out of them alive. The result was an endless struggle along the ever-receding frontier of the West. And just at this par- ticular tirne the ' Conspiracy of Pontiac ' had brought about something like a real war. The story of this great effort of the Indians to stem the encroachments of the exterminating colonists is told in another chronicle of the present Series.1 The French traders in the West undoubtedly had a hand in stirring up the Indians. Pontiac, a sort of Indian ' The War Chief of the Ottawas. 27",
         "28 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Napoleon, was undoubtedly cruel as well as crafty. And the Indians undoubtedly fought just as the ancestors of the French and British used to fight when they were at the corre- sponding stage of social evolution. But the mere fact that so many jealously distinct tribes united in this common cause proves how rnuch they all must have suffered at the hands of the colonists. While Pontiac's war continued in the West Murray had to deal with a political war in Canada which rose to its height in 1764. The king's proclamation of the previous October had 'given express Power to our Governor that, so soon as the state and circumstances of the said Colony will admit thereof, he shall call a General Assembly in such manner and form as is used in those Colonies and Provinces in America which are under our immediate government.' The intention of establishing parliamentary institutions was, therefore, per- fectly clear. But it was equally clear that the introduction of such institutions was to depend on ' circumstances,' and it is well to remember here that these ' circumstances ' were not held to warrant the opening of a Canadian parliament till 1792. Now, the",
         "GENERAL MURRAY military government had been a great success. There was every reason to suppose that civil government by a governor and councîl would be the next best thing. And it was quite certain that calling a ' General Assembly' at once would defeat the very ends which such bodies are designed to serve. More than ninety-nine per cent of the population were dead against an assembly which none of themn understood and ail distrusted. On the other hand, the clamorous minority of less than one per cent were in favour only of a parlia- ment from which the majority should be rigorously excluded, even, if possible, as voters. The immense maj ority comprised the entire French-Canadian community. The absurdly small minority consisted mostly of American- ized camp-following traders, who, having come to fish in troubled waters, naturally wanted the laws made to suit poachers. The British garrison, the governing officials, and the very few other English-speaking people of a more enlightened class ail looked down on the rancorous minority. The whole question resolved itself into this : should Canada be handed over to the licensed ex- ploitation of a few hundred low-class camp- followers, who had done nothing to win her 29",
         "30 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA for the British Empire, who were despised by those who had, and who promised to be a dangerous thorn in the side of the new colony ? What this ridiculous minority of grab-alls really wanted was not a parliament but a rump. Many a representative assembly has ended in a rurnp. The grab-alls wished to begin with one and stop there. It might be supposed that such pretensions would defeat themselves. But there was a twofold difficulty in the way of getting the truth understood by the English-speaking public on both sides of the Atlantic. In the first place, the French Canadians were practically dumb to the outside world. In the second, the vociferous rumpites had the ear of some English and more American commercial people who were not anxious to understand; while the great mass of the general public were inclined to think, if they ever thought at all, that parliamentary government must mean more liberty for every one concerned. A singularly apt commentary on the pre- tensions of the camp-followers is supplied by the famous, or infamous, 'Presentment of the Grand Jury of Quebec' in October 1764. The moving spirits of this precious jury were aspirants to membership in the strictly ex-",
         "GENERAL MURRAY 31 clusive, rumpish little parliament of their own seeking. The signatures of the French- Canadian members were obtained by fraud, as was subsequently proved by a sworn official protestation. The first presentment tells its own tale, as it refers to the only courts in which French-Canadian lawyers were allowed to plead. ' The great number of inferior Courts are tiresome, litigious, and expensive to this poor Colony.' Then came a hit at the previous military rule-' That Decrees of the military Courts may be amended [after having been confirmed by legal ordinance] by allow- ing Appeals if the matter decided exceed Ten Pounds,' which would put it out of the reach of the ' inferior Courts ' and into the clutches of ' the King's Old Subjects.' But the gist of it all was contained in the following: 'We represent that as the Grand Jury must be considered at present as the only Body re- presentative of the Colony, . . . We propose that the Publick Accounts be laid before the Grand Jury at least twice a year.' That the grand jury was to be purged of all its French- Canadian members is evident from the ad- dendum slipped in behind their backs. This addendum is a fine specimen of verbose in- vective against ' the Church of Rome,' the",
         "32 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Pope, Bulls, Briefs, absolutions, etc., the empanelling 'en Grand and petty Jurys ' of ',papist or topish Recusants Convict,' and so on. The ' Presentment of the Grand Jury' was presently followed by The Humble Petition of Your Majesty's mostfaithful and loyal Subjects, British Merchants and Traders, in behalf of Themselves and their fellow Subjects, In- habitants of Your Majesty's Province of Quebec. ' Their fellow Subjects ' did not, of course, include any ' papist or popish Recusants Convict.' Among the 'Grievances and Dis- tresses ' enumerated were ' the oppressive and severely felt Military government,' the ina- bility to ' reap the fruit of our Industry ' under such a martinet as Murray, who, in one para- graph, is accused of ' suppressing dutyfull Remonstrances in Silence' and, in the next, of ' treating them with a Rage and Rudeness of Language and Demeanor as dishonourable to the Trust he holds of Your Majesty as painfull to Those who suffer from it.' Finally, the petitioners solemnly warn His Majesty that their ' Lives in the Province are so very un- happy that we must be under the Necessity of removing fron it, unless timely prevented by a Removal of the present Governor.'",
         "o c N BRITISH POSSESSIONS 1N NORTH AMERICA 1763-1775 Sea/e c Me/es c /0 oc 30c 400 500",
         "GENERAL MURRAY In forwarding this document Murray poured out the vials of his wrath on 'the Licentious Fanaticks Trading here,' while he boldly c aimpioned the cause of the French Cana- dians, ' a Race, who, could they be indulged with a few priveledges which the Laws of England deny to Roman Catholicks at home, would soon get the better of every National Antipathy to their Cnquerors and become the most faithful and most useful set of Men in this American Empire.' While these charges and counter-charges were crossing the Atlantic another, and much more violent, trouble came to a head. As there were no barracks in Canada billeting was a necessity. It was made as little burden- some as possible and the houses of magistrates were specially exempt. This, however, did not prevent the magistrates from baiting the military whenever they got the chance. Fines, imprisonments, and other sentences, out of all proportion to the offence committed, were heaped on every redcoat in much the same way as was then being practised in Boston and other hotbeds of disaffection. The redcoats had done their work in ridding America of the old French menace. They were doing it now in ridding the colonies cf F.B.C. c 33",
         "34 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the last serious menace from the Indians. And so the colonists, having no further use for them, began trying to make the land they had delivered too hot to hold them. There wer. of course, exceptions ; and the American color sts had some real as well as pretended grievances. But wantonly baiting the red- coats had already become a most discreditable general practice. Montreal was most in touch with the dis- affected people to the south. It also had a magistrate of the name of Walker, the most rancorous of all the disaffected magistrates in Canada. This Walker, well mated with an equally rancorous wife, was the same man who entertained Benjamin Franklin and the other commissioners sent by Congress into Canada in 1776, the year in which both the American Republic and a truly British Canada were born. He would not have been flattered could he have seen the entry Franklin made about him and his wife in a diary which is still extant. The gist of it was that wherever the Walkers might be they would soon set the place by the ears. Walker, of course, was foremost in the persecution of the redcoats ; and he eagerly seized his opportunity when an officer was billeted in a house where a brother",
         "GENERAL MURRAY 35 magistrate happened to be living as a lodger. Under such circumstances the magistrate could not claim exemption. But this made no difference either to him or to Walker. Captain Payne, the gentleman whose presence enraged these boors, was seized and thrown into gaol. The chief justice granted a writ of habeas corpus. But the mischief was done and resentment waxed high. The French- Canadian seigneurs sympathized with Payne, which added fuel to the magisterial flame ; and Murray, scenting danger, summoned the whole bench down to Quebec. But before this bench of bumbles started some masked men seized Walker in his own house and gave him a good sound thrashing. Unfortunately they spoilt the fair reprisal by cutting off his ear. That very night the news had run round Montreal and made a start for Boston and Quebec. Feeling ran high; and higher still when, a few weeks later, the civil magistrates vented their rage on several redcoats by imposing sentences exceeding even the utmost limits of their previous vindictive action. Montreal became panic-stricken lest the soldiers, baited past endurance, should break out in open violence. Murray drove up, post-haste, from Quebec,",
         "36 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ordered the affected regiment to another station, reproved the offending magistrates, and re-established public confidence. Official and private rewards were offered to any wit- nesses who would identify Walker's assailants. But in vain. The smouldering fire burst out again under Carleton. But the mystery was never cleared up. Things had now corne to a crisis. The London merchants, knowing nothing about the internal affairs of Canada, backed the petition of the Quebec traders, who were quite unworthy of such support from men of real business probity and knowledge. The magisterial faction in Canada advertised their side of the case »ail over the colonies and in any sympathetic quarter they could find in England. The seigneurs sent home a warm defence of Murray; and Murray himself sent Cramahé, a very able Swiss officer in the British Army. The home government thus had plenty of contradictory evidence before it in 1765. The result was that Murray was called home in 1766, rather in a spirit of open- minded and sympathetic inquiry into his conduct than with any idea of censuring him. He never returned to Canada. But as he held the titular governorship for some time",
         "GENERAL MURRAY longer, and as he was afterwards employed in positions of great responsibility and trust, the verdict of the home authorities was clearly given in his favour. The troublous year of 1764 saw another in- novation almost as revolutionary, compared with the old régime, as the introduction of civil government itself. This was the issue of the first newspaper in Canada, where, in- deed, it was also the first printed thing of any kind. Nova Scotia had produced an earlier paper, the Halifax Gazette, which lived an intermittent life from 1752 to 1800. But no press had ever been allowed in New France. The few documents that required printing had always been done in the mother country. Brown and Gilmore, two Philadelphians, were thus undertaking a pioneer business when they announced that ' Our Design is, in case we are fortunate enough to succeed, early in this spring to settle in this City [Quebec] in the capacity of Printers, and forthwith to publish a weekly newspaper in French and English.' The Quebec Gazette, which first appeared on the 21st of the following June, has continued to the present time, though it is now a daily and is known as the Quebec Chronicle. Cen- 37",
         "38 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA tenarian papers are not common in any country; and those that have lived over a century and a half are very few indeed. So the Quebec Chronicle, which is the second sur- viving senior in America, is also anong the great press seniors of the world. The original number is one of the curiosities of journalism. The publishers felt tolerably sure of having what was then considered a good deal of recent news for their three hundred readers during the open season. But, knowing that the supply would be both short and stale in winter, they held out prospects of a Canadian Tatler or Spectator, without, however, being rash enough to promise a supply of Addisons and Steeles. Their announcement makes curious reading at the present day. The Rigour of Winter preventing the arrival of ships from Europe, and in a great measure interrupt- ing the ordinary intercourse with the Southern Provinces, it will be necessary, in a paper designed for General Perusal, and Publick Utility, to provide some things of general Entertainment, independent of foreign intelligence : we shall therefore, on such occasions, present our Readers with such Originals, both in Prose and Verse, as will please the FANCY and instruct the JUDGMENT. And here we beg leave to observe that we shall have nothing so much at heart",
         "GENERAL MURRAY 39 as the support of VIRTUE and MORALITY and the noble cause of LIBERTY. The refined amusements of LITERATURE, and the pleasing veins of well pointed wit, shall also be considered as necessary to this collection ; interspersed with chosen pieces, and curious essays, extracted from the most celebrated authors ; So that, blending PHILOSOPHY with POLI- TICKS, HISTORY, \u0026c., the youth of both sexes will be improved and persons of all ranks agreeably and usefully entertained. And upon the whole we will labour to attain to all the exactness that so much variety will permit, and give as much variety as will consist with a reasonable exactness. And as this part of our project cannot be carried into execution without the correspondence of the INGENIOUS, we shall take all opportunities of acknowledging our obligations, to those who take the trotble of furnish- ing any natter which shall tend to entertainment or instruction. Our Intentions to please the Whole, without offence to any Individual, will be better evinced by our practice, than by writing volumes on the subject. This one thing we beg may be believed, that PARTY PREJUDICE, or PRIVATE SCANDAL, will never find a place in this PAPER.",
         "CHAPTER III GOVERNOR CARLETON 1766-1774 THE twelve years of Carleton's first ad~ ministration naturally fall into three distinct periods of equal length. During the first he was busily employed settling as many diffi- culties as he could, examining the general state of the country, and gradually growing into the change that was developing in the minds of the home government, the change, that is, from the Americanizing sixties to the French- Canadian seventies. During the second period he was in England, helping to shape the famous Quebec Act. During the third he was defending Canada from American attack and aiding the British counterstroke by every means in his power. On the 22nd of September 1766 Carleton arrived at Quebec and began his thirty years' experience as a Canadian administrator by taking over the government from Colonel 40",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 41 Irving, who had held it since Murray's de- parture in the spring. Irving had succeeded Murray simply because he happened to be the senior officer present at the time. Carleton himself was technically Murray's lieutenant tili 1768. But neither of these facts really affected the course of Canadian history. The Council, the magistrates, and the traders each presented the new governor with an address containing the usual professions of loyal devotion. Carleton remarked in his dis- patch that these separate addresses, and the marked absence of any united address, showed how much the population was divided. He also noted that a good many of the English- speaking minority had objected to the ad- dresses on account of their own opposition to the Stamp Act, and that there had been some broken heads in consequence. Troubles enough soon engaged his anxious attention- troubles over the Indian trade, the rights and wrongs of the Canadian Jesuits, the wounded dignity of some members of the Council, and the still smouldering and ever mysterious Walker affair. The strife between Canada and the Thirteen Colonies over the Indian trade of the West remained the same in principle as under",
         "42 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the old régime. The Conquest had merely changed the old rivalry between two foreign powers into one between two widely differing British possessions; and this, because of the general unrest among the Americans, made the competition more bitter, if possible, than ever. The Jesuits pressed their claims for re- cognition, for their original estates, and for compensation. But their order had fallen on evil days all over the world. It was not popular even in Canada. And the arrange- ment was that while the existing rnembers were to be treated with every consideration the Society itself was to be allowed to die out. The offended councillors went' so far as to present Carleton with a remonstrance which Irving himself had the misfortune to sign. Carleton had consulted some members on points with which they were specially ac- quainted. The members who had not been consulted thereupon protested to Irving, who assured them that Carleton must have done so by accident, not design. But when Carleton received a joint letter in which they said, 'As you are pleased to signifye to Us by Coli. Irving that it was accident, \u0026 not",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 43 Intention,' he at once replied: 'As Lieu- tenant Colonel Irving has signified to you that the Part of my Conduct you think worthy of your Reprehension happened by Accident let him explain his reasons for so doing. He had no authority from me.' Carleton then went on to say that he would consult any 'Men of Good Sense, Truth, Candour, and Impartial Justice ' whenever he chose, no matter whether they were councillors or not. The Walker affair, which now broke out again, was much more serious than the storm in the Council's teacup. It agitated the whole of Canada and threatened to range the popula- tion of Montreal and Quebec into two irre- concilable factions, the civil and the military. For the whole of the two years since Murray had been called upon to deal with it cleverly presented versions of Walker's views had been spread all over the colonies and worked into influential Opposition circles in England. The invectives against the redcoats and their friends the seigneurs were of the usual abusive type. But they had an unusually powerful effect at that particular time in the Thirteen Colonies as well as in what their authors hoped to make a Fourteenth Colony after a fashion of their own; and they looked plausible",
         "44 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA enough to mislead a good many moderate men in the mother country too. Walker's case was that he had an actual witness, as to the identity of his assailants, in the person of M'Govoch, a discharged soldier, who laid in- formation against one civilian, three British officers, and the celebrated French-Canadian leader, La Corne de St Luc. All the accused were arrested in their beds in Montreal and thrown into the common gaol. Walker ob- jected to bail on the plea that his life would be in danger if they were allowed at large. He also sought to postpone the trial in order to punish the accused as much as possible, guilty or innocent. But William Hey, the chief justice, an able and upright man, would consent to postponement only on condition that bail should be allowed ; so the trial proceeded. When the grand jury threw out the case against one of the prisoners Walker let loose such a flood of virulent abuse that moderate men were turned against him. In the end all the accused were honourably acquitted, while M'Govoch, who was proved to have been a false witness from the first, was convicted of perjury. Carleton remained absolutely impartial all through, and even dismissed Colonel Irving and another member",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 45 of the Council for heading a petition on behalf of the military prisoners. The Walker affair was an instance of a bad case in which the law at last worked well. But there were many others in which it did not. What with the Coutume de Paris, which is still quoted in the province of Quebec; the other complexities of the old French law; the doubtful meanings drawn from the capitula- tion, the treaty, the proclamation, and the various ordinances; the instinctive opposition between the French Canadians and the English- speaking civilians ; and, finally, what with the portents of subversive change that were already beginning to overshadow all America, -what with all this and more, Carleton found himself faced with a problem which no man could have solved to the satisfaction of every one concerned. Each side in a lawsuit took whatever amalgan of French and English codes was best for its own argument. But, generally speaking, the ingrained feeling of the French Canadians was against any change of their own laws that was not visibly and immediately beneficial to their own particular interests. Moreover, the use of the unknown English language, the worthlessness of the rapacious English-speaking magistrates, and",
         "46 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the detested innovation of imprisonment for debt, all combined to make every part of English civil law hated simply because it happened to be English and not French. The home authorities were anxious to find some workable compromise. In 1767 Carleton ex- changed several important dispatches with them; and in 1768 they sent out Maurice Morgan to study and report, after consultation with the chief justice and 'other well in- structed persons.' Morgan was an indefatig- able and clear-sighted man who deserves to be gratefully remembered by both races; for he was a good friend both to the French Canadians before the Quebec Act and to the United Empire Loyalists just before their great migration, when he was Carleton's secretary at New York. In 1769 the official correspondence entered the 'secret and con- fidential' stage with a dispatch from the home government to Carleton suggesting a House of Representatives to which, practically speaking, the towns would send Protestant members and the country districts Roman Catholics. In 1770 Carleton sailed for England. He carried a good deal of hard-won experience with him, both on this point and on many others. He went home with a strong opinion",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON not only against an assembly but against any immediate attempts at Anglicization in any form. The royal instructions that had accom- panied his commission as ' Captain-General and Governor-in-chief ' in 1768 conit;ained directions for establishing the Church of England with a view to converting the whole population to its tenets later on. But no steps had been taken, and, needless to say, the French Canadians remained as Roman Catholic as ever. An increasingly important question, soon to overshadow all others, was defence. In April 1768 Carleton had proposed the restora- tion of the seigneurial militia system. ' All the Lands here are held of His Majesty's Castle of St Lewis [the governor's official residence in Quebec]. The Oath which the Vassals [seigneurs] take is very Solemn and Binding. They are obliged to appear in Arms for the King's defence, in case his Province is at- tacked.' Carleton pointed out that a hundred men of the Canadian seigneurial families were being kept on full pay in France, ready to return and raise the Canadians at the first opportunity. 'On the other hand, there are only about seventy of these officers in Canada who have been in the French service. Not 47",
         "48 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA one of them has been given a commission in the King's [George's] Service, nor is there One who, from any motive whatever, is in- duced to support His Government.' The few French Canadians raised for Pontiac's war had of course been properly paid during the continuance of their active service. But they had been disbanded like mere militia after- wards, without either gratuities or half-pay for the officers. This naturally made the class from which officers were drawn think that no career was open to them under the Union Jack and turned their thoughts towards France, where their fellows were enjoying full pay without a break. What made this the more serious was the weakness of the regular garrisons, all of which, put together, numbered only 1627 men. Carleton calculated that about five hundred of 'the King's Old Subjects' were capable of bearing arms; though most of them were better at talking than fighting. He had nothing but contempt for 'the flimsy wall round Montreal,' and relied little more on the very defective works at Quebec. Thus, with all his wonderful equanimity, 'grave Carleton' left Canada with no light heart when he took six months' leave of absence in",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 1770; and he would have been more anxious still if he could have foreseen that his absence was to be prolonged to no less than four years. He had, however, two great satisfactions. He was represented at Quebec by a rnost steadfast lieutenant, the quiet, alert, discreet, and determined Cramahé; and he was leav- ing Canada after having given proof of a dis- interestedness which was worthy of the elder Pitt himself. When Pitt became Paymaster- General of England he at once declined to use the two chief perquisites of his office, the interest on the government balance and the half per cent commission on foreign sub- sidies, though both were regarded as a kind of indirect salary. When Carleton became governor of Canada he at once issued a pro- clamation abolishing all the fees and per- quisites attached to his position and ex- plained his action to the home authorities in the following words: ' There is a certain appearance of dirt, a sort of meanness, in exacting fees on every occasion. I think it necessary for the King's service that his representative should be thought unsullied.' Murray, who had accepted the fees, at first took umbrage. But Carleton soon put matters straight with him. The fact was F. B C. D 49",
         "50 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA that fees, and even certain perquisites, were no dishonour to receive, as they nearly always forrned a recognized part, and often the whole, of a perfectly legal salary. But fees and perquisites could be abused; and they did lead to misunderstandings, even when they were not abused; while fixed salaries were free from both objections. So Carleton, sur- rounded by shamelessly rapacious magistrates and the whole vile camp-following gang, as well as by French Canadians who had suffered from the robberies of Bigot and his like, de- cided to sacrifice everything but hi indispens- able fixed salary in order that even the most malicious critics could not bring any accusa- tion, however false, against the man who represented Britain and her king. An interesting personal interlude, which was not without considerable effect on Cana- dian history, took place in the middle of Carleton's four years' stay in England. He was forty-eight and still a bachelor. Tradi- tion whispers that these long years of single life were the result of a disappointing love affair with Jane Carleton, a pretty cousin, when both he and she were young. However that may be, he now proposed to Lady Anne",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 51 Howard, whose father, the Earl of Effingham, was one of his greatest friends. But he was doomed to a second, though doubtless very minor, disappointment. Lady Anne, who probably looked on ' grave Carleton ' as a sort of amiable, middle-aged uncle, had fallen in love with his nephew, whom she presently married, and with whom she afterwards went out to Canada, where her husband served under the rejected uncle himself. What added spice to this peculiar situation was the fact that Carleton actually married the younger sister of the too-youthful Lady Anne. When Lady Anne rejoined her sister and their boson friend, Miss Seymour, after the discon- certing interview with Carleton, she explained her tears by saying they were due to her hav- ing been ' obliged to refuse the best man on earth.' 'The more fool you!' answered the younger sister, Lady Maria, then just eigh- teen, ' I only wish he had given me the chance !' There, for the time, the matter ended. Carleton went back to his official duties in furtherance of the Quebec Act. His nephew and the elder sister made mutual love. Lady Maria held her tongue. But Miss Seymour had not forgotten; and one day she mustered up courage to tell Carleton",
         "52 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the story of ' the more fool you ! ' This de- cided him to act at once. He proposed ; was accepted ; and lived happily married for the rest of his long life. Lady Maria was small, fair-haired, and blue-eyed, which heightened her girlish appearance when, like Madame de Champlain, she came out to Canada with a husband more than old enough to be her father. But she had been brought up at Versailles. She knew all the aristocratic graces of the old régime. And her slight, up- right figure-erect as any soldier's to her dying day-almost matched her husband's stalwart form in dignity of carriage. The Quebec Act of 1774-the Magna Charta of the French-Canadian race-finally passed the House of Lords on the i8th of June. The general idea of the Act was to reverse the unsuccessful policy of ultimate assimilation with the other American colonies by making Canada a distinctly French-Canadian pro- vince. The Maritime Provinces, with a popu- lation of some thirty thousand, were to be as English as they chose. But a greatly en- larged Quebec, with a population of ninety thousand, and stretching far into the un- settled West, was to remain equally French-",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 53 Canadian; though the rights of what it was then thought would be a perpetual English- speaking minority were to be safeguarded in every reasonable way. The whole country between the American colonies and the domains of the Hudson's Bay Company was included in this new Quebec, which comprised the southern half of what is now the New- foundland Labrador, practically the whole of the modern provinces of Quebec and Ontario, and all the western lands between the Ohio and the Great Lakes as far as the Mississippi, that is, the modern American states of Ohio, Indiana, Illinois, Michigan, and Wisconsin. The Act gave Canada the English criminal code. It recognized most of the French civil law, including the seigneurial tenure of land. Roman Catholics were given 'the free Exer- cise ' of their religion, ' subject to the King's Supremacy ' as defined ' by an Act made in the First Year of Queen Elizabeth,' which Act, with a magnificently prophetic outlook on the future British Empire, was to apply to ' all the Dominions and Countries which then did, or thereafter should, belong to the Im- perial Crown.' The Roman Catholic clergy were authorized to collect ' their accustomed",
         "54 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Dues and Rights' from members of their own communion. The new oath of allegiance to the Crown was silent about differences of religion, so that Roman Catholics might take it without question. The clergy and seigneurs were thus restored to an acknowledged leadership in church and state. Those who wanted a parliarnent were distinctly told that ' It is at present inexpedient to call an Assembly,' and that a Council of from seven- teen to twenty-three members, all appointed by the Crown, would attend to local govern- ment and have power to levy taxes for roads and public buildings only. Lands held 'in free and common soccage ' were to be dealt with by the laws of England, as was all property which could be freely willed away. A possible establishment of the Church of England was provided for but never put in operation. In some ways the Act did, in other ways it did not, fulfil the objects of its framers. It was undoubtedly a generous concession to the leading French Canadians. It did help to keep Canada both British and Canadian. And it did open the way for what ought to have been a crushing attack on the American re- volutionary forces. But it was not, and",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON neither it nor any other Act could possibly have been, at that late hour, completely suc- cessful. It conciliated the seigneurs and the parochial clergy. But it did not, and it could not, also conciliate the lesser townsfolk and the habitants. For the last fourteen years the habitants had been gradually drifting away from their former habits of obedience and former obligations towards their leaders in church and state. The leaders had lost their old followers. The followers had found no new leaders of their own. Naturally enough, there was great satisfac- tion among the seigneurs and the clergy, with a general feeling among government sup- porters, both in England and Canada, that the best solution of a very refractory problem had been f ound at last. On the other hand, the Opposition in England, nearly every one in the American colonies, and the great majority of English-speaking people in New- foundland, the Maritime Provinces, and Canada itself were dead against the Act ; while the habitants, resenting the privileges already reaffirmed in favour of the seigneurs and clergy, and suspicious of further changes in the same unwelcome direction, were neutral at the best and hostile at the worst. 55",
         "56 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA The American colonists would have been angered in any case. But when they saw Canada proper made as unlike a ' fourteenth colony ' as could be, and when they also saw the gates of the coveted western lands closed against them by the same detested Act-the last of the 'five intolerable acts ' to which they most objected-their fury knew no bounds. They cursed the king, the pope, and the French Canadians with as much violence as any temporal or spiritual rulers had ever cursed heretics and rebels. The 'infamous and tyrannical ministry' in England was accused of ' contemptible subservience' to the' bloodthirsty, idolatrous, and hypocritical creed' of the French Canadians. To think that people whose religion had spread ' murder, persecution, and revolt throughout the world ' were to be entrenched along the St Lawrence was bad enough. But to see Crown protection given to the Indian lands which the Americans considered their own western ' birthright ' was infinitely worse. Was the king of England to steal the valley of the Mississippi in the same way as the king of France ? It is easy to be wise after the event and hard to follow any counsel of perfection. But it must always be a subject of keen, if unavail-",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON ing, regret that the French Canadians were not guaranteed their own way of life, within the limits of the modern province of Quebec, immediately after the capitulation of Montreal in 1760. They would then have entered the British Empire, as a whole people, on terms which they must all have understood to be exceedingly generous from any conquering power, and which they would have soon found out to be far better than anything they had experienced under the government of France. In return for such unexampled generosity they might have become convinced defenders of the only flag in the world under which they could possibly live as French Canadians. Their relations to each other, to the rest of a changing Canada, and to the Empire would have followed the natural course of political evolution, with the burning questions of language, laws, and religion safely removed from general controversy in after years. The rights of the English-speaking minority could, of course, have been still better safeguarded under this system than under the distracting series of half-measures which took its place. There should have been no question of a parliament in the immediate future. Then, with the peopling of Ontario by the United 57",
         "58 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Empire Loyalists and the growth of the Mari- time Provinces on the other side, Quebec could have entered Carleton's proposed Con- federation in the nineties to her own and every one else's best advantage. On the other hand, the delay of fourteen years after the Capitulation of 1760 and the unwarrantable extension of the provincial boundaries were cardinal errors of the most disastrous kind. The delay, filled with a futile attempt at mistaken Americanization, bred doubts and dissensions not only between the two races but between the different kinds of French Canadians. When the hour of trial came disintegration had already gone too far. The mistake about the boundaries was equally bad. The western wilds ought to have been administered by a lieutenant-governor under the supervision of a governor-general. Even leasing them for a short term of years to the Hudson's Bay Company would have been better than annexing them to a preposterous province of Quebec. The American colonists would have doubtless objected to either alternative. But both could have been de- fended on sound principles of administration ; while the sudden invasion of a new and in- flated Quebec into the colonial hinterlands was",
         "GOVERNOR CARLETON 59 little less than a declaration of war. The whole problem bristled with enormous diffi- culties, and the circumstances under which it had to be faced made an ideal solution im- possible. But an earlier Quebec Act, without its outrageous boundary clause, would have been well worth the risk of passing ; for the delay led many French Canadians to suppose, however falsely, that the Empire's need might always be their opportunity ; and this idea, however repugnant to their best minds and better feelings, has persisted among their extreme particularists until the present day.",
         "CHAPTER IV INVASION 1775 CARLETON'S first eight years as governor of Canada were almost entirely occupied with civil administration. The next four were equally occupied with war; so much so, in- deed, that the Quebec Act could not be put in force on the 1st of May 1775, as pro- vided for in the Act itself, but only bit by bit much later on. There was one short session of the new Legislative Council, which opened on the 17th of August. But all men's minds were even then turned towards the Mont- real frontier, whence the American invasion threatened to overspread the whole country and make this opening session the last that might ever be held. Most of the members were soon called away from the council- chamber to the field. No further session could be held either that year or the next ; and Carleton was obliged to nominate the 60",
         "INVASION 61 judges himself. The fifteen years of peace were over, and Canada had once more be- come an object of contention between two fiercely hostile forces. The War of the American Revolution was a long and exceedingly complicated struggle; and its many varied fortunes naturally had a profound effect on those of Canada. But Canada was directly engaged in no more than the first three campaigns, when the Americans invaded her in 1775 and '76, and when the British used her as the base from which to invade the new American Republic in 1777. These first three campaigns formed a purely civil war within the British Empire. On each side stood three parties. Opponents were ranged against each other in the mother country, in the Thirteen Colonies, and in Canada. In the mother country the king and his party government were ranged against the Opposition and all who held radical or revolu- tionary views. Here the strife was merely political. But in the Thirteen Colonies the forces of the Crown were ranged against the forces of the new Continental Congress. The small minority of colonists who were after- wards known as the United Empire Loyalists",
         "62 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA sided with the Crown. A majority sided with the Congress. The rest kept as selfishly neutral as they could. Among the English-speaking civilians in Canada, many of whom were now of a much better class than the original camp- f ollowers, the active loyalists comprised only the smaller half. The larger half sided with the Americans, as was only natural, seeing that most of them were immigrants from the Thirteen Colonies. But by no means all these sympathizers were ready for a fight. Among the French Canadians the loyalists included very few besides the seigneurs, the clergy, and a handful of educated people in Montreal, Three Rivers, and Quebec. The mass of the habitants were more or less neutral. But many of them were anti-British at first, while most of them were anti-American afterwards. Events moved quickly in 1775. On the i9th of April the' shot heard round the world ' was fired at Lexington in Massachusetts. On the 1st of May, the day appointed for the inauguration of the Quebec Act, the statue of the king in Montreal was grossly defaced and hung with a cross, a necklace of potatoes, and a placard bearing the inscription, Here 's",
         "the Canadian Pope and English Fool-Voilà le Pape du Canada et le sot Anglais. Large rewards were offered for the detection of the culprits; but without avail. Excitement ran high and many an argument ended with a bloody nose. Meanwhile three Americans were plotting an attack along the old line of Lake Cham- plain. Two of them were outlaws from the colony of New York, which was then dis- puting with the neighbouring colony of New Hampshire the possession of the lawless region in which all three had taken refuge and which afterwards became Vermont. Ethan Allen, the gigantic leader of the wild Green Mountain Boys, had a price on his head. Seth Warner, his assistant, was an outlaw of a somewhat humbler kind. Eenedict Arnold, the third invader, came from Con- necticut. He was a horse-dealer carrying on business with Quebec and Montreal as well as the West Indies. He was just thirty- four ; an excellent rider, a dead shot, a very fair sailor, and captain of a crack militia company. Immediately after the affair at Lexington he had turned out his company, reinforced by undergraduates from Yale, had seized the New Haven powder magazine and INVASION 63",
         "64 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA marched over to Cambridge, where the Massa- chusetts Committeemen took such a fancy to him that they made him a colonel on the spot, with f ull authority to raise men for an im- mediate attack on Ticonderoga. The oppor- tunity seemed too good to be lost; though the Continental Congress was not then in favour of attacking Canada, as its members hoped to see the Canadians throw off the yoke of empire on their own account. The British posts on Lake Champlain were absurdly undermanned. Ticonderoga contained two hundred cannon, but only forty men, none of whom expected an attack. Crown Point had only a sergeant and a dozen men to watch its hundred and thirteen pieces. Fort George, at the head of Lake George, was no better off ; and nothing more had been done to man the fortifications at St Johns on the Richelieu, where there was an excellent sloop as well as many cannon in charge of the tisual sergeant's guard. This want of preparation was no fault of Carleton's. He had frequently re- ported home on the need of more men. Now he had less than a thousand regulars to defend the whole country : and not another man was to arrive till the spring of next year. When Gage was hard pressed for reinforcements at",
         "A. Sault-au-Matelot barricade, where Arnold's force was defeated, 31st December 1775. 8. Près-de-Ville barricade, where Montgomery's force was defeated, 31st Decenber 1775. C. Suburb of the Palais, occupied by the Americans. D. Suburb of St Rach, occupied by the Americans. E. American lines and batteries during the siege. 1. Palace Gate. 8. La Glacière Bastion. 15. Bishop's Palace. 2. St John's Gate. 9. Cape Diamond Bastion. 16. The Jesuits. 3. St Louiss Gate. 10. Fort St Louis. 17. The Ursulines. 4. Potasse Bastion. 11. The Parish Church. 18. The Recollets. 5. St John's Bastion. 12. The Seminary. 19. Royal Battery. 6. St Ursula Bastion. 13. Church of the Lower Town. 7. St Louis's Bastion. 14. Hotel Dieu. Bartholornew, Edin'",
         "INVASION Boston in the autumn of 1774 Carleton had immediately sent him two excellent battalions that could ill be spared from Canada. But when Carleton himself made a similar request, in the autumn of 1775, Admiral Graves, to his lasting dishonour, refused to sail up to Quebec so late as October. The first moves of the three Americans smacked strongly of a well-staged extrava- ganza in which the smart Yankees never failed to score off the dunderheaded British. The Green Mountain Boys assembled on the east side of the lake. Spies walked in and out of Ticonderoga, exactly opposite, and reported to Ethan Allen that the commandant and his whole garrison of forty unsuspecting men would make an easy prey. Allen then sent eighty men down to Skenesborough (now Whitehall) at the southern end of the lake, to take the tiny post there and bring back boats for the crossing on the ioth of May. Then Arnold turned up with his colonel's commission, but without the four hundred men it authorized him to raise. Allen, how- ever, had made himself a colonel too, with Warner as his second-in-command. So there were no less than three colonels for two hun- dred and thirty men. Arnold claimed the y. B.C. E 65",
         "66 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA command by virtue of his Massachusetts com- mission. But the Green Mountain Boys de- clared they would follow no colonels but their own; and so Arnold, after being threatened with arrest, was appointed something like chief of the staff, on the understanding that he would make himself generally useful with the boats. This appointment was made at dawn on the ioth of May, just as the first eighty men were advancing to the attack after crossing over under cover of night. The British sentry's musket missed fire; where- upon he and the guard were rushed, while the rest of the garrison were surprised in their beds. Ethan Allen, who knew the fort thor- oughly, hammered on the commandant's door and summoned him to surrender ' In the name of the Great Jehovah and the Continental Congress ! ' The astonished commandant, seeing that resistance was impossible, put on his dressing-gown and paraded his disarmed garrison as prisoners of war. Seth Warner presently arrived with the rest of Allen's men and soon became the hero of Crown Point, which he took with the whole of its thirteen men and a hundred and thirteen cannon. Then Arnold had his own turn, in command of an expedition against the sergeant's guard,",
         "cannon, stores, fort, and sloop at St Johns on the Richelieu, all of which he captured in the same absurdly simple way. When he came sailing back the three victorious com- manders paraded all their men and fired off many straggling fusillades of joy. In the meantime the Continental Congress at Phila- delphia, with a delightful touch of unconscious humour, was gravely debating the following resolution, which was passed on the ist of June: That no Expedition or Incursion ought to be undertaken or made, by any Colony or body of Colonists, against or into Canada. The same Congress, however, found reasons enough for changing its mind before the month of May was out. The British forces in Canada had already begun to move towards the threat- ened frontier. They had occupied and strength- ened St Johns. And the Americans were be- ginning to fear lest the command of Lake Champlain might again fall into British hands. On the 27th of May the Congress closed the phase of individual raids and inaugurated the phase of regular invasion by commissioning General Schuyler to ' pursue any measures in Canada that may have a tendency to promote the peace and security of these Colonies.' Philip Schuyler was a distin- INVASION 67",
         "68 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA guished member of the family whose head had formulated the ' Glorious Enterprize' of con- quering New France in 1689.1 So it was quite in line with the family tradition for him to be under orders to ' take possession of St Johns, Montreal, and any other parts of the country,' provided always, adds the cautious Congress, that ' General Schuyler finds it practicable, and that it will not be disagree- able to the Canadians.' A few days later Arnold was trying to get a colonelcy from the Convention of New York, whose members just then happened to be thinking of giving commissions to his rivals, the leaders of the Green Mountain Boys, while, to make the complication quite complete, these Boys themselves had every intention of electing officers on their own account. In the meantime Connecticut, determined not to be forestalled by either friend or foe, ordered a thousand men to Ticonderoga and commis- sioned a general called Wooster to command them. Thus early were sown the seeds of those dissensions between Congress troops and Colony troops which nearly drove Washington mad. Schuyler reached Ticonderoga ii mid-July 1 See, in this Series, The Fighting Gouernor.",
         "and assumed his position as Congressional commander-in-chief. Unfortunately for the good of the service he had only a f ew hundred men with him; so Wooster, who had a thousand, thought himself the bigger general of the two. The Connecticut men followed Wooster's lead by jeering at Schuyler's men from New York; while the Vermonters added to the confusion by electing Seth Warner instead of Ethan Allen. In mid-August a second Congressional general arrived, making three generals and half a dozen colonels for less than fifteen hundred troops. This third general was Richard Montgomery, an ardent rebel of thirty-eight, who had been a captain in the British Army. He had sold his com- mission, bought an estate on the Hudson, and married a daughter of the Livingstons. The Livingstons headed the Anglo-American revolutionists in the colony of New York as the Schuylers headed the Knickerbocker Dutch. One of them was very active on the rebel side in Montreal and was soon to take the field at the head of the American ' patriots ' in Canada. Montgomery was brother to the Captain Montgomery of the 43rd who was the only British officer to disgrace himself during Wolfe's Quebec campaign, which he did by INVASION 69",
         "70 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA murdering his French-Canadian prisoners at Château Richer because they had fought disguised as Indians.1 Richard Montgomery was a much better man than his savage brother; though, as the sequel proves, he was by no means the perfect hero his Ameri- can admirers would have the world believe. His great value at Ticonderoga was his pro- fessional knowledge and his ardour in the cause he had espoused. His presence ' changed the spirit of the camp.' It sadly needed change. ' Such a set of pusillanimous wretches never were collected ' is his own description in a despairing letter to his wife. The ' army,' in fact, was all parts and no whole, and all the parts were mere untrained militia. More- over, the spirit of the ' tuwn meeting' ruled the camp. Even a battery could not be moved without consulting a council of war. Schuyler, though far more phlegmatic than Montgomery, agreed with him heartily about this and many other exasperating points. ' If Job had been a general in my situation, his memory had not been so famous for patience.' Worn out by his worries, Schuyler fell ill and was sent to command the base at Albany. Montgomery then succeeded to the command 1 See The Passing of New France, p. 118.",
         "INVASION 71 of the force destined for the front. The plan of invasion approved by Washington was, first, to sweep the line of the Richelieu by taking St Johns and Chambly, then to take Montreal, next to secure the Une of the St Lawrence, and finally to besiege Quebec. Montgomery's forces were to carry out all the preliminary parts alone. But Arnold was to join him at Quebec after advancing across country from the Kennebec to the Chaudière with a flying column of Virginians and New Englanders. Carleton opened the melancholy little session of the new Legislative Council at Quebec on the very day Montgomery arrived at Ticonderoga-the 17th of August. When he closed it, to take up the defence of Canada, the prospect was already black enough, though it grew blacker still as time went on. Im- mediately on hearing the news of Ticonderoga, Crown Point, and St Johns at the end of May he had sent every available man from Quebec to Montreal, whence Colonel Templer had already sent off a hundred and forty men to St Johns, while calling for volunteers to follow. The seigneurial class came forward at once. But all attempts to turn out the",
         "72 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA militia en masse proved utterly futile. Four- teen years of kindly British rule had loosened the old French bonds of government and the habitants were no longer united as part of one people with the seigneurs and the clergy. The rebels had been busy spreading insidious perversions of the belated Quebec Act, poison- ing the minds of the habitants against the British government, and filling their imagina- tions with all sorts of terrifying doubts. The habitants were ignorant, credulous, and sus- picious to the last degree. The most absurd stories obtained ready credence and ran like wildfire through the province. Seven thou- sand Russians were saîd to be coming up the St Lawrence - whether as friends or foes mattered nothing compared with the awful fact that they were all outlandish bogeys. Carleton was said to have a plan for burning alive every habitant he could lay his hands on. Montgomery's thousand were said to be five thousand, with many more to follow. And later on, when Arnold's men came up the Kennebec, it was satisfactorily explained to rnost of the habitants that it was no good resisting dead-shot riflemen who were bullet- proof themselves. Carleton issued proclama- tions. The seigneurs waved their swords.",
         "INVASION 73 The clergy thundered from their pulpits. But all in vain. Two months after the American exploits on Lake Champlain Carleton gave a guinea to the sentry mounted in his honour by the local militia colonel, M. de Tonnancour, because this man was the first genuine habi- tant he had yet seen armed in the whole district of Three Rivers. What must Carleton have felt when the home government author- ized him to raise six thousand of His Majesty's loyal French-Canadian subjects for immediate servi.ce and informed him that the arms and equipment for the first three thousand were already on the way to Canada! Seven years earlier it might still have been possible to raise French-Canadian counterparts of those Highland regiments which Wolfe had recom- mended and Pitt had so cordially approved. Carleton himself had recommended this ex- cellent scheme at the proper time. But, though the home government even then agreed with him, they thought such a measure would raise more parliamentary and public clamour than they could safely face. The chance once lost was lost for ever. Carleton had done what he could to keep the enemy at arm's length from Montreal by putting every available man into Chambly",
         "74 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA and St Johns. He knew nothing of Arnold's force till it actually reached Quebec in November. Quebec was thought secure for the time being, and so was left with a handful of men under Cramahé. Montreal had a few regulars and a hundred ' Royal Emigrants,' mostly old Highlanders who had settled along the New York frontier after the Conquest. For the rest, it had many American and a few British sympathizers ready to fly at each others' throats and a good many neutrals ready to curry ·favour with the winners. Sorel was a mere post without any effective garrison. Chambly was held by only eighty men under Major Stopford. But its strong stone fort was well armed and quite proof against anything except siege artillery; while its little garrison consisted of good regulars who were well provisioned for a siege. The mass of Carleton's little force was at St Johns under Major Preston, who had 500 men of the 7th and 26th (Royal Fusiliers and Camer- onians), 8o gunners, and i2o volunteers, rnostly French-Canadian gentlemen. Preston was an excellent officer, and his seven hun- dred men were able to give a very good account of themselves as soldiers. But the fort was not nearly so strong as the one at",
         "INVASION 75 Chambly; it had no natural advantages of position; and it was short of both stores and provisions. The three successive steps for Montgomery to take were St Johns, Chambly, and Montreal. But the natural order of events was completely upset by that headstrong Yankee, Ethan Allen, who would have his private war at Montreal, and by that contemptible British officer, Major Stopford, who would not defend Chambly. Montgomery laid siege to St Johns on the 18th of September, but made no sub- stantial progress for more than a month. He probably had no use for Allen at anything like a regular siege. So Allen and a Major Brown went on to ' preach politicks ' and concert a rising with men like Livingston and Walker. Livingston, as we have seen already, belonged to a leading New York family which was very active in the rebel cause; and Livingston, Walker, Allen, and Brown would have made a dangerous anti-British combination if they could only have worked together. But they could not. Livingston hurried off to join Montgomery with four hundred ' patriots' who served their cause fairly well till the in- vasion was over. Walker had no military qualities whatever. So Allen and Brown were",
         "76 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA left to their own disunited devices. Montreal seemed an easy prey. It had plenty of rebel sympathizers. Nearly all the surrounding habitants were either neutrals or inclined to side with the Americans, though not as fight- ing men. Carleton's order to bring in all the ladders, so as to prevent an escalade of the walls, had met with general opposition and evasion. Nothing seemed wanting but a good working plan. Brown, or possibly Allen himself, then hit upon the idea of treating Montreal very much as Allen had treated Ticonderoga. In any case Allen jumped at it. He jumped so far, indeed, that he forestalled Brown, who failed to appear at the critical moment. Thus, on the 24th of September, Allen found himself alone at Long Point with a hundred and twenty men in face of three times as· many under the redoubtable Major Carden, a skilied veteran who had won Wolfe's admiration years before. Carden's force included thirty regulars, two hundred and forty militiamen, and some Indians, probably not over a hundred strong. The militia were mostly of the seigneurial class with a following of habitants and townsmen of both French and British blood. Carden broke Allen's flanks,",
         "rounded up his centre, and won the little action easily, though at the expense of his own most useful life. Allen was very in- dignant at being handcuffed and marched off like a common prisoner after having made himself a colonel twice over. But Carleton had no respect for self-commissioned officers and had no soldiers to spare for guarding dangerous rebels. So he shipped Allen off to England, where that eccentric warrior was confined in Pendennis Castle near Falmouth in Cornwall. This affair, small as it was, revived British hopes in Montreal and induced a few more militiamen and Indians to corne forward. But within a month more was lost at Chambly than had been gained at Montreal. On the i8th of October a small Anerican detachment attacked Chambly with two littie field-guns and induced it to surrender on the 2oth. If ever an officer deserved to be shot it was Major Stopford, who tamely surrendered his well-armed and well-provided fort to an in- significant force, after a flimsy resistance of only thirty-six hours, without even taking the trouble to throw his stores into the river that flowed beside his strong stone walls. The news of this disgraceful surrender, diligently INVASION 77",
         "78 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA spread by rebel sympathizers, frightened the Indians away from St Johns, thus depriving Major Preston, the commandant, of his best couriers at the very worst time. But the evil did not stop there ; for nearly all the few French-Canadian militiamen whom the more distant seigneurs had been able to get under arms deserted en masse, with many threats against any one who should try to tura them out again. Chambly is only a short day's march fron Montreal to the west and St Johns to the south; so its capture rneant that St Johns was entirely cut off from the Richelieu to the north and dangerously exposed to being cut off from Montreal as well. Its ample stores and munitions of war were a priceless boon to Montgomery, who now redoubled his efforts to take St Johns. But Preston held out bravely for the remainder of the month, while Carleton did his best to help him. A fort- night earlier Carleton had arrested that fire- brand, Walker, who had previously refused to leave the country, though Carleton had given him the chance of doing so. Mrs Walker, as much a rebel as her husband, interviewed Carleton and noted in her diary that he ' said many severe Things in very",
         "INVASION 79 soft \u0026 Polite Termes.' Carleton was firm. Walker's actions, words, and correspondence all proved him a dangerous rebel whom no governor could possibly leave at large without breaking his oath of office. Walker, who had himself caused so many outrageous arrests, now not only resisted the legal arrest of his own person, but fired on the little party of soldiers who had been sent to bring him into Montreal. The soldiers then began to burn him out; whereupon he carried his wife to a window from which the soldiers rescued her. He then surrendered and was brought into Montreal, where the sight of him as a prisoner made a considerable impression on the waverers. A few hundred neighbouring militiamen were scraped together. Every one of the handful of regulars who could be spared was turned out. And Carleton set off to the relief of St Johns. But Seth Warner's Green Mountain Boys, reinforced by many more sharpshooters, prevented Carleton from land- ing at Longueuil, opposite Montreal. The remaining Indians began to slink away. The French-Canadian militiamen deserted fast- ' thirty or forty of a night.' There were not two hundred regulars available for a march",
         "8o THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA across country. And on the 3Oth Carleton was forced to give up in despair. Within the week St Johns surrendered with 688 men, who were taken south as prisoners of war. Preston had been completely cut off and threatened with starvation as well. So when he de- stroyed everything likely to be needed by the enemy he had done all that could be expected of a brave and capable commander. It was the 3rd of November when St Johns surrendered. Ten days later Montgomery occupied Montreal and Arnold landed at Wolfe's Cove just above Quebec. The race for the possession of Quebec had been a very close one. The race for the capture of Carleton was to be closer still. And on the fate of either depended the immediate, and perhaps the ultimate, fate of Canada. The race for Quebec had been none the less desperate because the British had not known of the danger from the south till after Arnold had suddenly emerged from the wilds of Maine and was well on his way to the mouth of the Chaudière, which falls into the St Lawrence seven miles above the city. Arnold's sub- sequent change of sides earned him the execra- tion of the Americans. But there can be no doubt whatever that if he had got through in",
         "INVASION 81 time to capture Quebec he would have become a national hero of the United States. He had the advantage of leading picked men; though nearly three hundred faint-hearts did turn back half-way. But, even with picked men, his feat was one of surpassing excellence. His force went in eleven hundred strong. It came out, reduced by desertion as well as by almost incredible hardships, with barely seven hundred. It began its toilsome ascent of the Kennebec towards the end of September, carrying six weeks' supplies in the bad, hastily built boats or on the men's backs. Daniel Morgan and his Virginian riflemen led the way. Aaron Burr was present as a young volunteer. The portages were many and try- ing. The settlements were few at first and then wanting altogether. Early in October the drenched portagers were already sleeping in their frozen clothes. The boats began to break up. Quantities of provisions were lost. Soon there was scarcely anything left but flour and salt pork. It took nearly a fortnight to get past the Great Carrying Place, in sight of Mount Bigelow. Rock, bog, and freezing slime told on the men, some of whom began to fall sick. Then came the chain of ponds leading into Dead River. Then the last climb F.B.C. F",
         "82 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA up to the height-of-land beyond which lay the headwaters of the Chaudière, which takes its rise in Lake Megantic. There were sixty miles to go beyond the lake, and a badly broken sixty miles they were, before the first settlement of French Canadians could be reached. There was no trail. Provisions were almost at an end. Sickness increased. The sick began to die. ' And what was it all for ? A chance to get killed ! The end of the march was Quebec -impregnable ! ' On the 24th of October Arnold, with fifteen other men, began ' a race against time, a race against starvation ' by pushing on ahead in a desperate effort to find food. Within a week he had reached the first settlement, after losing three of his five boats with everything in them. Three days later, and not one day too soon, the French Cana- dians met his seven hundred famishing men with a drove of cattle and plenty of provisions. The rest of the way was toilsome enough. But it seemed easy by comparison. The habitants were friendly, but very shy about enlisting, in spite of Washington's invitation to ' range yourselves under the standard of general liberty.' The Indians were more re- sponsive, and nearly fifty joined on their own",
         "terms. By the 8th of November Arnold was marching down the south shore of the St Lawrence, from the Chaudière to Point Levis, in full view of Quebec. He had just received a dispatch ten days old from Montgomery by which he learned that St Johns was ex- pected to fall immediately and that Schuyler was no longer with the army at the front. But he could not tell when the junction of forces would be made ; and he saw at once that Quebec was on the alert because every boat had been either destroyed or taken over to the other side. The spring and summer had been anxious times enough in Quebec. But the autumn was a great deal worse. Bad news kept com- ing down from Montreal. The disaffected got more and more restless and began ' to act as though no opposition might be shown the rebel forces.' And in October it did seem as if nothing could be done to stop the invaders. There were only a few hundred militiamen that could be depended on. The regulars, under Colonel Maclean, had gone up to help Carleton on the Montreal frontier. The fortifications were in no state to stand a siege. But Cramahé was full of steadfast energy. He had mustered the French - Canadian militia on INVASION 83",
         "84 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA September ii, the very day Arnold was leav- ing Cambridge in Massachusetts for his daring march against Quebec. These men had an- swered the call far better in the city of Quebec than anywhere else. There was also a larger proportion of English-speaking loyalists here than in Montreal. But no transports brought troops up the St Lawrence from Boston or the mother country, and no ves3el brought Carleton down. The loyalists were, however, encouraged by the presence of two small men-of-war, one of which, the Hunter, had been the guide-ship for Wolfe's boat the night before the Battle of the Plains. Some minor reinforcements also kept arriving : veterans from the border settlements and a hundred and fifty men from Newfoundland. On the 3rd of November, the day St Johns sur- rendered to Montgomery, an intercepted dis- patch had warned Cramahé of Arnold's ap- proach and led him to seize all the boats on the south shore opposite Quebec. This was by no means his first precaution. He had sent some men forty miles up the Chaudière as soon as the news of the raids on Lake Cham- plain and St Johns had arrived at the end of May. Thus, though neither of them had anticipated such a bolt from the blue, both",
         "INVASION 85 Carleton and Cramahé had taken all the reasonable means within their most restricted power to provide against unforeseen con- tingencies. Arnold's chance of surprising Quebec had been lost ten days before he was able to cross the St Lawrence; and when the habitants on the south shore were helping his men to make scaling-ladders the British garrison on the north had already become too strong for him. But he was indefatigable in collecting boats and canoes at the mouth of the Chaudière, and at other points higher up than Cramahé's men had reached when on their mission of destruction or removal, and he was as capable as ever when, on the pitch-black night of the 13th, he led his little flotilla through the gap between the two British men-of-war, the Hunter and the Lizard. The next day he marched across the Plains of Abraham and saluted Quebec with three cheers. But mean- while Colonel Maclean, who had set out to help Carleton at Montreal and turned back on hearing the news of St Johns, had slipped into Quebec on the I2th. So Arnold found him- self with less than seven hundred effectives against the eleven hundred British who were now behind the walls. After vainly summon-",
         "86 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ing the city to surrender he retired to Pointe- aux-Trembles, more than twenty miles up the north shore of the St Lawrence, there to await the arrival of the victorious Montgomery. Meanwhile Montgomery was racing for Carleton and Carleton was racing for Quebec. Montgomery's advance-guard had hurried on to Sorel, at the mouth of the Richelieu, forty- five miles below Montreal, to mount guns that would command the narrow channel through which the fugitive governor would have to pass on his way to Quebec. They had ample time to set the trap ; for an incessant nor'- easter blew up the St Lawrence day after day and held Carleton fast in Montreal, while, only a league away, Montgomery's main body was preparing to cross over. Escape by land was impossible, as the Americans held Berthier, on the north shore, and had won over the habitants, all the way down from Montreal, on both sides of the river. At last, on the afternoon of the i1th, the wind shifted. Im- mediately a single cannon-shot was fired, a bugle sounded the fall in ! and ' the whole military establishment' of Montreal formed up in the barrack square-one hundred and thirty officers and men, all told. Carleton,",
         "' wrung to the soul,' as one of his officers wrote home, came on parade ' firm, unshaken, and serene.' The little column then marched down to the boats through shuttered streets of timid neutrals and scowling rebels. The few loyalists who came to say good-bye to Carleton at the wharf might well have thought it was the last handshake they would ever get from a British 'Captain-General and Governor-in- chief ' as they saw him step aboard in the dreary dusk of that November afternoon. And if he and they had known the worst they might well have thought their fate was sealed; for neither of them then knew that both sides of the St Lawrence were occupied in force at two different places on the perilous way to Quebec. The little flotilla of eleven vessels got safely down to within a few miles of Sorel, when one grounded and delayed the rest till the wind failed altogether at noon on the i2th. The next three days it blew upstream without a break. No progress could be made as there was no room to tack in the narrow passages opposite Sorel. On the third day an American floating battery suddenly appeared, firing hard. Behind it came a boat with a flag of truce and the f ollowing summons from Colonel INVASION 87",
         "88 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Easton, who commanded Montgomery's ad- vance-guard at Sorel: SIR,-By this you will learn that General Montgomery is in Possession of the Fortress Montreal. You are very sensible that I am in Possession at this Place, and that, from the strength of the United Colonies on both sides your own situation is Rendered Very disagreeable. I am there- fore induced to make you the following Proposal, viz. :-That if you will Resign your Fleet to me Immediately, without destroying the Effects on Board, You and Your men shall be used with due civility, together with women \u0026 Children on Board. To this I shall expect Your direct and Immediate answer. Should you Neglect You will Cherefully take the Consequences which will follow. Carleton was surprised : and well he might be. He had not supposed that Montgomery's men were in any such connanding position. But, like Cramahé at Quebec, he refused to answer ; whereupon Easton's batteries opened both from the south shore and from Isle St Ignace. Carleton's heaviest gun was a 9- pounder; while Easton had four zz-pounders,",
         "INVASION one of them mounted on a rowing battery that soon forced the British to retreat. The skipper of the schooner containing the powder magazine wanted to surrender on the spot, especially when he heard that the Americans were getting some hot shot ready for him. But Carleton retreated upstream, twelve miles above Sorel, to Lavaltrie, just above Berthier on the north shore, where, on attempt- ing to land, he was driven back by some Americans and habitants. Next morning, the 16th, a fateful day for Canada, the same Major Brown who had failed Ethan Allen at Montreal came up with a flag of truce to propose that Carleton should send an officer to see for himself how well all chance of escape had now been cut off. The offer was accepted; and Brown explained the situation from the rebel point of view. ' This is my small battery ; and, even if you should chance to escape, I have a grand battery at the mouth of the Sorel [Richelieu] which will infallibly sink all of your vessels. Wait a little till you see the 32-pounders that are now within half- a-mile.' There was a good deal of Yankee bluff in this warning, especially as the 32- pounders could not be mounted in time. But the British officer seemed perfectly satisfied 89",
         "90 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA that the way was completely blocked; and so the Americans felt sure that Carleton would surrender the following day. Carleton, however, was not the man to give in till the very last ; and one desperate chance still remained. His flotilla was doomed. But he might still get through alone without it. One of the French-Canadian skippers, better known as ' Le Tourt'e ' or ' Wild Pigeon ' than by his own name of Bouchette because of his wonderfully quick trips, was persuaded to make the dash for freedom. So Carleton, having ordered Prescott, his second-in-com- mand, not to surrender the flotilla before the last possible moment, arranged for his own escape in a whaleboat. It was with infinite precaution that he made his preparations, as the enemy, though confident of taking him, were still on the alert to prevent such a prize from slipping through their fingers. He dressed like a habitant from head to foot, putting on a tasselled bonnet rouge and an étoffe du pays (grey homespun) suit of clothes, with a red sash and bottes sauvages like Indian moccasins. Then the whaleboat was quietly brought alongside. The crew got in and plied their muffied oars noiselessly down to the narrow passage between Isle St Ignace and",
         "INVASION 91 the Isle du Pas, where they shipped the oars and leaned over the side to paddle past the nearest battery with the palms of their hands. It was a moment of breathless excitement; for the hope of Canada was in their keeping and no turning back was possible. But the American sentries saw no furtive French Canadians gliding through that dark Nov- ember night and heard no suspicious noises above the regular ripple of the eddying island current. One tense half-hour and all was over. The oars were run out again ; the men gave way with a will; and Three Rivers was safely reached in the morning. Here Carleton met Captain Napier, who took him aboard the armed ship Fell, in which he continued his journey to Quebec. He was practically safe aboard the Fell; for Arnold had neither an army strong enough to take Quebec nor any craft big enough to fight a ship. But the flotilla above Sorel was doomed. After throwing all its powder into the St Lawrence it surrendered on the i9th, the very day Carleton reached Quebec. The astonished Americans were furious when they found that Carleton had slipped through their fingers after all. They got Prescott, whom they hated ; and they released Walker, whom",
         "92 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Carleton was taking as a prisoner to Quebec. But no friends and foes like Walker and Prescott could make up for the loss of Carleton, who was the heart as well as the head of Canada at bay. The exultation of the British more than matched the disappointment of the Americans. Thomas Ainslie, collector of customs and captain of militia at Quebec, only expressed the feelings of all his fellow-loyalists when he made the following entry in the extremely accurate diary he kept throughout those troublous tirnes : ' On the i9th (a Happy Day for Quebec !), to the unspeakable joy of the friends of the Government, and to the utter Dismay of the abettors of Sedition and Rebellion, General Carleton arrived in the Fell, arm'd ship, ac- companied by an arm'd schooner. We saw our Salvation in his Presence.'",
         "CHAPTER V BELEAGUERMENT 1775-1776 WHEN Carleton finally turned at bay within the walls of Quebec the British flag waved over less than a single one out of the more than a million square miles that had so recently been included within the boundaries of Canada. The landward walis cut off the last half-mile of the tilted promontory which rises three hundred feet above the St Lawrence but only one hundred above the valley of the St Charles. This promontory is just a thou- sand yards wide where the landward walls run across it, and not much wider across the world-famous Heights and Plains of Abraham, which then covered the first two miles beyond. The whole position makes one of Nature's strongholds when the enemy can be kept at arm's length. But Carleton had no men to spare for more than the actual walls and the narrow little strip of the Lower Town between Ma",
         "94 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the base of the cliff and the St Lawrence. So the enemy closed in along the Heights and among the suburbs, besides occupying any point of vantage they chose across the St Lawrence or St Charles. The walls were by no means fit to stand a siege, a fact which Carleton had frequently reported. But, as the Americans had neither the men nor the material for a regular siege, they were obliged to confine themselves to a mere beleaguerment, with the chance of tak- ing Quebec by assault. One of Carleton's first acts was to proclaim that every able- bodied man refusing to bear arms was to leave the town within four days. But, though this had the desired effect of clearing out nearly all the dangerous rebels, the Americans still be- lieved they had enough sympathizers inside to turn the scale of victory if they could only manage to take the Lower Town, with all its commercial property and shipping, or gain a footing anywhere within the walls. There were five thousand souls left in Quebec, which was well provisioned for the winter. The women, children, and men unfit to bear arms numbered three thousand. The ' exempts' amounted to a hundred and eighty. As there was a growing suspicion",
         "BELEAGUERMENT 95 about many of these last, Carleton paraded them for medical examination at the beginning of March, when a good deal more than half were f ound quite fit for duty. These men had been malingering all winter in order to skulk out of danger; so he treated them with ex- treme leniency in only putting them on duty as a ' company of Invalids.' But the slur stuck fast. The only other exceptions to the general efficierncy were a very few instances of cowardice and many more of slackness. The militia order-books have repeated entries about men who turned up late for even im- portant duties as well as about others whose authorized substitutes were no better than themselves. But it should be remembered that, as a whole, the garrison did exceedingly good service and that all the malingerers and serious delinquents together did not amount to more than a tenth of its total, which is a small proportion for such a mixed body. The effective strength at the beginning of the siege was eighteen hundred of all ranks. Only one hundred of these belonged to the regular British garrison in Canada-a few staff-officers, twenty-two men of the Royal Artillery, and seventy men of the 7th Royal Fusiliers, a regiment which was to be com-",
         "96 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA manded in Quebec sixteen years later by Queen Victoria's father, the Duke of Kent. The Fusiliers and two hundred and thirty ' Royal Emigrants' were formed into a little battalion under Colonel Maclean, a first-rate officer and Carleton's right-hand man in action. 'His Majesty's Royal Highland Regiment of Emigrants,' which subsequently became the 84th Foot, now known as the 2nd York and Lancaster, was hastily raised in 1775 from the,,Highland veterans who had settled in the American colonies after the Peace of 1763. Maclean's two hundred and thirty were the first men he could get together in time to reach Quebec. The only other professional fighters were four hundred blue- jackets and thirty-five marines of H.M.SS. Lizard and Hunter, who were formed into a naval battalion under their own officers, Captains Hamilton and M'Kenzie, Hamilton being made a lieutenant-colonel and M'Kenzie a major while doing duty ashore. Fifty masters and mates of trading vessels were en- rolled in the same battalion. The whole of the shipping was laid up for the winter in the Cul de Sac, which alone made the Lower Town a prize worth taking. The ' British Militia' mustered three hundred and thirty,",
         "RICIIARD N.\\ONT UMI-.RY \\ t. e \u003elli .. l .ll (I îllectI T rnol'ulie 1.ihran-",
         "BELEAGUERMENT the' Canadian Militia ' five hundred and forty- three. These two corps included practically all the official and business classes in Quebec and formed nearly half the total combatants. Some of them took no pay and were not bound to service beyond the neighbourhood of Quebec, thus being very much like the Home Guards raised all over Canada and the rest of the Empire during the Great World War of 1914. All the militia wore dark green coats with buff waistcoats and breeches. The total of eighteen hundred was completed by a hundred and twenty ' artificers,' that is, men who would now belong to the Engineers, Ordnance, and Army Service Corps. As the composition of this garrison has been so often misrepresented, it may be as well to state distinctly that the past or present regulars of all kinds, soldiers and sailors together, numbered eight hundred and the militia and other non-regulars a thousand. The French Canadians, very few of whom were or had been regulars, formed less than a third of the whole. Montgomery and Arnold had about the same total number of men. Sometimes there were more, sometimes less. But what made the real difference, and what really turned the scale, was that the Americans had hardly F.B.C. G 97",
         "98 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA any regulars and that their effectives rarely averaged three-quarters of their total strength. The balance was also against them in the matter of armament. For, though Morgan's Virginians had many more rifles than were to be found among the British, the Americans in general were not so well off for bayonets and not so well able to use those they had ; while the artillery odds were still more against them. Carleton's artillery was not of the best. But it was better than that of the Ameri- cans. He decidedly overmatched them in the combined strength of all kinds of ordnance- cannons, carronades, howitzers, mortars, and swivels. Cannons and howitzers fired shot and shell at any range up to the limit then reached, between two and three miles. Car- ronades were on the principle of a gigantic shotgun, firing masses of bullets with great effect at very short ranges-less than that of a long musket-shot, then reckoned at two hundred yards. The biggest mortars threw 13-inch 224-lb shells to a great distance. But their main use was for high-angle fire, such as that from the suburb of St Roch under the walls of Quebec. Swivels were the smallest kind of ordnance, firing one-, two-, or three- pound balls at short or medium ranges. They",
         "BELEAGUERMENT 99 were used at convenient points to stop rushes, much like modern machine-guns. Thanks chiefly to Cramahé, the defences were not nearly so 'ruinous ' as Arnold at first had thought them. The walls, however useless against the best siege artillery, were formidable enough against irregular troops and makeshift batteries ; while the ware- houses and shipping in the Lower Town were protected by two stockades, one straight under Cape Diamond, the other at the corner where the Lower Town turns into the valley of the St Charles. The first was called the Près-de-Ville, the second the Sault-au-Matelot. The shipping was open to bombardment from the Levis shore. But the Americans had no guns to spare for this till April. Montgomery's advance was greatly aided by the little flotilla which Easton had cap- tured at Sorel. Montgomery met Arnold at Pointe - aux - Trembles, twenty miles above Quebec, on the 2nd of December and supplied his little half-clad force with the British uni- forms taken at St Johns and Chambly. He was greatly pleased with the magnificent physique of Arnold's men, the fittest of an originally well-picked lot. He still had some",
         "ioo THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA 'pusillanimous wretches ' among his own New Yorkers, who resented the air of superiority affected by Arnold's New Englanders and Morgan's Virginians. He felt a well-deserved confidence in Livingston and some of the English-speaking Canadian ' patriots ' whom Livingston had brought into his camp before St Johns in September. But he began to feel more and more doubtful about the French Canadians, most of whom began to feel more and more doubtful about themselves. On the 6th he arrived before Quebec and took up his quarters in Holland House, two miles beyond the walls, at the far end of the Plains of Abraham. The same day he sent Carleton the following summons: SIR,-Notwithstanding the personal ill- treatment I have received at your hands -notwithstanding your cruelty to the un- happy Prisoners you have taken, the feel- ings of humanity induce me to have re- course to this expedient to save you from the Destruction which hangs over you. Give me leave, Sir, to assure you that I am well acquainted with your situation. A great extent of works, in their nature incapable of defence, manned with a motley",
         "BELEAGUERMENT crew of sailors, the greatest part our friends; of citizens, who wish to see us within their walls, \u0026 a few of the worst troops who ever stiled themselves Soldiers. The impossibility of relief, and the certain prospect of wanting every necessary of life, should your opponents confine their opera- tions to a simple Blockade, point out the absurdity of resistance. Such is your situation! I arn at the head of troops accustomed to Success, confident of the righteousness of the cause they are en- gaged in, inured to danger, \u0026 so highly incensed at your inhumanity, illiberal abuse, and the ungenerous means employed to prejudice then in the mind of the Cana- dians that it is with difficulty I restrain them till my Batteries are ready from assaulting your works, which afford them a fair opportunity of ample vengeance and just retaliation. Firing upon a flag of truce, hitherto unprecedented, even among savages, prevents my taking the ordinary mode of communicating my sentiments. However, I will at any rate acquit my conscience. Should you persist in an un- warrantable defence, the consequences be upon your own head. Beware of destroy- 101",
         "102 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ing stores of any kind, Publick or Private, as you have done at Montreal and in Three Rivers-If you do, by Heaven, there will be no mercy shown. Though Montgomery wrote bunkum like the common politician of that and many a later age, he was really a brave soldier. What galled him into fury was ' grave Carleton's ' quiet refusal to recognize either him or any other rebel commander as the accredited leader of a hostile army. It certainly must have been exasperating for the general of the Continental Congress to be reduced to such expedients as tying a grandiloquent ultima- tum to an arrow and shooting it into the beleaguered town. The charge of firing on flags of truce was anot-her instance of ' talking for Buncombe.' Carleton never fired on any white flag. But he always sent the same answer: that he could hold no communication with any rebels unless they came to implore the king's pardon. This, of course, was an aggravation of his offensive calmness in the face of so much revolutionary rage. To in- dividual rebels of all sorts he was, if anything, over - indulgent. He would not burn the suburbs of Quebec till the enemy forced hinm",
         "BELEAGUERMENT to it, though many of the houses that gave the Americans the best cover belonged to rebel Canadians. He went out of his way to be kind to all prisoners, especially if sick or wounded. And it was entirely owing to his restraining influence that the friendly Indians had not raided the border settlements of New England during the summer. Nor was he animated only by the very natural desire of bringing back rebellious subjects to what he thought their true allegiance, as his sub- sequent actions amply proved. He simply acted with the calm dignity and impartial justice which his position required. Three days before Christmas the bombard- ment began in earnest. The non-combatants soon f ound, to their equal amazement and delight, that a good many shells did very little damage if fired about at random. But news intended to make their flesh creep came in at the same time, and probably had more effect than the shells on the weak-kneed members of the community. Seven hundred scaling- ladders, no quarter if Carleton persisted in holding out, and a prophecy attributed to Montgomery that he would eat his Christmas dinner either in Quebec or in Hell-these were some of the blood-curdling items that came 103",
         "104 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA in by petticoat or arrow post. One of the most active purveyors of all this bombast was Jerry Duggan, a Canadian ' patriot ' barber now become a Continental major. But there was a serious side. Deserters and prisoners, as well as British adherents who had escaped, all began to tell the same tale, though with many variations. Mont- gomery was evidently bent on storming the walls the first dark night. His own orders showed it. HEAD QUARTERS, HOLLAND Housa. Near Quebec, i5th Decr. 1775. The General having in vain offered the most favourable terms of accommodation to the Governor of Quebec, \u0026 having taken every possible step to prevail on the inhabitants to desist from seconding him in his wild scheme of defending the Town- for the speedy reduction of the only hold possessed by the Ministerial Troops in this Province- The soldiers, flushed with continual success, confident of the justice of their cause, \u0026 relying on that Providence which ias uniformly protected them, will advance with alacrity to the attack of works incapable of being de- fended by the wretched Garrison posted",
         "BELEAGUERMENT 105 behind them, consisting of Sailors unac- quainted with the use of arms, of Citizens incapable of Soldiers' duty, \u0026 of a few miserable Emigrants. The General is con- fident that a vigorous \u0026 spirited attack must be attended with success. The Troops shall have the effects of the Gover- nor, Garrison, \u0026 of such as have been active in misleading the Inhabitants \u0026 distressing the friends of liberty, equally divided among them, except the rooth share out of the whole, which shall be at the disposal of the General to be given to such soldiers as distinguished themselves by their activity \u0026 bravery, to be sold at public auction: the whole to be con- ducted as soon as the City is in our hands and the inhabitants disarmed. It was a week after these orders had been written before the first positive news of the threatened assault was brought into town by an escaped British prisoner who, strangely enough, bore the name of Wolfe. Wolfe's escape naturally caused a postponement of Montgomery's design and a further council of war. Unlike most councils of war this one was full of fight. Three feints were to be",
         "io6 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA made at different points while the real attack was to be driven home at Cape Diamond. But just after this decision had been reached two rebel Montrealers came down and, in another debate, carried the day for another plan. These men, Anteil and Price, were really responsible for the final plan, which, like its predecessor, did not meet with Mont- gomery's approval. Montgomery wanted to make a breach before trying the walls. But he was no more than the chairman of a com- mittee ; and this egregious committee first decided to storm the unbroken walls and then changed to an attack on the Lower Town only. Antell was Montgomery's engineer. Price was a red-hot agitator. Both were better at politics than soldiering. Their argument was that if the Lower Town could be taken the Quebec militia would force Carleton to sur- render in order to save the warehouses, shipping, and other valuable property along the waterfront, and that even if Carleton held out in debate he would soon be brought to his knees by the Americans, who would march through the gates, which were to be opened by the ' patriots ' inside. Another week passed; and Montgomery had not eaten his Christmas dinner either",
         "BELEAGUERMENT in Quebec or in the other place. But both sides knew the crisis must be fast approach- ing ; for the New Yorkers had sworn that they would not stay a minute later than the end of the year, when their term of enlistment was up. Thus every day that passed made an immediate assault more likely, as Mont- gomery had to strike before his own men left him. Yet New Year's Eve itself began without the sign of an alarm. Carleton had been sleeping in his clothes at the Récollets', night after night, so that he might be first on parade at the general rendezvous on the Place d'Armes, which stood near the top of Mountain Hill, the only road between the Upper and the Lower Town. Officers and men off duty had been following his example ; and every one was ready to turn out at a moment's notice. A north-easterly snowstorm was blowing furiously, straight up the St Lawrence, making Quebec a partiv seen blur to the nearest American patrois and the Heights of Abraham a wild sea of whirling drifts to the nearest British sentries. One o'clock passed, and nothing stirred. But when two o'clock struck at Holland House Montgomery rose and began to put the council's plan in operation. The 107",
         "2o8 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Lower Town was to be attacked at both ends. The Près-de-Ville barricade was to be carried by Montgomery and the Sault-au-Matelot by Arnold, while Livingston was to distract Carleton's attention as much as possible by making a feint against the landward walls, where the British still expected the real attack. Livingston's Canadian fighting ' patriots ' waded through the drifts, against the storm, -cross the Plains, and took post close in on the far side of Cape Diamond, only eighty yards from the same walls that were to have been stormed some days before. Jerry Duggan's parasitic Canadian ' patriots ' took post in the suburb of St John and thence round to Palace Gate. Montgomery led his own column straight to Wolfe's Cove, whence he marched in along the narrow path between the cliff and the St Lawrence till he reached the spot at the foot of Cape Diamond just under the right of Livingston's lne. Arnold, whose quarters were in the valley of the St Charles, took post in St Roch, with a mortar battery to fire against the walls and a column of men to storm the Sault - au - Matelot. Livingston's and Jerry Duggan's whole con- mand numbered about four hundred men, Montgomery's five hundred, Arnold's six.",
         "BELEAGUERMENT The opposing totals were fifteen hundred Americans against seventeen hundred British. There was considerable risk of confusion be- tween friend and foe, as most of the Americans, especially Arnold's men, wore captured British uniforms with nothing to distinguish them but odds and ends of their former kits and a sort of paper hatband bearing the inscription Liberty or Death. A little after four the sentries on the walls at Cape Diamond saw lights flashing about in front of them and were just going to call the guard when Captain Malcolm Fraser of the Royal Emigrants came by on his rounds and saw other lights being set out in regular order like lamps in a street. He instantly turned out the guards and pickets. The drums beat to arms. Every church bell in the city pealed forth its alarm into that wild night. The bugles blew. The men off duty swarmed on to the Place d'Armes, where Carleton, cain and intrepid as ever, took post with the general reserve and waited. There was nothing for him to do just yet. Everything that could have been foreseen had already been amply provided for ; and in his quiet confidence his followers found their own. Towards five o'clock two green rockets shot 109",
         "iio THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA up from Montgomery's position beside the Anse des Mères under Cape Diamond. This was the signal for attack. Montgomery's column immediately struggled on again along the path leading round the foot of the Cape towards the Près-de-Ville barricade. Living- ston's serious ' patriots ' on the top of the Cape changed their dropping shots into a hot fire against the walls ; while Jerry Duggan's little mob of would-be looters shouted and blazed away from safer cover in the suburbs of St John and St Roch. Arnold's mortars pitched shells all over the town; while his storming-party advanced towards the Sault- au - Matelot barricade. Carleton, naturally anxious about the landward walls, sent some of the British militia to reinforce the men at Cape Diamond, which, as he knew, Mont- gomery considered the best point of attack. The walls lower down did not seem to be in any danger from Jerry Duggan's ' patriots,' whose noisy demonstration was at once under- stood to be nothing but an empty feint. The walls facing the St Charles were well manned and well gunned by the naval battalion. Those facing the St Lawrence, though weak in thernselves, were practically impregnable, as the cliffs could not be scaled by any formed",
         "BELEAGUERMENT III body. The Lower Town, however, was by no means so safe, in spite of its two barricades. The general uproar was now so great that Carleton could not distinguish the firing there from what was going on elsewhere. But it was at these two points that the real attack was rapidly developing. The first decisive action took place at Près- de-Ville. The guard there consisted of fifty men-John Coffin, who was a merchant of Quebec, Sergeant Hugh M'Quarters of the Royal Artillery, Captain Barnsfair, a merchant skipper, with fifteen mates and skippers like himself, and thirty French Canadians under Captain Chabot and Lieutenant Picard. These fifty men had to guard a front of only as many feet. On their right Cape Diamond rose almost sheer. On their left raged the stormy St Lawrence. They had a tiny block- house next to the cliff and four small guns on the barricade, all double - charged with canister and grape. They had heard the dropping shots on the top of the Cape for nearly an hour and had been quick to notice the change to a regular hot fire. But they had no idea whether their own post was to be attacked or not till they suddenly saw the head of Montgomery's column halting within",
         "112 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA fifty paces of them. A man came forward cautiously and looked at the barricade. The storm was in his face. The defences were wreathed in whirling snow. And the men inside kept silent as the grave. When he went back a little group stood for a couple of minutes in hurried consultation. Then Mont- gomery waved his sword, called out ' Corne on, brave boys, Quebec is ours !' and led the charge. The defenders let the Americans get about half-way before Barnsfair shouted ' Fire ! ' Then the guns and muskets volleyed together, cutting down the whole front of the densely massed column. Montgomery, his two staff-officers, and his ten leading men were instantly killed. Some more farther back were wounded. And just as the fifty British fired their second round the rest of the five hundred Americans turned and ran in wild confusion. A few minutes later a man whose identity was never established came running from the Lower Town to say that Arnold's men had taken the Sault-au-Matelot barricade. If this was true it meant that the Près-de-Ville fifty would be caught between two fires. Some of them made as if to run back and reach Mountain Hill before the Americans could cut",
         "BELEAGUERMENT them off. But Coffin at once threatened to kill the first man to move ; and by the time an artillery officer had arrived with reinforce- ments perfect order had been restored. This officer, finding he was not wanted there, sent back to know where else he was to go, and re- ceived an answer telling him to hurry to the Sault-au-Matelot. When he arrived there, less than half a mile off, he found that desper- ate street fighting had been going on for over an hour. Arnold's advance had begun at the same time as Livingston's demonstration and Mont- gomery's attack. But his task was very different and the time required much longer. There were three obstacles to be overcome. First, his men had to run the gauntlet of the fire from the bluejackets ranged along the Grand Battery, which faced the St Charles at its mouth and overlooked the narrow little street of Sous-le-Cap at a height of fifty or sixty feet. Then they had to take the small advanced barricade, which stood a hundred yards on the St Charles side of the actual Sault-au-Matelot or Sailor's Leap, which is the north-easterly point of the Quebec promontory and nearly a hundred feet high. Finally, they had to round this point and attack the F. D.C. H 113",
         ",14 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA regular Sault - au - Matelot barricade. This second barricade was about a hundred yards long, from the rock to the river. It crossed Sault-au-Matelot Street and St Peter Street, which were the same then as now. But it ended on a wharf half-way down the modern St James Street, as the outer half of this street was then a natural strand completely covered at high tide. It was much closer than the Près- de-Ville barricade was to Mountain Hill, at the top of which Carleton held his general reserve ready in the Place d'Armes; and it was fairly strong in material and armament. But it was at first defended by only a hundied men. The American forlorn hope, under Captain Oswald, got past most of the Grand Battery unscathed. But by the time the main body was following under Morgan the British blue- jackets were firing down from the walls at less than point-blank range. The driving snow, the clumps of bushes on the cliff, and the little houses in the street below all gave the Americans some welcome cover. But many of them were hit ; while the gun they were towing through the drifts on a sleigh stuck fast and had to be abandoned. Captain Dearborn, the future commander-in-chief of the American army in the War of 1812, noted",
         "BELEAGUERMENT 115 in his diary that he 'met the wounded men very thick ' as he was bringing up the rear. When the forlorn hope reached the advanced barricade Arnold halted it till the supports had come up. The loss of the gun and the worrying his main body was receiving from the sailors along the Grand Battery spoilt his original plan of smashing in the barricade by shell fire while Morgan circled round its outer flank on the ice of the tidal flats and took it in rear. So he decided on a frontal attack. When he thought he had a fair chance he stepped to the front and shouted, ' Now, boys, all together, rush ! ' But before he could climb the barricade he was shot through the leg. For some time he propped himself up against a house and, leaning on his rifle, con- tinued encouraging his men, who were soon firing through the port-holes as well as over the top. But presently growing faint from loss of blood he had to be carried off the field to the General Hospital on the banks of the St Charles. The men now called out for a lead from Morgan, who climbed a ladder, leaped the top, and fell under a gun inside. In another minute the whole forlorn hope had followed him, while the main body came close behind.",
         "116 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA The guard, not strong in numbers and weak in being composed of young militiamen, gave way but kept on -firing. 'Down with your arms if you want quarter ! ' yelled Morgan, whose men were in overwhelming strength ; and the guard surrendered. A little way beyond, just under the bluff of the Sault-au- Matelot, the British supports, many of whom were Seminary students, also surrendered to Morgan, who at once pressed on, round the corner of the Sault-au-Matelot, and halted in sight of the second or regular barricade. What was to be done now ? Where was Montgomery ? How strong was the barri- cade; and had it been reinforced ? It could not be turned because the cliff rose sheer on one flank while the icy St Lawrence lashed the other. Had Morgan known that there were only a hundred men behind it when he attacked its advanced barricade he might have pressed on at all costs and carried it by assault. But it looked strong, there were guns on its platforms, and it ran across two streets. His hurried council of war over-ruled him, as Montgomery's council had over-ruled the original plan of storming the walls; and so his men began a desultory fight in the streets and from the houses.",
         "BELEAGUERMENT This was fatal to American success. The original British hundred were rapidly rein- forced. The artillery officer who had found that he was not needed at the Près-de-Ville after Montgomery's defeat, and who had hurried across the intervening half-mile, now occupied the corner houses, enlarged the em- brasures, and trained his guns on the houses occupied by the enemy. Detachments of Fusiliers and Royal Emigrants also arrived, as did the thirty-five masters and mates of merchant vessels who were not on guard with Barnsfair at the Près-de-Ville. Thus, what with soldiers, sailors, and militiamen of both races, the main Sault-au-Matelot barricade was made secure against being rushed like the outer one. But there was plenty of fighting, with some confusion at close quarters caused by the British uniforms which both sides were wearing. A Herculean sailor seized the first ladder the Americans set against the barricade, hauled it up, and set it against the window of a house out of the far end of which the enemy were firing. Major Nairne and Lieutenant Dambourges of the Royal Emigrants at once climbed in at the head of a storming-party and wild work followed with the bayonet. Al the Americans inside were either killed or 117",
         "118 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA captured. Meanwhile a vigorous British nine- pounder had been turned on another house they occupied. This house was likewise battered in, so that its surviving occupants had to run into the street, where they were well plied with musketry by the regulars and militiamen. The chance for a sortie then seeming favourable, Lieutenant Anderson of the Navy headed his thirty-five merchant mates and skippers in a rush along Sault-au- Matelot Street. But his effort was prema- ture. Morgan shot him dead, and Morgan's Virginians drove the seamen back inside the barricade. Carleton had of course kept in perfect touch with every phase of the attack and defence; and now, fearing no surprise against the walls in the growing daylight, had decided on taking Arnold's men in rear. To do this he sent Captain Lawes of the Royal Engineers and Captain M'Dougall of the Royal Emigrants with a hundred and twenty men out through Palace Gate. This detachment had hardly reached the advanced barricade before they fell in with the enemy's rearguard, which they took by complete surprise and captured to a man. Leaving M'Dougall to secure these prisoners before following on, Lawes pushed",
         "BELEAGUERMENT eagerly forward, round the corner of the Sault- au-Matelot cliff, and, running in among the Americans facing the main barricade, called out, 'You are ail my prisoners!' 'No, we 're not ; you 're ours ! ' they answered. ' No, no,' replied Lawes, as coolly as if on parade, ' don't mistake yourselves, I vow to God you 're mine ! ' ' But where are your men ? ' asked the astonished Americans ; and then Lawes suddenly found that he was utterly alone! The roar of the storm and the work of securing the prisoners on the far side of the advanced barricade had prevented the men who should have followed him from under- standing that only a few were needed with M'Dougall. But Lawes put a bold face on it and answered, ' O, Ho, make yourselves easy ! My men are all round here and they '11 be with you in a twinkling.' He was then seized and disarmed. Some of the Americans called out, ' Kill himl Kill him ! ' But a Major Meigs protected him. The whole parley had lasted about ten nnutes when M'Dougall came running up with the missing men, released Lawes, and made prisoners of the nearest Americans. Lawes at once stepped forward and called on the rest to surrender. Morgan was for cutting his way through. A few men 11g",
         "izo THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ran round by the wharf and escaped on the tidal flats of the St Charles. But, after a hurried consultation, the main body, including Morgan, laid down their arms. This was decisive. The British had won the fight. The complete British loss in killed and wounded was wonderfully small, only thirty, just one-tenth of the corresponding American loss, which was large out of all proportion. Nearly half of the fifteen hundred Americans had gone--over four hundred prisoners and about three hundred killed and wounded. Nor were the mere numbers the most telling point about it; for the woýrse half escaped-- Livingston's Montreal 'patriots,' many of whom had done very little fighting, Mont- gomery's time-expired New Yorkers, most of whom wanted to go home, and Jerry Duggan's miscellaneous rabble, all of whom wanted a maximum of plunder with a minimum of war. The British victory was as nearly perfect as could have been desired. It marked the turn of the tide in a desperate campaign which might have resulted in the total loss of Canada. And it was of the greatest significance and happiest augury because all the racial elements of this new and vast domain had here united for the first time in defence of that which was",
         "BELEAGUERMENT to be their common heritage. In Carleton's little garrison of regulars and militia, of bluejackets, marines, and merchant seamen, there were Frenchmen and French Canadians, there were Englishmen, Irishmen, Scotsmen, Welshmen, Orcadians, and Channel Islanders, there were a few Newfoundlanders, and there were a good many of those steadfast Royal Emigrants who may be fitly called the fore- runners of the United Empire Loyalists. Yet, in spite of this remarkable significance, no public memorial of Carleton has ever been set up ; and it was only in the twentieth century that the Dominion first thought of commemorating his most pregnant victory by placing tablets to mark the sites of the two famous barricades. As soon as things had quieted down within the walls Carleton sent out search-parties to bring in the dead for decent burial and to see if any of the wounded had been overlooked. James Thompson, the assistant engineer, saw a frozen hand protruding from a snowdrift at Près-de-Ville. It was Montgomery's. The thirteen bodies were dug out and Thompson was ordered to have a 'genteel coffin made for Mr Montgomery,' who was buried in the 121",
         "122 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA wall just above St Louis Gate by the Angli- can chaplain. Thompson kept Montgomery's sword, which was given to the Livingston family more than a century later. The beleaguerment continued, in a half- hearted way, till the spring. The Americans received various small reinforcements, which eventually brought their total up to what it had been under Montgomery's command. But there were no more assaults. Arnold grew dissatisfied and finally went to Montreal; while Wooster, the new general, who arrived on the ist of April, was himself succeeded by Thomas, an ex-apothecary, on the ist of May. The suburb of St Roch was burnt down after the victory; so the American snipers were bereft of some very favourite cover, and this, with other causes, kept the bulk of the be- siegers at an ineffective distance from the walls. The British garrison had certain little troubles of its own; for discipline always tends to become irksome after a great effort. Carleton was obliged to stop the retailing of spirits for fear the slacker men would be getting out of hand. The guards and duties were made as easy as possible, especially for the militia. But the ' snow-shovel parade'",
         "BELEAGUERMENT was an imperative necessity. The winter was very stormy, and the drifts would have frequently covered the walls and even the guns if they had not promptly been dug out. The cold was also unusually severe. One early morning in January an angry officer was asking a sentry why he hadn't challenged him, when the sentry said, 'God bless your Honour ! and I 'm glad you 're come, for I 'm blindl' Then it was found that his eyelids were frozen fast together. News came in occasionally from the outside world. There was intense indignation among the garrison when they learned that the American commanders in Montreal were im- prisoning every Canadian officer who would not surrender his commission. Such an un- heard-of outrage was worthy of Walker. But others must have thought of it; for Walker was now in Philadelphia giving all the evidence he could against Prescott and other British officers. Bad news for the rebels was natur- ally welcomed, especially anything about their growing failure to raise troops in Canada. On hearing of Montgomery's defeat the Con- tinental Congress had passed a resolution, addressed to the ' Inhabitants of Canada,' declaring that 'we will never abandon you 123",
         "124 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA to the unrelenting fury of your and our enemies.' But there were no trained soldiers to back this up; and the raw militia, though often filled with zeal and courage, could do nothing to redress the increasingly adverse balance. In the middle of March the Americans sent in a summons. But Carleton refused to receive it ; and the garrison put a wooden horse and a bundle of hay on the walls with a placard bearing the inscription, ' When this horse has eaten this bunch of hay we will surrender.' Some excellent practice made with 13-inch shells sent the Americans flying from their new battery at Levis ; and by the 17th of March one of the several exultant British diarists, whose anonymity must have covered an Irish name, was able to record that ' this, being St Patrick's Day, the Governor, who is a true Hibernian, has re- quested the garrison to put off keeping it till the 17th of May, when he promises, they shall be enabled to do it properly, and with the usual solemnities.' A fortnight later a plot concerted between the American prisoners and their friends out- side was discovered just in time. With tools supplied by traitors they were to work their way out of their quarters, overpower the",
         "BELEAGUERMENT guard at the nearest gate, set fire to the riearest houses in three different streets, turn the nearest guns inwards on the town, and shout ' Liberty for ever ! ' as an additional signal to the storming-party that was to be waiting to confirm their success. Carleton seized the chance of turning this scheme against the enemy. Three safe bonfires were set ablaze. The marked guns were turned inwards and fired at the town with blank charges. And the preconcerted shout was raised with a will. But the besiegers never stirred. After this the Old - Countrymen anong the prisoners, who had taken the oath and enlisted in the garrison, were disarmed and confined, while the rest were more strictly watched. Two brave attempts were made by French Canadians to reach Quebec with reinforce- ments, one headed by a seigneur, the other by a parish priest. Carleton had sent word to M. de Beaujeu, seigneur of Crane Island, forty miles below Quebec, asking him to see if he could cut off the Anierican detach- ment on the Levis shore. De Beaujeu raised three hundred and fifty men. But Arnold sent over reinforcements. A habitant betrayed his fellow-countrymen's advance-guard. A dozen 125",
         "126 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA French Canadians were then killed or wounded while forty were taken prisoners; whereupon the rest dispersed to their homes. The other attempt was made by Father Bailly, whose little force of about fifty men was also be- trayed. Entrapped in a country-house these men fought bravely till nearly half their number had been killed or wounded and the valiant priest had been mortally hit. They then surrendered to a much stronger force which had lost more men than they. This was on the 6th of April, just before Arnold was leaving in disgust. Wooster made an effort to use his new artillery to advantage by converging the fire of three batteries, one close in on the Heights of Abraham, another from across the mouth of the St Charles, and the third from Levis. But the combination failed : the batteries were too light for the work and overmatched by the guns on the walls, the practice was bad, and the effect was nil. On the 3rd of May the new general, Thomas, an enterprising man, tried a fireship, which was meant to destroy all the shipping in the Cul de Sac. It came on, under full sail, in a very threatening manner. But the crew lost their nerve at the critical moment, took to the boats too soon, and forgot to lash the",
         "BELEAGUERMENT 127 helm. The vessel immediately flew up into the wind and, as the tidal stream was already changing, began to drift away from the Cul de Sac just when she burst into flame. The resuit, as described by an enthusiastic British diarist, was that 'she affoard'd a very pritty prospect while she was floating down the River, every now \u0026 then sending up Sky rackets, firing of Cannon or bursting of Shells, \u0026 so continued till She disappear'd in the Channell.' Three days later, on the 6th of May, when the beleaguerment had lasted precisely five months, the sound of distant gunfire came faintly up the St Lawrence with the first breath of the dawn wind from the east. The sentries listened to make sure; then called the sergeants of the guards, who sent word to the officers on duty, who, in their turn, sent word to Carleton. By this time there could be no mistake. The breeze was freshen- ing ; the sound was gradually nearing Quebec ; and there could hardly be room for doubting that it came from the vanguard of the British fleet. The drums beat to arms, the church bells rang, the news flew round to every house- hold in Quebec ; and before the tops of the Surprise frigate were seen over the Point of",
         "128 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Levy every battery was fully manned, every battalion was standing ready on the Grand Parade, and every non - combatant man, woman, and child was lining the seaward wall. The regulation shot was fired across her bows as she neared the city; whereupon she fired three guns to leeward, hoisted the private signal, and showed the Union Jack. Then, at last, a cheer went up that told both friend and foe of British victory and American defeat. By a strange coincidence the parole for this triumphal day was St George, while the parole appointed for the victorious New Year's Eve had been St Denis; so that the patron saints of France and England happen to be associ- ated with the two great days on which the stronghold of Canada was saved by land and sea. The same tide brought in two other men- of-war. Some soldiers of the 29th, who were on board the Surprise, were immediately landed, together with the marines from all three vessels. Carleton called for volunteers from the militia to attack the Americans at once ; and nearly every man, both of the French- and of the English-speaking corps, stepped forward. There was joy in every heart that the day for striking back had come",
         "BENEDICT ARNOLD Fron an engraving ii the folin Rss Robertson Collection, Toronto lulic Librarv",
         "BELEAGUERMENT at last. The columns marched gaily through the gates and deployed into Une at the double on the Heights outside. The Americans fired a few hurried shots and then ran for dear life, leaving their dinners cooking, and, in some cases, even their arms behind them. The Plains were covered with flying enemies and strewn with every sort of impediment to flight, frorn a cannon to a loaf of bread. Quebec had been saved by British sea-power; and, with it, the whole vast dominion of which it was the key, 7.B.C. 129",
         "CHAPTER VI DELIVERANCE 1776 THE Continental Congress had always been anxious to have delegates from the Fourteenth Colony. But as these never came the Con- gress finally decided to send a special com- mission to examine the whole civil and military state of Canada and see what could be done. The news of Montgomery's death and defeat was a very unwelcome surprise. But reinforcements were being sent ; the Canadians could surely be persuaded ; and a Congressional commission must be able to set things right. This commission was a very strong one. Benjamin Franklin was the chairman. Samuel Chase of Maryland and Charles Carroll of Carrollton were the other members. Carroll's brother, the future arch- bishop of Baltimore, accompanied them as a sort of ecclesiastical diplomatist. Franklin's prestige and the fact that he was to set up a 130",
         "DELIVERANCE 131 ' free' printing-press in Montreal were to work wonders with the educated classes at once and with the uneducated masses later on. Chase would appeal to all the reasonable ' moder- ates.' Carroll, a great landlord and the nearest approach yet made to an American millionaire, was expected to charm the Cana- dian noblesse; while the fact that he and his exceedingly diplomatic brother were devout Roman Catholics was thought to be by itself a powerful argument with the clergy. When they reached St Johns towards the end of April the commissioners sent on a courier to announce their arrival and prepare for their proper reception in Montreal. But the ferryman at Laprairie positively refused to accept Continental paper money at any price ; and it was only when a ' Friend of Liberty' gave him a dollar in silver that he consented to cross the courier over the St Lawrence. The same hitch occurred in Montreal, where the same Friend of Liberty had to pay in silver before the cab-drivers consented to accept a fare either from him or from the commissioners. Even the name of Carroll of Carrollton was conjured with in vain. The French Canadians remembered Bigot's bad French paper. Their worst suspicions",
         "132 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA were being confirmed about the equally bad American paper. So they demanded nothing but hard cash-argent dur. However, the first great obstacle had been successfully over- come ; and so, on the strength of five borrowed silver dollars, the accredited commissioners of the Continental Congress of the Thirteen Colonies made their state entry into what they still hoped to call the Fourteenth Colony. But silver dollars were scarce ; and on the ist of May the crestfallen commissioners had to send the Congress a financial report which may best be summed up in a pithy phrase which soon became proverbial-' Not worth a Continental.' On the ioth of May they heard the bad news from Quebec and increased the panic among their Montreal sympathizers by hastily leaving the city lest they should be cut off by a British man-of-war. Franklin foresaw the end and left for Philadelphia accompanied by the Reverend John Carroll, whose twelve days of disheartening experience with the leading French-Canadian clergy had con. vinced him that they were impervious to any arguments or blandishments emanating from the Continental Congress. It was a sad dis- illusionment for the commissioners, who had",
         "DELIVERANCE expected to be settling the affairs of a four- teenth colony instead of being obliged to leave the city from which they were to have en- lightened the people with a free press. In their first angry ignorance they laid the whole blame on their unfortunate army for its ' dis- graceful flight' from Quebec. A week later, when Chase and Charles Carroll ought to have known better, they were still assuring the Congress that this 'shameful retreat ' was 'the principal cause of all the disorders ' in the army ; and even after the whole story ought to have been understood neither they nor the Congress gave their army its proper due. But, as a matter of fact, the Ameri- can position had become untenable the mo- ment the British fleet began to threaten the American line of communication with Montreal. For the rest, the American volun- teers, all things considered, had done very well indeed. Arnold's march was a truly magnificent feat. Morgan's men had fought with great courage at the Sault-au-Matelot. And though Montgomery's assault might well have been better planned and executed, we must remember that the good plan, which had been rejected, was the military one, while the bad plan, which had been adopted, was 133",
         "134 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA concocted by mere politicians. Nor were 'all the disorders' so severely condemned by the commissioners due to the army alone. Far from it, indeed. The root of ' all the dis- orders ' lay in the fact that a makeshift govern- ment was obliged to use makeshift levies for an invasion which required a regular army supported by a fleet. On the 19th of May another disaster hap- pened, this time above Montreai. The Con- gress had not felt strong enough to attack the western posts. So Captain Forster of the 8th Foot, finding that he was free to go else- where, had come down from Oswegatchie (the modern Ogdensburg) with a hundred whites and two hundred Indians and made prisoners of four hundred and thirty Americans at the Cedars, about thirty miles up the St Lawrence from Montreal. Forster was a very good officer. Butterfield, the American commander, was a very bad one. And that made all the difference. After two days of feeble and misdirected defence Butterfield surrendered three hundred and fifty men. The other eighty were reinforcements who walked into the trap next day. Forster now had four American prisoners for every white soldier of his own ; while Arnold was near by,",
         "DELIVERANCE having come up from Sorel to Lachine with a small but determined force. So Forster, care- fully pointing out to his prisoners their danger if the Indians should be reinforced and run wild, offered them their freedom on condi- tion that they should be regarded as being exchanged for an equal number of British prisoners in American hands. This was agreed to and never made a matter of dispute afterwards. But the second article Butter- field accepted was a stipulation that, while the released British were to be free to fight again, the released Americans were not ; and it was over this point that a bitter controversy raged. The British authorities maintained that all the terms were binding because they had been accepted by an officer commissioned by the Congress. The Congress maintained that the disputed article was obtained by an unfair threat of an Indian massacre and that it was so one-sided as to be good for nothing but repudiation. ' The Affair at the Cedars ' thus became a sorely vexed question. In itself it would have died out among later and more important issues if it had not been used as a torch to fire American public opinion at a time when the Congress was particularly anxious to make 135",
         "136 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the Thirteen Colonies as anti-British as pos- sible. Most of Forster's men were Indians. He had reminded Butterfield how dangerous an increasing number of Indians might be- come. Butterfield was naturally anxious to prove that he had yielded only to overwhelm- ing odds and horrifying risks. Americans in general were ready to believe anything bad about the Indians and the British. The temptation and the opportunity seemed made for each other. And so a quite imaginary Indian massacre conveniently appeared in the American news of the day and helped to form the kind of public opinion which was ardently desired by the party of revolt. The British evidence in this and many another embittering dispute about the Indians need not be cited, since the following items of American evidence do ample justice to both sides. In the spring of 1775 the Mas- sachusetts Provincial Congress sent Samuel Kirkland to exhort the Iroquois ' to whet their hatchet and be prepared to defend our liberties and lives'; while Ethan Allen asked the Indians round Vermont to treat him ' like a brother and ambush the regulars.' In 1776 the Continental Congress secretly re- solved ' that it is highly expedient to engage",
         "DELIVERANCE the Indians in the service of the United Colonies.' This was before the members knew about the Affair at the Cedars. A few days later Washington was secretly author- ized to raise two thousand Indians ; while agents were secretly sent ' to engage the Six Nations in our Interest, on the best terms that can be procured.' Within three weeks of this secret arrangement the Declaration of Inde- pendence publicly accused the king rf trying ' to bring on the inhabitants of our frontiers the merciless Indian savages.' Four days after this public accusation the Congress gave orders for raising Indians along 'the Penob- scot, the St John, and in Nova Scotia'; and an entry to that effect was made in its Secret Journal. Yet, before the month was out, the same Congress publicly appealed to 'The People of Ireland ' in the following words: 'The wild and barbarous savages of the wilderness have been solicited by gifts to take up the hatchet against us, and instigated to deluge our settlements with the blood of de- fenceless women and children.' The American defeats at Quebec and at the Cedars completely changed the position of the two remaining commissioners. They had ex- pected to control a victorious advance. They 137",
         "138 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA found themselves the highest authority present with a disastrous retreat. Thereupon they made blunder after blunder. Public interest and parliamentary control are the very life of armies and navies in every country which enjoys the blessings of self-government. But civilian interference is death. Yet Chase and Carroll practically abolished rank in the dis- integrating arny by becoming an open court of appeal to every junior with a grievance or a plan. There never was an occasion on which military rule was more essential in military matters. Yet, though they candidly admitted that they had ' neither abilities nor inclina- tion ' to command, these wretched misrulers tried to do their duty both to the Congress and the army by turning the camp into a sort of town meeting where the best orders had no chance whatever against the loudest ' senti- ments.' They had themselves found the root of all evil in the retreat from Quebec. Their army, like every impartial critic, found it in ' the Commissioners and the smallpox '-with the commissioners easily first. The smallpox had been bad enough at Quebec. It became far worse at Sorel. There were few doctors, fewer medicines, and not a single hospital. The reinforcements melted away with the",
         "DELIVERANCE army they were meant to strengthen. Famine threatened both, even in May. Finally the commissioners. left for home at the end of the month. But even their departure could no longer make the army's burden light enough to bear. Thomas, the ex-apothecary, who did his best to stem the adverse tide of trouble, caught the smallpox, became blind, and died at the beginning of June. Sullivan, the fourth commander in less than half a year, having determined that one more effort should be made, arrived at Sorel with new battalions after innumerable difficulties by the way. He was led to believe that Carleton's rein- forcements had come from Nova Scotia, not from England; and this encouraged him to push on farther. He was naturally of a very sanguine temper; and Thompson, his second- in-command, heartily approved of the dash. The new troops cheered up and thought of taking Quebec itself. But, after getting mis- led by their guide, floundering about in bottom- less bogs, and losing a great deal of very precious time, they found Three Rivers de- fended by entrenchments, superior numbers, and the vanguard of the British fleet. Never- theless they attacked bravely on the 8th of 139",
         "140 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA June. But, taken in front and flank by well- drilled regulars and well-handled men-of-war, they presently broke and fled. Every avenue of escape was closed as they wandered about the woods and bogs. But Carleton, who came up from Quebec after the battle was all over, purposely opened the way to Sorel. He had done his best to win the hearts of his prisoners at Quebec and had succeeded so well that when they returned to Crown Point they were kept away from the rest of the American army lest their account of his kindness should affect its anti-British zeal. Now that he was in overwhelming force he thought he saw an even better chance of earning gratitude from rebels and winning converts to the loyal side by a still greater act of clemency. The battle of Three Rivers was the last action fought on Canadian soil. The American army retreated to Sorel and up the Richelieu to St Johns, where it was joined by Arnold, who had just evacuated Montreal. Most of the Friends of Liberty in Canada fled either with or before their beaten forces. So, like the ebbing of a whole river system, the main and tributary streams of fugitives drew south towards Lake Champlain. The neutral",
         "DELIVERANCE French Canadians turned against them at once; though not to the extent of making an actual attack. The habitant cared nothing for the incomprehensible constitutionalities over which different kinds of British foreigners were fighting their exasperating civil war. But he did know what the king's big fleet and army meant. He did begin to feel that his own ways of life were safer with the loyal than with the rebel side. And he quite under- stood that he had been forced to give a good deal for nothing ever since the American commissioners had authorized their famishing army to commandeer his supplies and pay him with their worthless ' Continentals.' From St Johns the worn-out Americans crawled homewards in stray, exhausted parties, dropping fast by the way as they went. ' I did not look into a hut or a tent,' wrote a horrified observer, ' in which I did not find a dead or dying man.' Disorganization became so complete that no exact returns were ever made up. But it is known that over ten thousand armed men crossed into Canada from first to last and that not f ar short of half this total either found their death beyond the line or brought it back with them to Lake Champlain. 141",
         "142 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA It was on what long afterwards became Dominion Day--the ist of July-that the ruined American forces reassembled at Crown Point, having abandoned all hope of making Canada the Fourteenth Colony. Three days later the disappointed Thirteen issued the Declaration of Independence which virtually proclaimed that Canadians and Americans should thenceforth live a separate life.",
         "CHAPTER VII THE COUNTERSTROKE - 1776-1778 Six thousand British troops, commanded by Burgoyne, and four thousand Germans, com- manded by Baron Riedesel, had arrived at Quebec before the battle of Three Rivers. Quebec itself had then been left to the care of a German garrison under a German com- mandant,' that excellent man, Colonel Baum,' while the great bulk of the army had marched up the St Lawrence, as we have seen already. Such a force as this new one of Carleton's was expected to dismay the rebel colonies. And so, to a great extent, it did. With a much larger force in the colonies themselves the king was confidently expected to master his unruly subjects, no matter how much they proclaimed their independence. The Loyalists were en- couraged. The trimmers prepared to join them. Only those steadfast Americans who held their cause dearer than life itself were still 143",
         "144 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA determined to venture ail. But they formed the one party that really knew its own mind. This gave them a great advantage over the king's party, which, hampered at every turn by the opposition in the mother country, was never quite sure whether it ought to strike hard or gently in America. On one point, however, everybody was agreed. The command of Lake Champlain was essential to whichever side would hold its own. The American forces at Crown Point might be too weak for the time being. But Arnold knew that even ten thousand British soldiers could not overrun the land without a naval force to help them. So he got to- gether a flotilla which had everything its own way during the time that Carleton was laboriously building a rival flotilla on the Richelieu with a very scanty supply of ship- wrights and materials. Arnold, moreover, could devote his whole attention to the work, makeshift as it had to be ; while Carleton was obliged to keep moving about the province in an effort to bring it into some sort of order after the late invasion. Throughout the summer the British army held the line of the Richelieu ail the way south as far as Isle-aux- Noix, very near the lake and the line. But",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE Carleton's flotilla could not set sail from St Johns till October 5, by which time the main body of his army was concentrated round Pointe-au-Fer, at the northern end of the lake, ninety miles north of the American camp at Crown Point. It was a curious situation for a civil and military governor to be hoisting his flag as a naval commander-in-chief, however small the fleet might be. But it is commonly ignored that, down to the present day, the governor- general of Canada is appointed ' Vice-Admiral of the Same ' in his commissions from the Crown. Carleton of course carried expert naval officers with him and had enough pro- fessional seamen to work the vessels and lay the guns. But, though Captain Pringle manuvred the flotilla and Lieutenant Dacre handled the flagship Carleton, the actual command remained in Carleton's own hands. The capital ship (and the only real square- rigged 'ship') of this Lilliputian fleet was Pringle's Inflexible, which had been taken up the Richelieu in sections and hauled past the portages with immense labour before reaching St Johns, whence there is a clear run upstream to Lake Champlain. The Inflexible carried thirty guns, mostly i2-pounders, and was an F,B.C. K 145",
         "146 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA overmatch for quite the half of Arnold's decidedly weaker flotilla. The Lady Maria was a sort of sister ship to the Carleton. The little armada was completed by a ' gondola' with six 9-pounders, by twenty gunboats and four longboats, each carrying a single piece, and by many small craft used as transports. On the i ith of October Carleton's whole naval force was sailing south when one of Arnold's vessels was seen making for Valcour Island, a few miles still farther south on the same, or western, side of Lake Champlain. Presently the Yankee ran ashore on the southern end of the island, where she was immediately attacked by some British small craft while the Inflexible sailed on. Then, to the intense disgust of the Inflexible's crew, Arnold's complete flotilla was suddenly dis- covered drawn up in a masterly position be- tween the mainland and the island. It was too late for the Inflexible to beat back now. But the rest of Carleton's flotilla turned in to the attack. Arnold's flanks rested on the island and the mainland. His rear could be approached only by beating back against a bad wind all the way round the outside of Valcour Island; and, even if this manouvre could have been performed, the British attack",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE on his rear from the north could have been made only in a piecemeal way, because the channel was there at its narrowest, with a bad obstruction in the middle. So, for every reason, a frontal attack from the south was the one way of closing with him. The fight was furious while it lasted and seemingly decisive when it ended. Arnold's best vessel, the Royal Savage, which he had taken at St Johns the year before, was driven ashore and captured. The others were so severely mauled that when the victorious British anchored their superior force in line across Arnold's front there seemed to be no chance for him to escape the following day. But that night he performed an even more daring and wonderful feat than Bouchette had performed the year before when paddling Carleton through the American lnes among the islands opposite Sorel. Using muffled sweeps, with consummate skill he slipped all his remaining vessels between the mainland and the nearest British gunboat, and was well on his way to Crown Point before his escape had been dis- covered. Next day Carleton chased south. The day after he destroyed the whole of the enemy's miniature sea-power as a fighting force. But the only three serviceable vessels 147",
         "148 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA got away ; while Arnold burnt everything else likely to fall into British hands. So Carleton had no more than his own reduced flotilla to depend on when he occupied Crown Point. A vexed question, destined to form part of a momentous issue, now arose. Should Ticon- deroga be attacked at once or not ? It com- manded the only feasible line of march from Montreal to New York ; and no force from Canada could therefore attack the new re- public effectively without taking it first. But the season was late. The fort was strong, well gunned, and well manned. Carleton's reconnaissance convinced him that he could have little chance of reducing it quickly, if at all, with the means at hand, especially as the Americans had supplies close by at Lake George, while he was now a hundred miles south of his base. A winter siege was im- possible. Sufficient supplies could never be brought through the dense, snow-encumbered bush, all the way from Canada, even if the long and harassing line of communications had not been everywhere open to American attack. Moreover, Carleton's army was in no way prepared for a midwinter campaign, even if it could have been supplied with food and warlike stores. So he very sensibly",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE turned his back on Lake Champlain until the following year. That was the gayest winter Quebec had seen since Montcalm's first season, twenty years before. Carleton had been knighted for his services and was naturally supposed to be the chosen leader for the next campaign. The ten thousand troops gave confidence to the loyalists and promised success for the coming campaign. The clergy were getting their dis- illusioned parishioners back to the fold be- neath the Union Jack; while Jean Ba'tis'e himself was fain to admit that his own ways of life and the money he got for his goods were very much safer with les Angla's than with the revolutionists, whom he called les Bastonna's because most trade between Quebec and the Thirteen Colonies was carried on by vessels hailing from the port of Boston. The sei- gneurs were delighted. They still hoped for commissions as regulars, which too few of them ever received ; and they were charmed with the little viceregal court over which Lady Maria Carleton, despite her youthful two-and- twenty summers, presided with a dignity in- herited from the premier ducal family of England and brought to the acme of con- 149",
         "150 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA ventional perfection by her intimate experi- ence of Versailles. On New Year's Eve Carleton gave a public fête, a state dinner, and a ball to celebrate the anniversary of the British victory over Montgomery and Arnold. The bishop held a special thanksgiving and made all notorious renegadles do open penance. Nothing seemed wanting to bring the New Year in under the happiest auspices since British rule began. But, quite unknown to Carleton, mischief was brewing in the Colonial Office of that un- happy government which did so many stupid things and got the credit for so many more. In 1775 the well-meaning Earl of Dartmouth was superseded by Lord George Germain, who continued the mismanagement of colonial affairs for seven disastrous years. Few char- acters have abused civil and military positions more than the man who first, as a British general, disgraced the noble name of Sackville on the battlefield of Minden in 1759, and then, as a cabinet minister, disgraced throughout America the plebeian one of Germain, which he took in 1770 with a suitable legacy attached to it. His crime at Minden was set down by the thoughtless public to sheer cowardice. But Sackville was no coward. He had borne",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE 151 himself with conspicuous gallantry at Fonte- noy. He was admired, before Minden, by two very brave soldiers, Wolfe and the Duke of Cumberland. And he afterwards fought a famous duel with as much sang-froid as any one would care to see. His real crime at Minden was admirably exposed by the court- martial which found him 'guilty of having disobeyed the orders of Prince Ferdinand of Brunswick, whom he was by his commission bound to obey as commander-in-chief, accord- ing to the rules of war.' This court also found him ' unfit to serve his Majesty in any military capacity whatever '; and George II directed that the following ' remarks ' should be added when the sentence was read out on parade to every regiment in the service: ' It is his Majesty's pleasure that the above sentence be given out in public orders, not only in Britain, but in America, and in every quarter of the globe where British troops happen to be, so that all officers, being convinced that neither high birth nor great employments can shelter offences of such a nature, and seeing they are subject to censures worse than death to a man who has any sense of honour, may avoid the fatal consequences arising from disobedi- ence of orders.'",
         "152 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA This seemed to mark the end of Sackville's sinister career. But when George II died and George III began to reign, with a very different set of men to help him, the bad general reappeared as an equally bad politician. Haughty, cantankerous, and self-opinionated to the last degree, Germain, who had many perverse abilities fitting him for the meaner side of party politics, was appointed to the post for which he was least qualified just when Canada and the Thirteen Colonies most needed a master mind. Worse still, he cher- ished a contemptible grudge against Carleton for having refused to turn out a good officer and put in a bad one who happened to be a pampered favourite. At first, however, Carleton was allowed to do his best. But in the summer of 1776 Germain restricted Carleton's command to Canada and put Burgoyne, a junior officer, in command of the army destined to make the counterstroke. The ship bearing this malicious order had to put back ; so it was not till the middle of May 1777 that Carleton was disillusioned by its arrival as weil as by a second and still more exasperating dispatch accusing him of neglect of duty for not having taken Ticonderoga in November and thus prevented Washington",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE from capturing the Hessians at Trenton. The physical impossibility of a winter siege, the three hundred miles of hostile country be- tween Trenton and Ticonderoga, and the fact that the other leading British general, Howe, had thirty thousand troops in the Colonies, while Carleton had only ten thousand with which to hold Canada that year and act as ordered next year, all went for nothing when Germain found a chance to give 'a good stab in the back. On May 20 Carleton wrote a pungent reply, pointing out the utter impossibility of follow- ing up his victory on Lake Champlain by carrying out Germain's arm-chair plan of operations in the middle of winter. 'I regard it as a particular blessing that your Lordship's dispatch did not arrive in due time.' As for the disaster at Trenton, he ' begs to inform his Lordship' that if Howe's thirty thousand men had been properly used the Hessians could never have been taken, 'though all the rebels from Ticonderoga had reinforced Mr Washington's army.' Moreover, ' I never could imagine why, if troops so far south [as Howe's] found it necessary to go into winter quarters, your Lordship could possibly expect troops so far north to continue their opera- 153",
         "154 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA tions.' A week later Carleton wrote again and sent in his resignation. ' Finding that I can no longer be of use, under your Lordship's administration . . . I flatter myself I shall obtain the king's permission to return home this fall. . . . I shal embark with great satisfaction, still entertaining the ardent wish that, after my departure, the dignity of the Crown in this unfortunate Province may not appear beneath your Lordship's concern.' Burgoyne had spent the winter in London and had arrived at Quebec about the same time as Germain's dispatches. He had loyally represented Carleton's plans at headquarters. But he did not know America and he was not great enough to see the weak points in the plan which Germain proposed to carry out with wholly inadequate means. There was nothing wrong with the actual idea of this plan. Washington, Carleton, and every other leading man on either side saw perfectly well that the British army ought to cut the rebels in two by holding the direct line from Montreal to New York throughout the coming campaign of 1777. Given the irresistible British command of the sea, fifty thousand troops were enough. The general idea was that half of these should hold the",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE 155 four-hundred-mile line of the Richelieu, Lake Champlain, and the Hudson, while the other half seized strategic points elsewhere and still further divided the American forces. But the troops employed were ten thousand short of the proper number. Many of them were foreign mercenaries. And the generals were not the men to smash the enemy at all costs. They were ready to do their duty. But their affinities were rather with the opposition, which was against the war, than with the government, which was for it. Howe was a strong Whig. Burgoyne became a follower of Fox. Clinton had many Whig connections. Cornwallis voted against colonial taxation. To make matters worse, the government itself wavered between out-and-out war and some sort of compromise both with its political opponents at home and its armed opponents in America. Under these circumstances Carleton was in favour of a modified plan. Ticonderoga had been abandoned by the Americans and occupied by the British as Burgoyne marched south. Carleton's idea was to use it as a base of operations against New England, while Howe's main body struck at the main body of the rebels and broke them up as much as",
         "i56 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA possible. Germain, however, was all for the original plan. So Burgoyne set off for the Hudson, expecting to get into touch with Howe at Albany. But Germain, in his haste to leave town for a holiday, forgot to sign Howe's orders at the proper time ; and after- wards forgot them altogether. So Howe, pro- American in politics and temporizer in the field, manoeuvred round his own headquarters at New York until October, when he sailed south to Philadelphia. Receiving no orders from Germain, and having no initiative of his own, he had made no attempt to hold the line of the Hudson all the way north to Albany, where he could have met Burgoyne and com- pleted the union of the forces which would have cut the Colonies in two. Meanwhile Burgoyne, ignorant of Germain's neglect and Howe's futilities, was struggling to his fate at Saratoga, north of Albany. He had been re- ceiving constant aid from Carleton's scanty resources, though Carleton knew full well that the sending of any aid beyond the limits of the province exposed him to personal ruin in case of a reverse in Canada. But it was all in vain ; and, on the 17th of October, Burgoyne-much more sinned against than sinning-laid down his arms. The British",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE 157 garrison immediately evacuated Ticonderoga and retired to St Johns, thus making Carleton's position fairly safe in Canada. But Germain, only too glad to oust him, had now notified him that Haldimand, the new governor, was on the point of sailing for Quebec. Haldimand, to his great credit, had asked to have his own appointment cancelled when he heard of Germain's shameful attitude towards Carleton, and had only consented to go after being satisfied that Carleton really wished to come home. The exchange, how- ever, was not to take place that year. Con- trary winds blew Haldimand back; and so Canada had to remain under the best of all possible governors in spite of Germain. Germain had provoked Carleton past en- durance both by his public blunders and by his private malice. Even in 1776 there was hate on one side, contempt on the other. When Germain had blamed Carleton for not carrying out the idiotic winter siege of Ticon- deroga, Carleton, in his official reply, 'could only suppose' that His Lordship had acted ' in other places with such great wisdom that, without our assistance, the rebels must im- mediately be compelled to lay down their arms and implore the King's mercy.' After",
         "158 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA that Germain had murder in his heart to the bitter end of Carleton's rule. Carleton had frequently reported the critical state of affairs in Canada. 'There is nothing to fear from the Canadians so long as things are in a state of prosperity; nothing to hope from them when in distress. There are some of them who are guided by sentiments of honour. The multitude is influenced by hope of gain or fear of punishment.' The recent invasion had proved this up to the hilt. Then a welcome reaction began. The defeat of the invaders, the arrival of Burgoyne's army, and the efforts of the seigneurs and the clergy had considerably brightened the prospects of the British cause in Canada. The partial mobilization of the militia which followed Burgoyne's surrender was not, indeed, a great success. But it was far better than the fiasco of two years before. There was also a cor- responding improvement in civil life. The judges whom Carleton had been obliged to appoint in haste all proved at leisure the wisdom of his choice; and there seemed to be every chance that other nominees would be equally fit for their positions, because the Quebec Act, which annulled every appoint- ment made before it came into force, opened",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE 159 the way for the exclusion of bad officials and the inclusion of the good. But the chance of perverting this excellent intention was too much for Germain, who suc- ceeded in foisting one worthless nominee after another on the province just as Carleton was doing his best to heal old sores. One of the worst cases was that of Livius, a low-down, money - grubbing German Portuguese, who ousted the future Master of the Rolls, Sir William Grant, a man most admirably fitted to interpret the laws of Canada with know- ledge, sympathy, and absolute impartiality. Livius as chief justice was more than Carleton could stand in silence. This mongrel lawyer had picked up all the Yankee vices without acquiring any of the countervailing Yankee virtues. He was 'greedy of power, more greedy of gain, imperious and impetuous in his temper, but learned in the ways and eloquence of the New England provinces, and valuing himself particularly on his knowledge of how to manage governors.' He had been sent by Germain 'to administer justice to the Canadians when he understands neither their laws, manners, customs, nor language.' Other like nominees followed, ' characters regardless of the public tranquility but zealous to pay",
         "z6o THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA court to a powerful minister and-provided they can obtain advantages-unconcerned should the neans of obtaining them prove minous to the King's service.' These petti- foggers so turned and twisted the law about for the sake of screwing out the maximum of fees that Carleton pointedly refused to appoint Livius as a member of the Legislative Council. Livius then laid his case before the Privy Council in England. But this great court of ultimate appeal pronounced such a damning judgment on his gross pretensions that even Germain could not prevent his final dismissal from all employment under the Crown. Wounded in the house of those who should have been his friends, thwarted in every measure of his self-sacrificing rule, Carleton served on devotedly through six weary months of 1778-the year in which a vindictive government of Bourbon France became the first of the several foreign enemies who made the new American republic an accomplished fact by taking sides in a British civil war. His burden was now far more than any man could bear. Yet he closed his answer to Germain's parting shot with words which are as noble as his deeds:",
         "THE COUNTERSTROKE ' I have long looked out for the arrival of a successor. Happy at last to learn his near approach, I resign the important commands with which I have been entrusted into hands less obnoxious to your Lordship. Thus, for the King's service, as willingly I lay them down as, for his service, I took them up.' F.3 C. 161",
         "CHAPTER VIII GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 1782-1783 BURGOYNE'S surrender marked the turning of the tide against the British arms. True, the three campaigns of purely civil war, be- gun in 1775, had reached no decisive result. True also that the Independence declared in 1776 had no apparent chance of becoming an accomplished fact. But 1777 was the fatal year for all that. The long political strife in England, the gross mismanagement of colonial affairs under Germain, and the shameful blunders that made Saratoga possible, all combined to encourage foreign powers to take the field against the king's incompetent and distracted ministry. France, Spain, and Holland joined the Americans in arms ; while Russia, Sweden, Denmark, Prussia, and all the German seaboard countries formed the Armed Neutrality of the North. This made stupendous odds-no less than ten to one. 162",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 163 First of the ten came the political opposition at home, which, in regard to the American rebellion itself, was at least equal to the most powerful enemy abroad. Next came the four enemies in arms : the American rebels, France, Spain, and Holland. Finally came the five armed neutrals, all ready to use their navies on the slightest provocation. From this it may be seen that not one-half, perhaps not a quarter, of all the various forces that won the Revolutionary war were purely American. Nor were the Americans and their allies together victorious over the mother country, but only over one sorely hampered party in it. Yet, from the nature of the case, the Americans got much more than the lion's share of the spoils, while, even in their own eyes, they seemed to have gained honour and glory in the same proportion. The last real campaign was fought in 1781 and ended with the British surrender at Yorktown. From that time on peace was in the air. The un- fortunate ministry, now on the eve of political defeat at home, were sick of civil war and only too anxious for a chance of uniting all parties against the foreign foes. But they had first to settle with the Americans, who had con- sidered themselves an independent sovereign",
         "164 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA power for the last five years and who were de- termined to make the most of England's diffi- culties. No darker New Year's Day had ever dawned on any cabinet than that of 1782 on North's. In spite of his change from re- pression to conciliation, and in spite of dis- missing Germain to the House of Lords with an ill-earned peerage, Lord North found his majority dwindling away. At last, on the 2oth of March, he resigned. Meanwhile every real statesman in either party had felt that the crisis required the master-hand of Carleton. With Germain, the empire-wrecker, gone, Carleton would doubt- less have served under any cabinet, for no governnent could have done without him. But his actual commission came through the Rockingham administration on the 4th of April. After three quiet'years of retirement at his country seat in Hampshire he was again called upon to face a situation of extreme difficulty. For once, with a wisdom rare enough in any age and almost unknown in that one, the government gave him a free hand and almost unlimited powers. The only ques- tions over which he had no final power were those of making treaties. He was appointed ' General and Commander-in-chief of all His",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 165 Majesty's forces within the Colonies lying in the Atlantic Ocean, from Nova Scotia to the Floridas, and inclusive of Newfoundland and Canada should they be attacked.' He was also appointed commissioner for executing the terms of any treaty that might be made; and his instructions contained two passages which bore eloquent witness to the universal con- fidence reposed in him. ' It is impossible to judge of the precise situation at so great a distance' and 'His Majesty's affairs are so situated that further deliberations give way to instant decision. We are satisfied that whatever inconveniences may arise they will be compensated by the presence of a com- mander-in-chief of whose discretion, conduct, and ability His Majesty has long entertained the highest opinion.' Thus the great justifier of British rule beyond the seas arrived in New York on the 9th of May 1782 with at least some hope of reconciling enough Americans to turn the scale before it was too late. For three months the prospect, though worse than he had anticipated, did not seem utterly hopeless. It had been considerably brightened by Rodney's great victory over the French fleet which was on its way to attack Jamaica. But an unfortunate in-",
         "166 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA cident happened to be exasperating Loyalists and revolutionists at this very time. Some revolutionists had killed a Loyalist named Philip White, apparently out of pure hate. Some Loyalists, under Captain Lippincott, then seized and hanged Joshua Huddy, a captain in the Congress militia, out of sheer revenge. A paper left pinned on Huddy's breast bore the inscription: ' Up goes Huddy for Philip White.' Washington then de- manded that Lippincott should be delivered up ; and, on Carleton's refusal, chose a British prisoner by lot instead. The lot fell on a young Lieutenant Asgill of the Guards, whose mother appealed to the king and queen of France and to their powerful minister, Vergennes. The American Congress wanted blood for blood, which would have led to an endless vendetta. But Vergennes pointed out that Asgill, a youth of nineteen, was as much a prisoner of the king of France as of the Continental Congress. At this the Congress gnashed its teeth, but had to give way. While the Asgill affair was still running its course, and embittering Loyalists and rebels more than ever, Carleton was suddenly in- formed that the government had decided to grant complete independence. This was more",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 167 than he could stand ; and he at once asked to be recalled. He had been all for honourable reconciliation from the first. He had been particularly kind to his American prisoners in Canada and had purposely refrained from annihilating the American army after the battle of Three Rivers. But he was not pre- pared for independence. Nor had he been sent out with this ostensible object in view. His official instructions were to inform the Americans that 'the most liberal sentiments had taken root in the nation, and that the narrow policy of monopoly was totally ex- tinguished.' Now he was called upon to sur- render without having tried either his arms or his diplomacy. With British sea-power be- ginning to reassert its age-long superiority over all possible rivals, with practically all con- stitutional points of dispute conceded to the revolutionists, and with the certain knowledge that by no means the majority of all Americans were absolute anti-British out-and-outers, he thought it no time to dismember the Empire. His Intelligence Department had been busily collecting information which seems surprising enough as we read it over to-day, but which was based on the solid facts of that unhappy time. One member of the Continental Con-",
         "168 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA gress was anxious to know what would be- come of the American army if reconciliation should be effected on the understanding that there would be no more imperial taxation or customs duty-would it becone part of the Imperial Army, or what ? But speculation on all such contingencies was suddenly cut short by the complete change of policy at home. The idea was to end the civil war that had divided the Empire and to concentrate on the foreign war that at least united the people of Great Britain. No matter at what cost this policy had now to be carried out; and Carleton was the only man that every one would trust to do it. So, sacrificing his own feelings and convictions, he made the best of an exceedingly bad busi- ness. He had to safeguard the prisoners and Loyalists while preparing to evacuate the few remaining footholds of British power in the face of an implacable foe. At the same time he had to watch every other point in North America and keep in touch with his excellent naval colleague, Admiral Digby, lest his own rear might be attacked by the three foreign enernies of England. He was even ordered off to the West Indies in the autumn. But counter-orders fortunately arrived before he",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 169 could start. Thus, surrounded by enemies in front and rear and on both flanks, he spent the seven months between August and the f ollow- ing March. At the end of March 1783 news arrived that the preliminary treaty of peace had been signed. The final treaty was not signed till his fifty-ninth birthday, the 3rd of the following September. The signature of the prelimin- aries simplified the naval and military situa- tion. But it made the situation of the Loyalists worse than ever. Compared with them the prisoners of war had been most highly favoured from the first. And yet the British prisoners had little to thank the Congress for. That they were badly fed and badly housed was not always the fault of the Americans. But that political favourites and underlings were allowed to prey on then was an inexcusable disgrace. When a prisoner complained, he was told it was the fault of the British government which would not pay for his keep ! This answer, so contrary to all the accepted usages of war, which reserve such payments till after the conclusion of peace, was no empty gibe; for when, some time before the preliminaries had been signed, the British and American commissioners met to",
         "170 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA effect an exchange of prisoners, the Americans began by claiming the immediate payment of what the British prisoners had cost them. This of course broke up the meeting at once. In the meantime the German prisoners in British pay were offered their freedom at eighty dollars a head. Then farmers came forward to buy up these prisoners at this price. But the farmers found competitors in the re- cruiting sergeants, who urged the Germans, with only too much truth, not to become 'the slaves of farmers ' but to follow ' the glorious trade of war ' against their employers, the British government. To their honour be it said, these Germans kept faith with the British, much to the surprise of the Americans, who, like many modern writers, could not under- stand that these foreign mercenaries took a professional pride in carrying out a sworn contract, even when it would pay them better to break it. The British prisoners were not put up for sale in the same way. But money sent to them had a habit of disappearing on the road-one item mentioned by Carleton amounted to six thousand pounds. If such was the happy lot of prisoners during the war, what was the wretched lot of Loyalists after the treaty of peace ? The words of one",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 171 of the many petitions sent in to Carleton will suggest the answer. ' If we have to encounter this inexpressible misfortune we beg considera- tion for our lives, fortunes, and property, and not by mere terms of treaty.' What this means cannot be appreciated unless we fully realize how strong the spirit of hate and greed had grown, and why it had grown so strong. The American Revolution had not been pro- voked by oppression, violence, and massacre. The 'chains and slavery' of revolutionary orators was only a figure of speech. The real causes were constitutional and personal; and the actual crux of the question was one of payment for defence. Of course there were many other causes at work. The social, religious, and political grudges with which so many emigrants had left the mother country had not been forgotten and were now re- vived. Commercial restrictions, however well they agreed with the spirit of the age, were galling to such keen traders. And the mere difference between colonies and motherland had produced misunderstandings on both sides. But the main provocative cause was Imperial taxation for local defence. The Thirteen Colonies could not have held their own by land or sea, much less could they",
         "172 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA have conquered their French rivals, without the Imperial forces, which, indeed, had done by far the greater part of the fighting. How was the cost to be shared between the mother country and themselves? The colonies had not been asked to pay more than their share. The point was whether they could be taxed at all by the Imperial government when they had no representation in the Imperial parliament. The government said Yes. The colonies and the opposition at home said No. As the colonies would not pay of their own accord, and as the govern- ment did not see why they should be parasites on the armed strength of the mother country, parliament proceeded to tax them. They then refused to pay under compulsion; and a complete deadlock ensued. The personal factors in this perhaps in- soluble problem were still more refractory than the constitutional. All the great ques- tions of peace and war and other foreign re- lations were settled by the mother country, which was the oily sovereign power and which alone possessed the force to make any British rights respected. The Americans supplied subordinate means and so became subordinate men when they and the Imperial forces worked",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 173 together. This, to use a homely phrase, made their leaders feel out of it. Everything that breeds trouble between militiamen and regulars, colonials and mother-countrymen, fanned the flame of colonial resentment till the leaders were able to set their followers on fire. It was a leaders' rebellion: there was no rnaddening cruelty or even oppression such as those which have produced so many re- volutions elsewhere. It was a leaders'victory: there was no general feeling that death or in- dependence were the only alternatives from the first. But as the fight went on, and Loyalists and revolutionists grew more and more bitter towards one another, the revolutionary fol- lowers found the same cause for hating the Loyalists as their leaders had found for hating the government. Many of the Loyalists be- longed to the well-educated and well-to-do classes. So the envy and greed of the revolu- tionary followers were added to the personal and political rage of their leaders. The British government had done its best for the Loyalists in the treaty of peace and had urged Carleton, who needed no urging in such a cause, to do his best as well. But the treaty was made with the Congress; and the Congress had no authority over the internal",
         "174 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA affairs of the thirteen new states, each one of which could do as it liked with its own envied and detested Loyalists. The revolu- tionists wanted some tangible spoils. The safety of peace had made the trimmers equally ' patriotic ' and equally clamorous. So the confiscation of Loyalist property soon became the order of the day. It was not the custom of that age to con- fiscate private property simply because the owners were on the losing side, still less to confiscate it under local instead of national authority. But need, greed, and resentment were stronger than any scruples. Need was the weakest, resentment the strongest of all the animating motives. The American army was in rags and its pay greatly in arrears while the British forces under Carleton were fed, clothed, and paid in the regular way. But it was the passionate resentment of the re- volutionists that perverted this exasperating difference into another 'intolerable wrong.' Washington was above such meaner measures. But when he said the Loyalists were only fit for suicide, and when Adams, another future president, said they ought to be hanged, it is little wonder that lesser men thought the tirne had come for legal looting. Those Loyalists",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 175 who best understood the temper of their late fellow-countrymen left at once. They were right. Even to be a woman was no protec- tion against confiscation in the case of Mary Phillips, sister-in-law to Beverley Robinson, a well-known Loyalist who settled in New Brunswick after the Revolution. Her case was not nearly so hard as many another. But her historic love-affair makes it the most romantic. Eight - and - twenty years before this General Braddock had marched to death and defeat beside the Monongahela with two handsome and gallant young aides-de-camp, Washington and Morris. Both fell in love with bewitching Mary Phillips. But, while Washington left her fancy-free, Morris won her heart and hand. Now that the strife was no longer against a foreign foe but between two British parties, the former aides-de-camp found themselves rivals in arms as well as love; for Colonel Morris was Carleton's right- hand man in all that concerned the Loyalists, being the official head of the department of Claims and Succour. Morris, Morgan, and Carleton were the three busiest men in New York. Forty thick manu- script volumes still show Maurice Morgan's assiduous work as Carleton's confidential",
         "176 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA secretary. But Morris had the more heart- breaking duty of the three, with no relief, day after sorrow-laden day, from the anguishing appeals of Loyalist widows, orphans, and other ruined refugees. No sooner had the dire news arrived that peace had been made with the Congress, and that each of the thir- teen United States was free to show un- covenanted mercies towards its own Loyalists, than the exodus began. Five thousand five hundred and ninety-three Loyalists sailed for Halifax in the first convoy on the 17th of April with a strong recommendation from Carleton to Governor Parr of Nova Scotia. ' Many of these are of the first families and born to the fairest possessions. I therefore beg that you will have them properly con- sidered.' Shipping was scarce; for the hostility of the whole foreign naval world had made enormous demands on the British navy and mercantile marine. So six thousand Loyalists had to march overland to join Carleton's vessels at New York, some of them from as far south as Charlottesville, Virginia. They were carefully shepherded by Colonel Alured Clarke, of whom we shall hear again. Meanwhile Carleton and Washington had exchanged the usual compliments on the con-",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 177 clusion of peace and had met each other on the 6th of May at Tappan, where they dis- cussed the exchange of prisoners. By the terms of the treaty the British were to evacu- ate New York, their last foothold in the new republic, with all practicable dispatch ; so, as summer changed into autumn, the Congress became more and more impatient to see the last of them. But Carleton would not go without the Loyalists, whose many tributary streams of misery were still flowing into New York. In September, when the treaty of peace was ratified in Europe, the Congress asked Carleton point-blank to name the date of his own departure. But he replied that this was impossible and that the more the Loyalists were persecuted the longer he would be obliged to stay. The correspondence be- tween him and the Congress teems with com- plaints and explanations. The Americans were very anxious lest the Loyalists should take away any goods and chattels not their own, particularly slaves. Carleton was dis- posed to consider slaves as human beings, though slavery was still the law in the British oversea dominions, and so the Americans felt uneasy lest he might discriminate between their slaves and other chattels. Reams of the F. B. C. M",
         "178 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Carleton papers are covered with descriptive lists of claimed and counter-claimed niggers- Julius Cæsars, Jupiters, Venuses, Dianas, and so on, who were either 'stout wenches' and 'likely fellows' or 'incurably lazy' and 'old worn-outs.' Perhaps, when a slave wished to remain British, and his case was nicely balanced be- tween the claimants and the counter-claimants, Carleton was a little inclined to give him the benefit of the doubt. But with other forms of disputed property he was too severe to please all Loyalists. A typical case of resti- tution in Canada will show how differently the two governments viewed the rights of private property. Mercier and Halsted, two Quebec rebels, owned a wharf and the frame of a warehouse in 1775. It was Arnold's inter- cepted letter to Mercier that gave Carleton's lieutenant, Cramahé, the first warning of danger from the south. Halsted was Major Caldwell's miller at the time and took advan- tage of his position to give his employer's flour to Arnold's army, in which he served as commissary throughout the siege. Just after the peace of 1783 Mercier and Halsted laid claim to their former property, which they had abandoned for eight years and on which the",
         "GUARDING THE LOYALISTS 179 government had meanwhile built a provision store, making use of the original frame. The case was complicated by many details too long for notice here. But the British govern- ment finally gave the two rebels the original property, plus thirteen years' rent, less the cost of government works erected in the meantime. Al the documents are still in Quebec. Property was troublesome enough. But people were worse. And Carleton's diffi- culties increased as the autumn wore on. The first great harrying of the Loyalists drove more than thirty thousand from their homes ; and about twenty-five thousand of these em- barked at New York. Then there were the remnants of twenty Loyalist corps to pension, settle, or employ. There were also the British prisoners to receive, besides ten thousand German mercenaries. Add to all this the regular garrison and the general oversight of every British interest in North America, from the Floridas to Labrador, remember the im- placable enemy in front, and we may faintly imagine what Carleton had to do before he could report that ' His Majesty's troops and such remaining Loyalists as chose to emigrate were successfully withdrawn on the 25th [of",
         "z8o THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA November] without the smallest circumstance of irregularity.' Thus ended one of the greatest acts in the drama of the British Empire, the English- speaking peoples, or the world ; and thus, for the second time, Carleton, now in his sixtieth year, apparently ended his own long service in America. He had left Canada, after saving her from obliteration, because, so long as he remained her governor, the war minister at home remained her enemy. He had then returned to serve in New York, and had stayed there to the bitter end, because there was no other man whom the new government would trust to command the rearguard of the Empire in retreat.",
         "CHAPTER IX FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 1786-1796 CARLETON now enjoyed two years of uninter- rupted peace at his country seat in England. His active career seemed to have closed at last. He had no taste for party politics. He was not anxious to fill any position of civil or military trust, even if it had been pressed upon him. And he had said farewell to America for good and all when he had left New York. Though as full of public spirit as before and only just turned sixty, he bid fair to spend the rest of his life as an English country gentle- man. His young wife was well contented with her lot. His manly boys promised to become worthy followers of the noble pro- fession of arms. And the overseeing of his little estate occupied his time very pleasantly indeed. Like most healthy Englishmen he was devoted to horses, and, unlike some others, he was very successful with his thoroughbreds. 181",
         "182 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA He had first bought a place near Maiden- head, beside the Thames, which is nowhere lovelier than in that sylvan neighbourhood. Then he bought the present family seat of Greywill Hill near the little village of Odiham in Hampshire. As an ex-governor and com- mander-in-chief, a county magnate, a person- age of great importance to the Empire, and the one victorious British general in the un- happy American war, he had more than earned a peerage. But it was not till 1786, on the eve of his sixty-second birthday, and at a time when his services were urgently required again, that he received it. Needless to say this peerage had nothing whatever to do with his acceptance of another self-sacrificing duty. It was not given till several months after he had promised to return to Canada; and he would certainly have refused it if it had been held out to him as an inducement to go there. He became Baron Dorchester and was granted the not very extravagant addition to his income of a thousand pounds a year payable during four lives, his own, his wife's, and those of his two eldest sons. His elevation to the House of Lords met with the almost unanimous approval of his fellow-peers, in marked con- trast to the open hostility they had shown",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 183 towards his old enemy, Lord George Germain, when that vile wrecker had been ' kicked upstairs' among them. The Carleton motto, crest, and supporters are all most appropriate. The crest is a strong right arm with the hand clenched firmly on an arrow. The motto is Quondam his vicimus armis-We used to conquer with these arms. The supporters are two beavers, typifying Canada, while their respective collars, one a naval the other a military coronet, show how her British life was won and saved and has been kept. Carleton was a man of great reserve and self-control. But his kindly nature rnust have responded to the cordial welcome which he received on his return to Quebec in October 1786. It was not without reason that the people of Canada rejoiced to have him back as their leader. Al that the Indians imagined the Great White Father to be towards them- selves he was in reality towards both red man and white. Stern, when the occasion forced him to be stern, just in all his dealings between man and man, dignified and courteous in all his ways, a soldier through every inch of his stalwart six feet, he was a ruler with whom no one ever dreamt of taking liberties. But",
         "184 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA neither did any deserving one in trouble ever hesitate to lay the most confidential case be- fore him in the full assurance that his head and heart were at the service of all committed to his care. And no other governor, before his time or since, ever inspired his followers with such a firm belief that all would turn out for the best so long as he was in command. This power of inspiring confidence was now badly needed. Everything in Canada was still provisional. Owing to the war the Que- bec Act of 1774 had never been thoroughly enforced. Then, when the war was over, the Loyalists arrived and completely changed the circumstances which the act had been de- signed to meet. The next constitution, the Canada Act of 1791, was of a very different character. During the seventeen years be- tween these two constitutions all that could be done was to make the best of a very con- fusing state of flux. Not that the Quebec Act was a dead letter-far from it-but simply that it could not go beyond restoring the privileges of the French-Canadian priests and seigneurs within the area then effec- tively occupied by the French-Canadian race. Carleton, as we have seen, had faced its problem for the first four years. Haldimand",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 185 had carried on the government under its pro- visions for the following six. Hamilton and Hope, successive lieutenant-governors, had bridged the two years between Haldimand's retirement and Carleton's second appoint- ment. Now Carleton was to pick up the threads and make what he could of the tangled skein for the next five years. Haldimand had not been popular with either of the two chief parties into which the leading French Canadians were divided. The seigneurs had nothing like the same regard for a Swiss soldier of fortune that they had for aristocratic British commanders like Murray and Carleton. The clergy also preferred these Anglicans to such a strong Swiss Protestant. The habitants and agitators, who were far less favourable to the new régime, had passionately resented Haldimand's firmness at times of crisis. But, despite all this French-Canadian animus, he was not such an absolute martinet as some writers would have us think. The war with France and with the American Revolutionists required strong government in Canada; while the influx of Loyalists had introduced an entirely new set of most perplexing circum- stances. On the whole, Haldimand had done very well in spite of many personal and public",
         "186 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA drawbacks; and it was through no special fault of his, nor yet of Hope's, that the threads which Carleton picked up formed such a perversely tangled skein. The troubles that now dogged the great conciliator's every step were of all kinds- racial, religious, social, political, military, diplomatic, legal. The confusion resulting from the intermixture of French and English civil laws had become a great deal more con- founded since he had left Canada eight years before. The old proportions of races and religions to each other had changed most dis- turbingly. The Loyalists were of quite a different social class fron the English-speaking immigrants of earlier days. They wanted a parliament, public schools, and many other things new to the country; and they were the sort of people who had a right to have them. The problem of defence was always a vexed one with the inadequate military forces at hand and the insuperable difficulties concern- ing the militia. The British still held the Western forts pending the settlement of the frontier and the execution of the treaty of peace in full. This naturally annoyed the American government and gave Carleton end- less trouble. But more serious still was the",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 187 ceaseless western march of the American backwoodsmen, who were everywhere in con- flict with the Indians. The Indians, in their turn, were confused between the British and Americans under the new conditions. They and their ever-receding rights and territories had not been mentioned in the treaty. But, seeing that they would be better off under British than under American rule, they were inclined to take sides accordingly. There were now no openly hostile sides to take. But, for all that, the British posts in the hinterland looked like weak little islands which might be suddenly engulfed in the sea of Indian troubles raging round them. Then, at the other end of the British line, there were the three maritime provinces to watch over. New Brunswick had been divided off from Nova Scotia and Prince Edward Island had been taken from the direct supervision of the home authorities and placed under the com- inand of the new governor at Quebec. Thus Carleton had to deal directly with everything that happened from the far West to Gaspé, while dealing indirectly with the three mari- time provinces and all the troubles that proved too much for their own lieutenant-governors. There was no chance of concentrating on one",
         "188 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA thing at a time. Nothing would wait. The governor had to watch the writhing tangle as a whole during every minute he devoted to any one kinked and knotted thread. Fortunately there were some good men in office on both sides of the Atlantic. Lords Sydney and Grenville, the two cabinet ministers with whom Carleton had most to do, were both sensible and sympathetic. Years afterwards Grenville, the favourite cousin of Pitt, became the colleague of Fox at the head of the celebrated ' Ministry of All the Talents.' Hope was an acceptable lieutenant-governor, and his successor, Sir Alured Clarke, was better still. François Bailly, the coadjutor Roman Catholic bishop of Quebec, who had gone to England as French tutor to Carleton's children, was a most enlightened cleric. So too was Charles Inglis, the Anglican bishop of Nova Scotia, appointed in 1787. He was the first Canadian bishop of the Anglican communion and his diocese comprised the whole of British North America. William Smith, the new chief justice, was as different from Carleton's last chief justice, Livius, as angels are from devils. Smith had been an excellent chief justice of his native New York in the old colonial days, and, like Inglis, was a very",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 189 ardent Loyalist. He respected all reason- able French-Canadian peculiarities. But he favoured the British-Constitutional way of ' broadening down from precedent to prece- dent ' rather than the French way of referring to a supposedly infallible written regulation. We shall soon meet him as a far-seeing states- man. But he well deserves an honoured place in Carnadian history for his legal services alone. To him, more than to any other man, is due the nicely balanced adjustments which eventually harmonized the French and Eng- lish codes into a body of laws adapted to the extraordinary circumstances of the province of Quebec. Besides the committee on laws Carleton had nominated three other active committees of his council, one on police, another on educa- tion, and a third on trade and commerce. The police committee was of the usual kind and dealt with usual problems in the usual way. But the education committee brought out all the vexed questions of French and English, Protestant and Roman Catholic, pro- gressive and reactionary. Strangely enough, the sharpest personal controversy was that between Hubert, the Roman Catholic bishop of Quebec, and his coadjutor Bailly. Hubert",
         "190 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA enumerated all the institutions already en- gaged in educational work and suggested that 'rest and be thankful' was the only proper attitude for the committee to assume. But Bailly very neatly pointed out that his respected superior's real opinions could not be those attributed to him over his own signature because they were at variance with the facts. Hubert had said that the curés were spreading education with most com- mendable zeal, had repudiated the base in- sinuation that only three or four people in each parish could read and write, and had wound up by thinking that while there was so much land to clear the farmers would do better to keep their sons at home than send them to a university, where they would be under professors so ' unprejudiced' as to have no definite views on religion. Bailly argued that the bishop could not rnean what these words seemed to imply, as the logical conclusion would be to wait till Canada was cleared right up to the polar circle. In the end the committee made three very sanguine recommendations: a free common school in every parish, a secondary school in every town or district, and an absolutely non-sectarian central university. This educational ladder",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA i9' was never set up. There was nothing to support either end of it. The financial side was one difficulty. The Jesuits' estates were intended to be made over into educational endowments under government control. But Amherst's claim that they had been granted to him in 1760 was not settled for forty years ; and by that time all chance of carrying out the committee's intentions was seen to be hopeless. Commerce was another burning question and one of much more immediate concern. In 1791 the united populations of all the provinces amounted to only a quarter of a million, of whom at least one-half were French Canadians. Quebec and Montreal had barely ten thousand citizens apiece. But the com- mercial classes, mostly English-speaking, had greatly increased in numbers, ability, and social standing. The camp-following gangs of twenty years before had now either dis- appeared or sunk down to their appropriate level. So petitions from the ' British mer- chants' required and received much more con- sideration than formerly. The Loyalists had not yet had time to start in business. Al their energies were needed in hewing out their future homes. But two parts of the American",
         "192 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Republic, Vermont and Kentucky, were very anxious to do business with the British at any reasonable price. Some of their citizens were even ready for a change of allegiance if the terms were only good enough. Vermont wanted a ' free trade ' outlet to the St Lawrence by way of the Richelieu. The rapids between St Johns and Chambly lay in British territory. But Vermont was ready to join in building a canal and would even becone British to make sure. The old Green Mountain Boys had changed their tune. Ethan Allen himself had buried the hatchet and, like his brother, become Carleton's friendly correspondent. He frankly ex- plained that what Vermonters really wanted was ' property not liberty ' and added that they would stand no coercion from the American government. About the same time Kentucky was bent on getting an equally ' free trade ' outlet to the Gulf of Mexico by way of the Mississippi. The fact that France, Spain, the British Empire, and the United States might all be involved in war over it did not trouble the conspirators in the least. The central authority of the new Republic was still weak. The individual states were still ready to fly asunder. Federal taxation",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 193 was greatly feared. Anything that savoured of federal interference with state rights was passionately resented. The general spirit of the westerners was that of the exploiting pioneer in a virgin wilderness-a law unto itself alone. There were various plans for opening the coveted Mississippi. One was to join Spain. Another was to seize New Orleans, turn out the French, and bring in the British. Then, to make the plot com- plete, the French minister to the United States was asking permission to make a tour through Canada at the very time when Carleton was sending home reams of documents bearing on the impending troubles. The letters ex- changed on this subject are perfect models of politeness. But Carleton's answer was an emphatic No. Foreign complications were thickening fast. The French Revolution had already begun, though its effect was not yet felt in Canada. The American government was anxiously watching its refractory states, while an anti- British political party was making headway in the South. As if this was not enough to engage whatever attention Carleton had to spare from the internal affairs of Canada, he suddenly heard that the Spaniards had been F.B.C. N",
         "194 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA seizing British vessels trading to a British post on Vancouver Island.1 This Nootka Affair, which nearly brought on a war with Spain in 1790, was settled in London and Madrid. But the threat of war added to Carleton's anxieties. Meanwhile the governor was busily em- ployed with an immigration problem. It was desirable that the English - speaking immi- grants should settie on the land with the least possible friction between them and the French Canadians. The French Canadians differed among themselves. But no such differences brought them any closer to their new neigh- bours on questions of land settlement. The French had granted lands in seigneuries. The British would hear of nothing but free and common socage. French farms were measured by the arpent and were staked out in long and narrow oblongs. British farms were measured by the acre and staked out 'on the square.' Language, laws, religion, manners and customs, ways of life, were also different. So there was hardly any inter- mixture of settlements. The French Cana- dians remained where they were. Most of the new Anglo-Canadians settled in the Maritime Provinces or moved west into what 1 See Pioneers of the Pacifie Coast in this Series.",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 195 is now Ontario. A few settled in rural Quebec on lands outside the line of seigneuries. The Eastern Townships, that part of the pro- vince lying east of the Richelieu and nearest the American frontier, absorbed many English, Irish, and Scots, as well as a good many Americans who were attracted by cheap land. Ontario, or Upper Canada, received still more Americans, who were to be a thorn in the side of the British during the War of 1812. But Carleton's work comprised much more than this. There were the Church of England, the Post Office, a refractory lieutenant- governor down in Prince Edward Island, two royal visitors, and many other distracting matters. The only Anglican see thus far established was at Halifax; but the bishop there had authority over the whole country and the government intended to establish the Church of England in Canada and endow it. The Presbyterians also petitioned for the establishment of the Scottish Church. The fortunes or misfortunes of the Clergy Reserves belong to another chapter of Canadian history. But the root of their good or evil was planted in the time of Carleton. The postal service was surrounded by enormous difficulties-the vast extent of wild country, the few towns,",
         "196 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA the long winters, the poverty of the people. The question of the winter port was even then a live one between St John and Halifax. Each of these towns asserted its advantages and promised twelve trips a year and connection with Quebec overland by means of walking postmen till a bush road should be cut from Quebec to the sea. In Prince Edward Island the old lieutenant-governor, Walter Patterson, declined to make way for the new one, Edmund Fanning. In the end Patterson gave up the contest. But the incident, trivial as it now appears, shows what a governor-general had to face in the early days when each pro- vince had queer little ways of its own. Patterson had no precise official reason. But he said he could not go home to answer charges he did not understand and leave an island which had been his very successful hobby for so many years ! The people sided with him so vigorously that time had to be given them to cool down before the transfer could be peaceably effected. A judge whose court is in perpetual session or a commander whose inadequate forces are continually surrounded by prospective enemies has little time for the amenities of purely social life. So Carleton generally left his young",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 197 consort to rule the viceregal court at the Château St Louis with a perfect blend of London and Versailles. Two Princes of the Blood, however, demanded more than the usual attention from the governor. Prince William Henry, afterwards King William IV, was the first member of the Royal Family to set foot in the New World when he arrived in H.M.S. Pegasus in 1787. He was the proverbial jolly Jack Tar, extremely affable to everybody; and he quickly won golden opinions from all who met him, except perhaps from Lady Dorchester and sundry would-be partners for his duty dances. Philippe Aubert de Gaspé and other privileged chroniclers record with slightly shocked delight how often he would break loose from Lady Dorchester's designing care, long before she thought it right for him to do so, and ' com- mand ' his partners for their pretty faces instead of by precedence. At Sorel the people were so carried away by their enthusiasm that they insisted on changing the name of their little town to William Henry. Happily this name never took root in public sentiment and the old one soon came back to stay. The second member of the Royal Family to come to Canada was Prince Edward, Duke",
         "198 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA of Kent, fourth son of George III, father of Queen Victoria and grandfather of Prince Arthur, Duke of Connaught, who became the first royal governor-general in 1911, exactly a hundred and twenty years later. The Duke of Kent would have gladly returned to Quebec as governor-general, and the people would have gladly welcomed him. But he was not a favourite with the government at home, and so he never came. There was no doubt about his being a popular favourite in Quebec during the three years he spent there as colonel of the 7th Fusiliers. Nor has he been for- gotten to the present day. Kent House is still the name of his quarters in the town as well as of his country residence at Mont- morency Falls seven miles away, while the only new opening ever made in the walls is called Kent Gate. The duke made fast friends with several of the seigneurial families, more especially with the de Salaberrys, whose manor-house at Beauport stood half-way between Mont- morency and Quebec and not far from Montcalm's headquarters in 1759. The de Salaberrys were a military family. All the sons went into the Army and one became the hero of Châteauguay in the War of 1812. But",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 199 the duke mixed freely with many other people than the local aristocracy. He was young, high-spirited, and loved adventure, as was proved by his subsequent gallantry at Mar- tinique. He was also fond of driving round incognito, a habit which on at least one occasion obliged him to put his skill at boxing to good use. This was at Charlesbourg, a village near Quebec, where he was watching the fun at the first election ever held. Perhaps, frorm a meticulously constitutional point of view, the scene of a hotly contested election was not quite the place for Princes of the Blood. But, however that might be, when the duke saw two electors pommelling a third, who happened to be a friend of his, he dashed in to the rescue and floored both of them with a neatly planted right and left. One of these -men, who lived to see King Edward VII arrive in i86o, as Prince of Wales, always took the greatest pride in telling successive generations of voters how Queen Victoria's father had knocked him down. Like his brother before him the duke was very fond of dancing, and kept many a re- luctant senior and many a tired-out chaperone up till all hours at the grand ball given in honour of his twenty-fourth birthday. Also",
         "2oo THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA like his brother he was inclined to reduce his duty dances to a minimum, much to Lady Dorchester's dismay. She had gone home with her husband for two years shortly after the duke's arrival. But she had seen enough of him, and was to see enough again on her return, to make her regret the good old tîmes of more exacting ceremony. To her dying day, half a century later, she kept up a pro- digious stateliness of manner. Before meals she expected the whole company to assemble and remain standing till she had made her royal progress through the room. She was a living anachronism for many years before her death, with her high-heeled, gold-buttoned, scarlet-coloured shoes, her Marie-Antoinette coiffure raised high above her head and inter- laced with ribbons, her elaborately gorgeous dress, her intricate array of ornaments, and her long, jet-black, official-looking cane. But she was no anachronism to herself ; for she still lived in the light of other days, in the fondly remembered times when, as the vice- reine of the Château St Louis, she helped her consort to settle nice points of etiquette and maintain a dignity befitting His Majesty's chosen representative. How did the seigneurs rank among themselves and with the leading",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 2o English-speaking people ? Who were to dance in the state minuet ? Should dancing cease when the bishops came in, and for how long ? Was that curtsy dropped quite low enough to her viceregal self, and did that débutante offer her blushing cheek in quite the proper way to Carleton when he graciously gave her the presentation kiss ? How immeasurably far away it all seems now, that stately little court where the echoes of a dead Versailles lived on for seven years after the fall of the Bastille! And yet there is still one citizen of Quebec whose early partners were chaperoned by ladies who had danced the minuet with Lord and Lady Dorchester. The two royal visits were not without their political significance-using the word political in its larger meaning. But the three years between them-that is, i788-89-9o-formed the really pregnant time of constitutional de- velopment, when the Canada Act of 1791 was taking shape in the minds of its chief authors -Carleton and Smith in Canada, Grenville and Pitt in England. The Loyalists and the English-speaking merchaits of Quebec and Montreal took good care to make themselves heard at every stage of the proceedings. Most",
         "202 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA French Canadians would have preferred to be left without the suspected blessings of a parlia- ment. The clergy and seigneurs wished for a continuance of the Quebec Act, and the habitants wanted they knew not what, pro- vided it would enable them to get more and give less. The English-speaking people, on the other hand, were all for a parliament. But they differed widely as to what kind of parlia- ment would suit their purpose best. As a rule they acquiesced, with a more or less bad grace, in the necessity of admitting French Canadians on the same terms as themselves. If Canada, without the Maritime Provinces, should be taken as a whole then the French Canadians would only be in a moderate majority. If, however, two provinces, Upper Canada and Lower Canada, were to be erected, then the English-speaking minority in Lower Canada would be outvoted three or four to one. There was a third alternative: no less than the establishment of a regular Dominion of British North America in 1790, a step which might have saved much trouble between that time and the Confederation of 1867. William Smith was its strongest advocate, Carleton its most cautious and judicious supporter. The",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 203 chief justice was in favour of federating Upper and Lower Canada with the Maritime Pro- vinces and Newfoundland into a single dominion. Each of the six provinces would have its own parliament under a lieutenant- governor, while there would also be a central parliament under a governor-general. Carleton forwarded the suggestion to the home govern- ment; but he nowhere committed himself to any very definite scheme. His own preference was for keeping the existing province of Quebec a little longer, then dividing it, and afterwards drawing in the other provinces. The chief justice preferred to make a constitu- tion. The governor preferred to let it grow. The home government's preference could not be stated better than in Grenville's dispatch to Carleton of the 2oth of October 1789: 'The general object is to assimilate the constitution to that of Great Britain as nearly as the differ- ence arising from the manners of the People and from the present situation of the Pro- vince will admit. . . . Attention is due to the prejudices and habits of the French In- habitants and every caution should be used to continue to them the enjoyment of those civil and religious Rights which were secured to them by the Capitulation or which have",
         "204 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA since been granted by the liberal and en- lightened spirit of the British Government.' Except for its rather too self-righteous con- clusion this confidential announcement really is an admirable statement of the 'liberal and enlightened' views which prevailed at West- minster. The bill, postponed in 1790, was introduced by Pitt himself in the House of Commons on the 7th of March 1791. Sixteen days later Adam Lymburner, a representative merchant of Quebec, whom Carleton described as 'a quiet, decent man, not unfriendly to the ad- ministration,' pleaded for hours before the committee of the House of Commons against the division of the province. All the English- speaking minority in the prospective pro- vince of Lower Canada were afraid of being swamped by the French-Canadian vote, and so of being hampered in liberty and trade. The London merchants naturally backed Lymburner. Fox opposed the bill as not being liberal enough. Burke flared up into the speech which led to his final breach with Fox. Pitt, the pilot who was to weather far greater storms in the years to come, eventually got the bill through both Houses with sub- stantial majorities. On the 14th of May it",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 205 became law. Quebec and Ontario were parted for good, notwithstanding the legislative union of fifty years later. The Canada Act, or, as it is better known, the Constitutional Act, cut off Upper Canada. Lower Canada was now the old Quebec re- duced to its right size, endowed with clarified laws and a brand-new parliament, and made as acceptable as possible to the English- speaking minority without any injustice to the vastly greater French majority. Quebec, Three Rivers, Montreal, and Sorel got each two members in the new parliament, an allot- ment which ensured a certain representation of the 'British' merchants. The franchise was the same in both provinces : in the country parts a forty-shilling freehold or its equivalent, and in the towns either a five- pound annual ownership value or twice that for a tenant. The Crown gave up all taxation except commercial duties, which were to be applied solely for the benefit of the provinces. Lands outside the seigneuries were to be in free and common socage, while seigneurial tenure itself could be converted into freehold on petition. One-seventh of the Crown lands was reserved for the endowment of the Church of England. The Crown kept all rights of",
         "'206 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA veto and appointment. The legislatures were snall in membership. The Upper Houses could be made hereditary; though the actual tenure was never more than for life during good behaviour. Carleton favoured the here- ditary principle whenever it could be applied with advantage. But he knew the ups and downs of colonial fortunes too well to believe that Canada was ready for any such ex- periment. . No one dreamt of having what is now known as responsible government, that is, an execu- tive sitting in the legislature and responsible to the legislature for its acts. Nor was the greatest of all parliamentary powers-the power of the purse-given outright. This, however, was owing to simple force of circum- stances and not to any desire of abridging the liberties of the people. The fact is that at this time eighty per cent of the total civil expenditure had to be paid by the home government. It is frequently ignored that the mother country paid most of Canada's bills till long after the War of 1812, that she paid nearly all the naval and military accounts for longer still, and that she has borne far more than her own share of the common defence down to the present day,",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 207 The new constitution came into force on the 26th of December 1791 ; and, for the first time, Upper and Lower Canada had the right to elect their own representatives. Assemblies, of course, were nothing new in British North America. Nova Scotia had an assembly in 1758, the year that Louisbourg was taken. Prince Edward Island had one in 1773, the year before the Quebec Act was passed. New Brunswick had one in 1786, the year Carleton began his second term. But assemblies still had all the charm of novelty in 'Canada proper.' Perhaps it would be more appro- priate to say that Upper Canada experienced more charm than novelty while Lower Canada experienced more novelty than charm. The Anglo-Canadians in all five provinces were used to parliaments in America. Their an- cestors had been used to them for centuries in England. So the little parliament of Upper Canada at Newark passed as many bills in five weeks as that of Lower Canada passed in seven months. The fact that there were fifty members in the Assembly at Quebec, while there were only half as many in both chambers at Newark, doubtless had something to do with it. But the fact that the Quebec parliament was an innovation, while the one",
         "208 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA at Newark was a simple development, had very much more. There is no need to follow the course of legislation in any of the five provinces. As most of the civil and practically all the naval and military expenditure had to be met by the Imperial Treasury, and as Canada was five parts and no whole from her own parliament-, ary point of view, the legislation required for a grand total of two hundred and fifty thousand people could not be of the national kind. But at Quebec the scene, the setting, and the unheard-of innovation itself all give a special interest to every detail of the opening ceremony on the 17th of December 1792. Carleton was in England, so the Speech from the Throne was read by the lieutenant- governor, Major-General Sir Alured Clarke, Half of the Upper House and two-thirds of the Lower were French Canadians. A French- Canadian member was nominated for the speakership and elected unanimously. Both races were for the most part represented by members whose official title of ' Honourable Gentlemen' was not at all a misnomer. The French members of the Assembly were half distrustful both of it and of themselves. But they knew how to add grace and dignity to a",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 209 very notable occasion. The old Bishop's Palace served as the Houses of Parliament and sa continued for many years to come. It was a solid rather than a stately pile. But it stood on a commanding site at the head of Mountain Hill between the Grand Battery and the Château St Louis. Every one was in aniform or in what corresponded to court dress. Round the throne stood many officers in their red and gold, conspicuous among them the Duke of Kent. In front sat the Executive and Legislative Councillors, corresponding to the modern cabinet ministers and senators. Their roll, as well as the Assembly's, bore many names that recalled the glories of the old régime--St Ours, Longueuil, de Lanau- dière, Boucherville, de Salaberry, de Lotbinière, and many more. The Council chamber was crowded in every part long before the governor arrived. ' The Ladies introduced into the House ' were ' without Hat, Cloak, or Bonnet,' the ' Doorkeeper of His Majesty's Council ' having taken good care to see them ' leave the same in the Great Committee Room previous to their Introduction.' ' The Ladies attached to His Excellency's Suite ' were admitted ' within the railing or body of the House ' and ' accommodated with the seats of the members F.B.C. O",
         "2ao THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA as far as possible.' Outwardly it was all very much the same in principle as the opening of any other British parliament-the escort, guard, and band, the royal salute, the brilliant staff, the scarlet cloth of state, the few and quiet members of the Upper House, the many of the Lower, jostling each other to get a good place near Mr Speaker at the bar, the radiant ladies, the crowded galleries corniced with in- quiring faces and craned necks, the Gentlemen Ushers and their quaint bows, the Speech from the Throne and the occasional lifting of His Excellency's hat, the retiring in full state; and then the ebbing away of all the sightseers, their eddying currents of packed humanity in the halls and passages, the porch, the door, the emptying street. But inwardly what a world of difference! For here was the first British parliament in which legislators of foreign birth and blood and language were shaping British laws as British subjects. In September 1793 Carleton returned from his two years' absence and was welcomed more warmly than ever. Quebec blazed with illuminations. The streets swarmed with eager crowds. The first session of the first parliament had been better than any one had",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 211 dared to hope for. There was a general tendency to give the new constitution a fair trial ; and all classes looked to Carleton to make the harmony that had been attained both permanent and universal. Dr Jacob Mountain, first Anglican bishop of Quebec, also arrived shortly afterwards and was warmly greeted by the Roman Catholic pre- late, who embraced him, saying, ' It 's time you came to shepherd your own flock.' Mountain was statesman and churchman in one. He had been chosen by the elder Pitt to be the younger's tutor and then chosen by the younger to be his private secretary. The fact that the Anglican bishop of Quebec was then and for many years afterwards a sort of Canadian chaplain-general to the Imperial troops and that most of the leading officials and leading Loyalists belonged to the Church of England made him a personage of great im- portance. It was fortunate that, as in the case of Inglis down in Halifax, the choice could not have fallen on a better man or on one-who knew better how to win the esteem of communions other than his own. This same year (1793) died William Smith, full of honours. But the next year his excellent successor arrived in the person of William",
         "212 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Osgoode, the new chief justice, an eminent English lawyer who had served for two years as chief justice of Upper Canada and whose name is commemorated in Osgoode Hall, Toronto. He had corne out on the distinct understanding that no fees were to be attached to his office, only a definite salary. This was a great triumph for Carleton, who certainly practised what he preached. So far, so good. But the third conspicuous new arrival, John Graves Sirncoe, lieutenant- governor of Upper Canada, who had come out the year before, was a great deal less to Carleton's liking. Simcoe was a good officer who threw himself heart and soul into the work of settling the new province. He won the affectionate regard of his people and is gratefully remembered by their posterity. But he was too exclusively of his own pro- vince in his civil and military outlook and was disposed to ignore Carleton as his official chief. Moreover, he was appointed in spite of Carleton's strongly expressed preference for Sir John Johnson, who, to all appearances, was the very man for the post. Sir William Johnson, the first baronet, had been the great British leader of the Indians and a person of much consequence throughout America. His",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 213 son John inherited many of his good qualities, thoroughly understood the West and its prob- lems, was a devoted Loyalist all through the Revolution, when he raised the King's Royal Regiment of New York, and would have been second only to Carleton himself in the eyes of all Canadians, old and new. But the govern- ment thought his private interests too great for his public duty-an excellent general principle, though misapplied in this particu- lar case. At any rate, Simcoe came instead, and the friction began at once. Simcoe's commission clearly made him subordinate to Carleton. Yet Simcoe made appointments without consulting his superior and argued the point after he had been brought to book. He communicated directly with the home govern- ment over his superior's head and was not rebuked by the minister to whom he wrote -Henry Dundas, afterwards first Viscount Melville. Dundas, indeed, was half inclined to snub Carleton. Simcoe desired to establish military posts wherever he thought they would best promote immediate settlement, a policy which would tend to sap both the govern- ment's resources and the self-reliance of the settlers. He also wished to fix the capital at London instead of York, now Toronto, and to",
         "214 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA make York instead of Kingston the naval base for Lake Ontario. Thus the friction con- tinued. At length Carleton wrote to the Duke of Portland, Pitt's home secretary, say- ing: 'All command, civil and nilitary, being thus disorganized and without remedy, your Grace will, I hope, excuse my anxiety for the arrival of my successor, who may have authority sufficient to restore order, lest these insubordinations should extend to mutiny among the troops and sedition among the people.' That was in November 1795. The government, however, took no decisive action, and next year both Carleton and Simcoe left Canada for ever. When this unfortunate quarrel began (1793) Canada was in grave danger of being attacked by both the French and the American re- publics. The danger, however, had been greatly lessened by Jay's Treaty of 1794 and was to be still further lessened (1796) by the transfer of the Western Posts to the United States and by the presidential election which gave the Federal party a new lease of power, though no longer under Washington. Had Carleton remained in Canada these felicitous events would have offered him a unique opportunity of strengthening the friendly ties",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 215 between the British and the Americans in a way which might have saved some trouble later on. But that was not to be. To understand the dangers which threat- ened Canada during the last three years of Carleton's rule we must go back to February 1793, when revolutionary France declared war on England and there then began that titanic struggle which only ended twenty-two years later on the field of Waterloo. The Americans were divided into two parties, one disposed to be friendly towards Great Britain, the other unfriendly. The names these parties then bore must not be confused with those borne by their political offspring at the present day. The Federals, progenitors of the present Republicans, formed the friendly party under Washington, Hamilton, and Jay. The Republicans, progenitors of the present Democrats, formed the unfriendly party under Jefferson, Madison, and Randolph. The Federals were in power, the Republicans in opposition. When the Republicans got into power in 18o1 under Jefferson they pursued their anti-British policy till they finally brought on the War of 1812 under the pre- sidency of Madison. The strength of the peace party lay in the North : that of the war",
         "216 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA party lay in the South. The peaceful Federals, now that Independence had been gained, were in favour of meeting the amicable British government half-way. When Pitt came into power in 1783 he at once held out the olive branch. Now, ten years later, the more far- seeing statesmen on both sides were preparing to confirm the new friendship in the practical form of Jay's Treaty, which put the United States into what is at present known as a most-favoured-nation position with regard to British trade and commerce. Moreover, Washington and his Northern Federals much preferred a British Canada to a French one, while Jefferson and the Southern Republicans thought any stick was good enough to beat the British dog with. The Jeffersonians eagerly seized on the reports of a speech which Carleton made to the Miamis, who lived just south of Detroit, and used it to the utmost as a means of stirring up anti-British feeling. Carleton had said: 'You are witnesses that we have acted in the most peaceable manner and borne the language and conduct of the United States with patience. But I believe our patience is almost exhausted.' Applied to the vexed questions of the Western Posts, of the lawless",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 217 ways of the exterminating American pioneers, and of the infinitely worse jobbing politicians behind them, this language was mildness itself. But in view of the high statesmanship of Washington and his government it was in- judicious. Al the same, Dundas, more especi- ally because he was a cabinet minister, was even more injudicious when he adopted a tone of reproof towards Carleton, whose great services, past and present, entitled him to unusual respect and confidence. The negotia- tions for Jay's Treaty were then in progress in London, and Jefferson saw his chance of injurîng both the American and British govern- ments by magnifying Carleton's speech into an ' unwarrantable outrage.' He also hoped that an Indian war would upset the treaty and bring on a British war as well. And the prospect did look encouragingly black in the West, where the American general Wayne was ready waiting south of Lake Erie, while the trade in scalps was unusually brisk. Forty dollars was the regular market price for an ordinary Indian's scalp. But as much as a thousand was offered for Simon Girty's in the hope of getting that inconvenient British scout put quickly out of the way. Nearer home Jefferson and his band of demagogues",
         "218 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA had other arguments as well. The Federal North would suffer most by war, while the Republican South might use war as a means of repudiating all the debts she owed to Englishmen. This would have been a very different thing from the insolvency of the Continental Congress during the Revolution. It was dire want, not financial infamy, that made the Revolutionary paper money ' not worth a Continental.' But it would have been sheer theft for the Jeffersonian South to have made its honest obligations 'rotten as a Pennsylvanian bond.' The wild French-Revolutionary rage that swept through the South now fanned the flame and made the sparks fly over into Canada. In April 1793 a fiery Red Republican, named Genet, landed at Charleston as French minister to the United States and made a triumphal progress to Philadelphia. Nobody bothered about the fundamental differences between the French and Anierican revolutions. France and England were going to war and that was enough. Genet was one of those ' impossibles ' whom revolutions throw into ridiculous power. When he began his campaign the Republican South was at his feet. Planters and legislators donned caps of liberty and danced themselves",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 219 so crazy over the rights of abstract man that they had no enthusiasm left for such concrete instances as Loyalists, Englishmen, and their own plantation slaves. Then Genet made his next step in the new diplomacy by fitting out French privateers in American harbours and seizing British vessels in American waters. This brought Washington down on him at once. Then he lost his head completely, abused everybody, including Jefferson, and retired from public life as an American citizen) being afraid to go home. Genet's absurd career was short, but very meteoric while it lasted, and full of anti- British mischief-making. His agents were everywhere; and his successor, Adet, carried on the underground agitation with equal zeal and more astuteness. Vermont offered an excellent base of operations. Finding that its British proclivities had not produced the Chambly canal for its trade with the St Lawrence, it had become more violently anti- British than ever before and even proposed taking Canada single-handed. This time its new policy remained at fever heat for over three years and only cooled down when a British man-of-war captured the incongru- ously named Olive Branch, in which Ira Allen",
         "220 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA was trying to run the blockade from Ostend with twenty thousand muskets and other arms which he represented as being solely for the annual drill of the Vermont militia. Thus Carleton had to watch the raging South, the dangerous West, and bellicose Vermont, all together, besides taking whatever measures he could against the swarms of secret enemies within the gates. The American immigrants who wanted ' property not liberty ' were ready enough for a change of flag whenever it suited them. But they were few compared with the mass of French Canadians who were being stirred into disaffection. The seigneurs, the clergy, and the very few enlightened people of other classes had no desire for being conquered by a regicide France or an obliterating Ameri- can Republic. But many of the habitants and of the uneducated in the towns lent a willing ear to those who promised them all kinds of liberty and property put together. The danger was all the greater because it was no longer one foreigner intriguing against another, as in 1775, but French against British and class against class. Some of the appeals were still ridiculous. The habitants found themselves credited with an unslak- able thirst for higher education. They were",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 221 promised ' free' maritime intercommunica- tion between the Old World and the New, a wonderful extension of representative in- stitutions, and much more to the same effect, universal revolutionary brotherhood included. But when Frenchmen came promising fleets and armies, when these emissaries were backed by French Canadians who had left home for good reasons after the troubles of 1775, and when the habitants were positively assured by all these credible witnesses that France and the United States were going to drive the British out of Canada and make a heaven on earth for all who would turn against Carleton, then there really was something that sensible men could believe. Everything for nothing- or next to nothing. Only turn against the British and the rest would be easy. No more tithes to the curés, no more seigneurial dues, no more taxes to a government which put half the money in its own pocket and sent the other half to the king, who spent it buying palaces and crowns. ' Nothing is too absurd for them to believe,' wrote Carleton, who felt all the old troubles of 1775 coming back in a greatly aggravated form. He lost no time in vain regrets, how- ever, but got a militia bill through parliament,",
         "222 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA improved the defences of Quebec, and issued a proclamation enjoining all good subjects to find out, report, and seize every sedition- monger they could lay their hands on. An attempt to embody two thousand militiamen by ballot was a dead failure. The few English- speaking militiamen required came forward ' with alacrity.' The habitants hung back or broke into riotous mobs. The ordinary habi- tant could hardly be blamed. He saw little difference between one kind of English-speak- ing people and another. So he naturally thought it best to be on the side of the pro- spective winners, especially when they per- suaded him that he would get back everything taken from him by ' the infamous Quebec Act.' There really was no way whatever of getting him to see the truth under these circumstances. The mere fact that his condition had improved so much under British rule made him all the readier to cry for the Franco-American moon. Things presently went from bad to worse. A glowing, bombastic address from 'The Free French to their Canadian Brothers' (who of course were ' slaves') was even read out at more than one cihurch door. Then the Quebec Assembly unanimously passed an Alien Act in May 1794, and suspected characters began",
         "FOUNDING MODERN CANADA 223 to find that two could play at the game. This stringent act was not passed a day too soon. By its provisions the Habeas Corpus Act could be suspended or suppressed and the strongest measures taken against sedition in every form. Monk, the attorney-general, re- ported that ' It is astonishing to find the same savagery exhibited here as in France.' The habitants and lower class of townsfolk had been well worked up 'to follow France and the United States by destroying a throne which was the seat of hypocrisy, imposture, despotism, greed, cruelty' and all the other deadly sins. The first step was to be the assassination of all obnoxious officials and leading British patriots the minute the pro- mised invasion began to prove successful. No war came. And, as we have seen already, Carleton's last year, 1796, was more peaceful than his first. But even then the external dangers made the governor-general's post a very trying one, especially when internal troubles were equally rife. Thus Carleton never enjoyed a single day without its anxious moments till, old and growing weary, though devoted as ever, he finally left Quebec on the 9th of July. This was the second occasion on which he had been forced to resign by",
         "224 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA unfair treatment at the hands of those who should have been his best support. It was infinitely worse the first time, when he was stabbed in the back by that shameless political assassin, Lord George Germain. But the second was also inexcusable because there could be no doubt whatever as to which of the incompatibles should have left his post- the replaceable Simcoe or the irreplaceable Carleton. Yet as H.M.S. Active rounded Point Levy, and the great stronghold of Quebec faded from his view, Carleton had at least the satisfaction of knowing that he had been the principal saviour of one British Canada and the principal founder of another.",
         "CHAPTER X 'NUNC DIMITTIS' 1796-1808 OUR tale is told. The Active was wrecked on the island of Anticosti, where the estuary of the St Lawrence joins the Gulf. No lives were lost, and the Carletons reached Percé in Gaspé quite safely in a little coasting vessel. Then a ship came round from Halifax and sailed the family over to England at the end of September, just thirty years after Carleton had come out to Canada to take up a burden of oversea governance such as no other viceroy, in any part of the world- encircling British Empire, has ever borne so long. He lived to become a wonderful link with the past. When he died at home in England he was in the sixty-seventh year of his con- nection with the Army and in the eighty-fifth F.B. C. p",
         "226 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA of his age. More than any other man of note he brought the days of Marlborough into touch with those of Wellington, though a century lay between. At the time he received his first commission most of the senior officers were old Marlburians. At the time of his death Nelson had already won Trafalgar, Napoleon had already been emperor of the French for nearly three years, and Wellington liad already begun the great Peninsular cam- paigns. Carleton's own life thus constitutes a most remarkable link between two very different eras of Imperial history. But he and his wife together constitute a still more remarkable link between two eras of Cana- dian history which are still farther apart. At first sight it seems almost impossible that he, who was the trusted friend of Wolfe, and she, who learned deportment at Versailles in the reign of Louis Quinze, should together make up a living link between 1690, when Frontenac saved Quebec from the American Colonials under Phips, and 1867, when the new Dominion was proclaimed there. But it is true. Carleton, born in the first quarter of the eighteenth century, knew several old men who had served at the Battle of the Boyne, which was fought three months before",
         "'NUNC DIMITTIS' Frontenac sent his defiance to Phips ' from the mouth of my cannon.' Carleton's wife, living far on into the second quarter of the nineteenth century, knew several rising young men who saw the Dominion of Canada well started on its great career. All Carleton's sons went into the Army and all died on active service. The fourth was killed in 1814 at Bergen-op-Zoom carrying the same sword that Carleton himself had used there sixty-seven years before. A picture of the first siege of Bergen-op-Zoom hangs in the dining-room of the family seat at Greywell Hill to remind successive generations of their martial ancestors. But no Carleton needs to be reminded of a man's first duty at the call to arms. The present holder of the Dorchester estates and title is a woman. But her son and heir went straight to the front with the cavalry of the first British army corps to take the field in Belgium during the Great World War of 1914. Carleton spent most of his last twelve years at Kempshot near Basingstoke because he kept his stud there and horses were his chief delight. But he died at Stubbings, his place near Maidenhead beside the silver Thames, on the îoth of November î8o8. 227",
         "228 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Thus, after an unadventurous youth and early manhood, he spent his long maturity steering the ship of state through troublous seas abroad ; then passed life's evening in the quiet haven of his home.",
         "BIBLIOGRAPHICAL NOTE THE Seigneurs and the Loyalists, both closely associated with Carleton's Canadian career, are treated in two volumes of the present Series: The Seigneurs of Old Canada and The United Empire Loyalists. Two other volumes also provide pro- fitable reading : The War Chief of the Six Nations : A Chronicle of Brant, the Indian leader who was to Carleton's day what Tecumseh was to Brock's, and The War Chief of the Ottawas: A Chronicle of the Pontiac War. Only one life of Carleton has been written, Lord Dorchester, by A. G. Bradley (1907). The student should also consult John Graves Simcoe, by Duncan Campbell Scott (1905), Sir Frederick Haldimand, by Jean M'Ilwraith (1904), and A History of Canada from 1763 to 1812 by Sir Charles Lucas. Carleton is the leading character in the first half of the third volume of Canada and its Provinces, which, being the work of different authors, throws light on his character from several different British points of view as well as from several different kinds of evidence. Kingsford's History of Canada, volumes iv to vii, treats the period in considerable detail. Justin Smith's two volumes, Our Struggle 229",
         "230 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA for the Fourteenth Colony, is the work of a most painstaking American scholar who had already produced an excellent account of Arnold's March from Cambridge to Quebec, in which, for the first time, Arnold's Journal was printed word for word. Arnold's Expedition to Quebec, by J. Codman, is another careful work. These are the complements of the British books mentioned above, as they em- phasize the American point of view and draw more from American than from British sources of original information. The unfortunate defect of Our Struggle for the Fourteenth Colony is that the author's efforts to be sprightly at all costs tend to repel the serious student, while his very thoroughness itself repels the merely casual reader. So many absurd or perverting mistakes are still made about the life and times of Carleton, and a full understanding of his career is of such vital importance to Canadian history, that no accounts given in the general run of books -including many so-called 'standard works'- should be accepted without reference to the original authorities. Justin Smith's books, cited above, have useful lists of authorities; though there is no discrimination between documents of very different value. The original British diaries kept during Montgomery and Arnold's beleaguer- ment have been published by the Literary and His- torical Society of Quebec in two volumes, at the end of which there is a very useful bibliography",
         "BIBLIOGRAPHICAL NOTE 231 showing the whereabouts of the actual manuscripts of these and many other documents in English, French, and German. In addition to the Ameri- can and British diarists who wrote in English there were several prominent French Canadians and German officers who kept most interesting journals which are still extant. The Dominion Archives at Ottawa possess an immense mass of originals, facsimiles, and verbatim copies of every kind, including maps and illustrations. The Dominion Archivist, Dr Doughty, has himself edited, in collaboration with Professor Shortt, all the Documents relating to the Constitutional Ilistory of Canada from 1759 to 1791. The present Chronicle is based on the original evidence of both sides.",
         "INDEX Adams, President John, and the Loyalists, 174. Adet, M., his anti-British carn- paign, 219. Ainshe, Thomas, quoted, 92. Allen, Ethan, leader of the Green Mountain Boys, 63, 65-6, 69, 136; taken prisoner at Montreal, 75-7; Carleton's friendly correspondent, 192. Allen, Ira, 219-20. American War of Independ- ence, the: causes of, 171-3; revolutionists and Loyalists, 61-2, 166, 173-4; division of parties in Britain, 6z, 163; and in Canada, 62; the first shot fired, 62; American in- vasion of Canada, 63-142; British campaign against Thirteen Colonies, 143-61 ; what forced the granting of Independence, 162-3; the treaty of peace, 166-9. Amherst, Sir Jeffery, and Carleton, 5, 19, 21; and the Jesuits' estates, 191. Anderson, Lieut., killed at the Sault-au-Matelot, 118. Antell, with Montgomery at Quebec, îo6. Arnold, Benedict, 63-4; and the Green Mountain Boys, 65-7, 68 ; his daring march 232 against Quebec, 71, 80-3, 85- 86, 178; neets Montgomery, g; wounded in assault on the Sault-au-Matelot, io8, 109, rIO, 113-15, 125; at Montreal, 122, 134-5, 140; his defeat on Lake Cham- plain, z44-8. Bailly, Father, his attempt to assist Carleton, 126. Bailly, François, coadjutor bishop of Quebec, 188; his educational work, 189-go. Barnsfair, Captain, at Près-de- Ville, 111, 112. Baum, Colonel, 143. Beaujeu, M. de, and Carleton, 125-6. Bouchette, with Carleton in the race for Quebec, go. Brown, William, starts the first newspaper in Canada, 37-9. Brown, Major, 75, 76 ; his at- tempt to bluff Carleton, 89-go. Burgoyne, General 143. 152, 154, 155; meets disaster at Saratoga, 156. Burke, Edmund, 204. Burr, Aaron, 81. Burton, Colonel, commands the district of Three Rivers, 19, 21, 23.",
         "INDEX Bute, Marquis of, 24-5. Butterfield, Colonel, defeated at the Cedars, 134-6. Canada: the Capitulation, x6; why conquered by Britain, 2o-i ; her defences under Murray, 21-2; the French population in 1762, 22-3; civil government inaugur- ated in, 25-8; political war between the 'King's Old Subjects' and the French- Canadians, 28-33, 36; the baiting of the redcoats, 33-6 ; the first newspaper, 37-9; the Indian trade, 41-2; the Walker affair, 43-5; the Quebec Act, 52-5, 6o, 158-9, 184, 222; and the American Revolution, 6z, 62; state of prior to American invasion, 71-5; Montgomery and Ar- nold's invasion, 7.5-142; Carleton's final administra- tion, 184-6: the Loyalists, 186; the problem of defence, 186-7 ; education, 189-90; commerce, 191-3; population in 1791, 191; foreign com- plications, 194; immigration problem, 194-5; the church question, 195; the postal service, 195-6; two royal visits, 197-201 ; the Constitu- tional Act of 1791, 201-8; her indebtedness to Britain, 206, 208; and anti-British sentiment in United States, 218-23. See Quebec. Carden, Major, defeats Ameri- cans at Montreal, 76-7. Carleton, Guy, his birth and parentage, i ; his early career, 233 1-6; Wolfe his friend and champion, 2-7, 12; incurs George ii's displeasure, 2, 5, 6; his engineering skill, 4, 5; with Wolfe as quarter- naster-general, 6-ix; twice mentioned in dispatches and in Wolfe's will, 12-13; gov- ernor of Canada, 40-1, 49-50, 158-9; his troubles with the Council, 42-3; the Walker affair, 43-5; the constitutional problem, 45-7; sails for England in connection with the Quebec Act, 46, 48-9, 60 ; advocates the seigneurial militia system, 47-9; his romantic marriage, 50-2; his defence of Canada against Montgomery's invasion, 64- 65, 71-4, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 85; his race for Quebec, 86- 92; his defence of Quebec, 93, 94, 102-3, 107, log, 110-l1, 118, 121, 122, 125, 127-9; his policy of clemency at Three Rivers, 1140,167; hisvictory on Lake Champlain, 144-8, 149- 150; knighted, 149; hisquarrel with Germain and his re- signation, 152-61 ; his arrival in New York with unlimited powers, 164-5; objects to America being granted com- plete Independence, 166-9; his work in connection with the British evacuation of America, 168, 170, 173, 175- i8o; becomes Baron Dor- chester, 181-3; his welcome to Quebec, 183-5, 208, 2az-Il, 212; someproblems requiring solution, z86-8, 189, 193, 194, 195, 201, 202-3, 206; his",
         "234 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA quarrel with Simcoe, 212-14, 224; his attitude towards the Americans, 214, 216, 217, 220, 221; his final departure from Canada, 223-5; his wonderful record and death, 225-8; his character, 2, 3, 49, 102-3, 18I, 183-4; his descendants, 227. Carroll, Charles, Congress commissioner to Canada, 130-2, 133, 137-9. Carroll, John, Archbishop of Baltimore, 131, 132. Cedars, the affair at the, 134-6. Chabot, Captain, at Près-de- Ville, iii. Chambly, the defence of, 73-4; its disgraceful surrender, 74, 77-8, 99. Chase, Samuel, member of the Congress Commission, 130- 132, 133, 137-9. Chatham, Earl of, 24-5, 211; and Carleton, 2, 6, 49. See Pitt. Church of England in Canada, the, 188, 195, 205, 211. Clarke, Sir Alured, 176; lieu- tenant-governor, 188, 208. Clergy Reserves, the, 195. Clinton, General, 155. Coffin, John, at Près-de-Ville, III, 113. Connaught, Duke of, 198. Constitutional Act of 1791, the, 184, 201-8. Continental Congress, and the American Revolution, 61-2, 64, 67-8; the plan of campaign against Canada, 71; and Montgomery's defeat, 123-4 ; sends a commission into Canada, 130-2, 133, 137-9; the 'Affair at the Cedars,' 134-6 ; and the Indians, 136- 137; the Asgill affair, 166; and the Loyalists, 173-4, 176- 177. See Thirteen Colonies and United States. Cook, Captain, 8. Cornwallis, General, 155. Cramahé, Colonel, 36; Carle- ton's lieutenant, 49, 74, 83, 84-5, 99, 178 Crown Point, 64, 66, 140, 148. Dacre, Lieutenant, 145. Dambourges, Lieutenant, at the Sault-au-Matelot, 117. Dearborn, Captain, 114-15. Digby, Admiral, 168. Dorchester, Baron. See Carle- ton. Dorchester, Lady, 2, 51-2, 226- 227; her viceregal court at Quebec, 149-50, 196-7, 200-1. Duggan, Jerry, his bombast before Quebec, 104, 1o8, IIo, 120. Dundas, Henry, Viscount Mel- ville, and Carleton, 213, 217. Durell, Admiral, 7-9. Easton, Colonel, his summons to Carleton, 87-9. Egremont, Lord, 26. Fanning, Edmund, lieutenant- governor of Prince Edward Island, 196. Forster, Captain, his ' Affair at the Cedars,' 134-6. Fort George, 64. Fox, Charles James, 188, 204. France, cedes Canada to Britain, 14-16; her associa- tion with Americans against",
         "INDEX 235 Britain, 162, 214, 215, 218-19, Germans, British mencenaries 221. in America, 143, 153, 170,179. Franklin, Benjamin,his mission Gilmore, Thomas,startsthefirst into Canada, 34, 130-2. newspaper in Canada, 37-9. Fraser, Captain Malcolm, at Girty, Sunon, a British scout, the defence of Quebec, 109. 217. French Canadians, their appre- Grant, Sir William, 159. ciation of the British, 15, 22, Graves, Admiral, 65. 35, 36 ; after the Capitulation, Great Britain, her varying 16-17, 47; their number in French Canadian policy, 16- 1762, 22-3; changes in their 17; her Indian policy, 27-8; laws, 26-7; their disabilities and the American Revolution, under English civil law, 45- 6r ; her critical case in 1777- 46; and the militia, 47-8 ; the 1782, 162-4; grants complete Quebec Act, 54-5; and the Independence to the United American Revolution, 62; States, 166-8; her policy in the invasion of Canada, 71-3, regard to the property of 76, 78, 79, 82, 84, 85, ioo ; rebels, 178-9 ; the war with the siege of Quebec, 125-6; France and her friendly and Continentalpaper money, 1 attitude towards the United 131-2, 141; after the Ameri- States, 214-16. can retreat, 140-1, 149-50, Green Mountain Boys, the, 63, 158-9; their partiality for i 65-7t 68, 79, 192. certain governors, 185; and Grenville, Lord, and the con- the Loyalists, 194-5; the Act stitution of Canada, 188, 201, of 1791, 202, 208; the anti- 203-4. British campaign in United States, 220-3. See Canada Haldimand, General, governor and Great Britain. of Canada, 157, 184-6. Hamilton, Alexander, friendly Gage, General, 21, 22; hard towards Britain, 215. pressed at Boston, 64-5. Hamilton, Captain, at the de.- Genet, Edmond Charles, his fence of Quebec, 96. anti-Britishcampaign,218-1g. Hamilton, Henry, lieutenant- George il, and Carleton, 2, 5, governor, 185. 6, 15'. Hey, William, chief justice, George Ilu, 152. and the Walker affair, 44. Germain, Lord George, z5o-z; Hope, Henry, lieutenant-gov- his quarrel with Carleton, ernor, 185, z86, 188. 152-3, 157-8; bungleshisown Howard, Ladies Anne and plan against the Thirteen Maria, 5o-i. See Dorchester, Colonies, 156; his grossmis- Lady. management of colonial Howe, General, his American affairs, 159-6!, 162, 164, Z83. sympathies, 153, 155, 156.",
         "236 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Hubert, Bishop, his dispute perate throw for victory, with his coadjutor, 189-90, 15-16. 211. Ligonier, Sir John, and Carle- ton, 6. Indians, British and American Livingston, James, his con- attitude towards, 27-8, 187; pany of Canadian 'patriots, and the American invasion of 69, 71 100e 1o8, 11o$ 120$ 122. Canada, 76, 78, 82, 103, 134- Livius, Peter, his gross pre- 136; the dispute regarding tensions, 159-60. their use in war, 136-7. Lower Canada, the first parlia- Inglis, Charles, Bishop of Nova ment in, 207-10; and the Scotia, 188, 211. anti-British campaign in the Irving, Colonel, and Carleton, United States, 222-3. See 41, 42-3, 44. Quebec. Isle-aux-Coudres, 8. Lymburner, Adam,204. Jay, John, his friendliness to- M'Dougaîl, Captain, at the wards Britain, 214, 215, 216. Sault-au-Mateiot, 118-20. Jefferson, Thomas, his anti- M'Kenzie, Captain, 96. British policy, 215, 216, 217- Maclean, Colonel, at the de- 218. fence of Quebec, 83, 85, 96. Jesuits, their power on the M'Quarters, Sergeant Hugh, wane, 42. at Près-de-Ville, m. Jesuits' Estates, the, 191. Madison, President James, his Johnson, Sir John, and Carle- anti-British policy, 215. ton, 212-13. Maritime War, the, 24-5. See ISeven Years' War. Kent, Duke of, 96 ; his visit to Meigs, Major, at the assault Canada, 197-20o, 209. on the Sauit-au-Matelot, zig Kentucky, and trade with the Monk, James, attorney-generai British, 192-3. of Lower Canada, 223. Kirkland, Samuel, and the Montgomery, Richard, 69-71; Indians, 136. his siege of St Johns, 75, 78, 8o; his race for Canleton, 86- La Corne de St Luc, and the 92; his meeting with Arnold Walker affair, 44. and arriva before Quebec, Lake Champlain, the battle on, 99-ioo; his summons to 144-8. Caneton to surrender, 1oo- Lawes, Captain, at the Sault- r02; bis plans for an assault, au-Matelot, ri8-2o. 104-8, 133-4; kiiled at Près- Legislative Council, the, 29, 41, de-Ville, 107-12,121-2. 42-3 ; under the Quebec Act, Montreai, Capitulation of, 16; 54, 6o, 71. and the baiting of the red- Lvis, General, 14; iis des- coats, 33-6; and the American",
         "INDEX Revolution, 62-3, 74, 76; in the hands of the Americans, 123; and the Congress Com- mission, 131-2. Morgan, Daniel, with Arnold's expedition against Quebec, 81, 114-x6, 118, 119-20. Morgan, Maurice, Carleton's confidential secretary, 46, 175-6. Morris, Colonel, and the Loyal- ists, 175-6. Mountain, Jacob, Bishop of Quebec, 211. Murray, General, z2, 14-15; governor of Canada, 17-19, 25, 26, 28, 32, 49-50; quells disturbance among British troops, 19-20, 35-6; bis re- port on Canada, 20-4; cham- pions the French-Canadian cause, 32-3; called home, 36- 37, 41. Nairne, Major, at the Sault- au-Matelot, 117. Napier, Captain, 91. Nootka Affair, the, 193-4. North, Lord, his unfortunate ministry, 163-4. Osgoode, William, chief justice of Canada, 211-12. Oswald, Captain, in the assault on the Sault-au-Matelot, 114. Paris, Treaty Of, 25. Parr, Governor, and the Loyal- ists, 176. Patterson, Walter, lieutenant- governor of Prince Edward Island, 196. Payne, Captain, and the Walker affair, 35. 237 Phillips, Mary, her historic love-affair, 175. Picard, Lieutenant, at Près- de-Ville, iii. Pitt, William, 211, 216; and the Canada Act of 1791, 201, 204-5. See Chatham, Earl of. Pontiac's War, 27-8. Presbyterian Church in Can- ada, the, 195. Près-de-Ville, 99 ; the attack on, 110-13. Prescott, Colonel, go, 91; taken prisoner, 123. 'Presentment of the Grand Jury of Quebec,' the, 30-3. Preston, Major, his defence of St Johns, 74-5, 78, 80. Price, a rebel Montrealer, ro6. Prince Edward Island, the re- fractory lieutenant-governor, 195, 196. Pringle, Captain, on Lake Champlain, 145-6. Quebec: some war prices in Wolfe's camp, 1o-1z; con- ditions after the fail, 14-15; her defences in 1762, 21-2; under the Quebec Act, 53; the American invasion of Canada, 83-4, 85. MONT- GOMERY AND ARNOLD'S SIEGE, 93-129: Quebec in 1775, 93; position of the com- batants, 93-4; the defences, 94, 99, 110-11, 113-14, 122; Carleton's compulsory mea- sures of defence, 94-5, 122-3 ; composition of the British defenders, 95-7, 121 ; a com- parison of men and arma- ments, 97-9, 99-100, 108-9; Montgomery's summons to",
         "238 THE FATHER OF BRITISH CANADA Carleton, 100-2; the bon- bardment, 103-7, 124, 126 ; Près-de-Ville and the Sault- au-Matelot, 107-21, 133-4 ; the reply to the American summons, 124; the plot among the American pris- oners, 124-S; the relief and the Amercan retreat, 127-9 ; -gay times in Quebec, 149- 5o ; the opening of the first parliament, 208-10. Quebec Act of 1774, the, 52-5, 6o, 158-9, 184, 222; feelings regarding, 55-6; some criu- cism, 56-9. Richmond, Duke of, and Carle- ton, 3. Riedesel, Baron, r43. Roman Catholics, under the Quebec Act, 53-4. Sackville, Lord George, 5. See Germain. St Johns, 64, 67; its siege and surrender, 74-5, 78, 79, 80, 99. Saratoga, British disaster at, 156, 162. Sault-au-Matelot, 99; the as- sault on, I13-20. Saunders, Admiral, with Wolfe at Quebec, 7, 8, 9. Schuyler, General Philip, and the invasion of Canada, 67-8, 69, 70. Seven Years' War, the first shot fired in, 4; Pitt's bloody and expensive war, 24-5. Seymour, Miss, and the Carleton romance, 51-2. Simcoe, John Graves, his quarrel with Carleton, 212-14, 224. Smith, William, chief justice of Canada, 188-9, 201; advo- cates Confederation, 202-3, 211. Sorel, 74, 86, 87-8, 138, 2o5; a change of name, 197. Stopford, Major, his disgrace- ful surrender of Charnbly, 74, 75, 77. Sullivan, General John, his de- feat at Three Rivers, 139-40. Sydney, Lord, and Carleton, 188. Templer, Colonel, 71. Thirteen Colonies, and the Indian trade, 41-2; their fury at the Quebec Act, 56; revolutionists and Loyalists, 61-2; their Declaration of Independence, 142; their re- lations with Brtain before the Revolution, 171-3. See American War of Independ- ence and United Sta.tes. Thomas, General John, and the siege of Quebec, 122, 126-7, 139. Thompson, James, finds Mont- gomery's body, 121-2. Three Rivers, the battle of, 139-40- Ticonderoga, 64, 65-6, 69-70; amomentousissue, 148, 152-3, 155, 157. Trenton, the British disaster at, 153. United Empire Loyalists, the, x7, 61-2, 143; their wretched situation in United States, î69, 170-!, 173; the exodus, 176-80, 184, 186, 191, 194-5, 20I.",
         "INDEX United States, the central authority weak, 173, 192-3; pro-British and anti-British feeling in, 214-23. See Ameri- can War of Independence, Continental Congress, and Thirteen Colonies. Upper Canada, its first parlia- ment, 207-8. See Canada. Vergennes, Comte de, French mainister to United States, 166. Vermont, and trade with the British, 192; anti-British, 219-20. Walker, Thomas, his persecu- tion of the redcoats, 34-6, 43- 44 ; his arrest, 75, 78-9, 91, 123. Warde, Colonel George, 5, 12. 239 Warner, Seth, and the Green Mountain Boys, 63, 65-6, 69, 79. Washington, George, 4, 68; and the American Revolution, 71, 82, 137, 152-3, 154, 166, 176-7; and the Loyalists, 174; his love-affair, 175.; his friendliness towards Britain, 214, 215, 216, 217, 219. Wayne, General, 217. William IV, his visit to Canada, 197. Wolfe, General, 151 ; his friend- ship for Carleton, 2, 3, 5, 6-7, 12; his siege of Quebec, 6-7, 8, 9, 11-12, 18. Wooster, General, 68, 69; and the siege of Quebec, 122, 124, 126. Yorktown, British surrender at, 163. Printed by T. and A. Constab-le, Prrinters to His Majesty at the Edinburgh University Press",
         "THE CHRONICLES OF CANADA Edited by George M. Wrong and H. H. Langton of the University of Toronto A series of thirty-two freshly-written narratives for popular reading, designed to set forth, in historic con- tinuity, the principal events and movements in Canada, from the Norse Voyages to the Railway Builders. PART I. THE FIRST EUROPEAN VISITORS i. The Dawn of Canadian History A Chronicle of Aboriginal Canada BY STEPHEN LEACOCK 2. The Mariner of St Malo A Chronicle of the Voyages of Jacques Cartier BY STEPHEN LEACOCK PART Il. THE RISE OF NEW FRANCE 3. The Founder of New France A Chronicle of Champlain BY CHARLES W. COLBY 4. The Jesuit Missions A Chronicle of the Cross in the Wilderness BY THOMAS GUTHRIE MARQUIS 5. The Seigneurs of Old Canada A Chronicle of New-World Feudalism BY WILLIAM BENNETT MUNRO 6. The Great Intendant A Chronicle of Jean Talon BY THOMAS CHAPAIS 7. The Fighting Governor A Chronicle of Frontenac BY CHARLES W. COLBY",
         "The Chronicles of Canada PART III. THE ENGLISH INVASION 8. The Great Fortress A Chronicle of Louisbourg BY WILLIAM WOOD 9. The Acadian Exiles A Chronicle of the Land of Evangeline BY ARTHUR G. DOUGHTY 10. The Passing of New France A Chronicle of Montcalm BY WILLIAM WOOD x. The Winning qf Canada A Chronicle of Wolfe BY WILLIAM WOOD PART IV. THE BEGINNINGS OF BRITISH CANADA i2. The Father of British Canada A Chronicle of Carleton BY WILLIAM WOOD 13. The United Empire Loyalists A Chronicle of the Great Migration BY W. STEWART WALLACE 14. The War with the United States A Chronicle of 1812 BY WILLIAM WOOD PART V. THE RED MAN IN CANADA 15. The War Chief of the Ottawas A Chronicle of the Pontiac War BY THOMAS GUTHRIE MARQUIS z6. The War Chief of the Six Nations A Chronicle of joseph Brant BY LOUIS AUBREY WOOD 17. Tecumseh A Chronicle of the last Great Leader of his People BY ETHEL T. RAYMOND",
         "The Chronicles of Canada PART VI. PIONEERS OF THE NORTH AND WEST 18. The Adventurers of England' on Hudson Bay A Chronicle of the Fur Trade in the North BY AGNES C. LAUT i9. Pathfinders of the Great Plains A Chronicle of La Vérendrye and his Sons BY LAWRENCE J. BURPEE 20. Adventurers of the Far North A Chronicle of the Arctic Seas BY STEPHEN LEACOCR 21. The Red River Colony A Chronicle of the Beginnings of Manitoba BY LOUIS AUBREY WOOD 22. Pioneers of the Pacific Coast A Chronicle of Sea Rovers and Fur Hunters BY AGNES C. LAUT 23. The Cariboo Trail A Chronicle of the Gold-fields of British Columbia BY AGNES C. LAUT PART VII. THE STRUGGLE FOR POLITICAL FREEDOM 24. The Family Compact A Chronicle of the Rebellion in Upper Canada BY W. STEWART WALLACE 25. The Patriotes of '37 A Chronicle of the Rebellion in Lower Canada BY ALFRED D. DECELLES 26. The Tribune of Nova Scotia A Chronicle of Joseph Howe BY WILLIAM LAWSON GRANT 27. The Winning of Popular Government A Chronicle of the Union of 1841 BY ARCHIBALD MACMECHAN",
         "The Chronicles of Canada PART VIII. THE GROWTH OF NATIONALITY 28. The Fathers of Confederation A Chronicle of the Birth of the Dominion BY A. H. U. COLQUHOUN 29. The Day of Sir John Macdonald A Chronicle of the Early Years of the Dominion BY SIR JOSEPH POPE 30. The Day of Sir Wilfrid Laurier A Chronicle of Our Own Times BY OSCAR D. SKELTON PART IX. NATIONAL HIGHWAYS 31. Al Afloat A Chronicle of Craft and Waterways BY WILLIAM WOOD 32. The Railway Builders A Chronicle of Overland Highways BY OSCAR D. SKELTON Published by Glasgow, Brook \u0026 Company at 15 Wilton Avenue TORONTO, CANADA"
      ],
      "creator" : [
         "Wood, William, 1864-1947."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Glasgow, Brook, 1916."
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Title from title screen.",
         "\"Part IV. The beginnings of British Canada.\"",
         "Original issued in series: Chronicles of Canada ; 12.",
         "Includes list of titles in the series.",
         "\"Bibliographical note\": p. 229-231.",
         "Includes bibliographical references and an index.",
         "xi, 239, [4] p., [7] leaves of plates : ill., folded ports., maps ; 18 cm."
      ],
      "subject" : [
         "Carleton, Guy,Sir,1724-1808.",
         "Carleton, Guy,Sir,1724-1808.",
         "Governors -- Canada -- Biography.",
         "Gouverneurs -- Canada -- Biographies.",
         "Canada -- History -- 1763-1791.",
         "Canada -- Histoire -- 1763-1791."
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The father of British Canada : a chronicle of Carleton",
         "Chronicles of Canada ; 12."
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.65347",
      "label" : "The father of British Canada : a chronicle of Carleton / by William Wood.",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.65347"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.65347/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_296/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "doc" : {
      "label" : "Vol. 49, no. 6 (Oct. 1917)",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_296",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06251",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06251_296",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "C THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE OCTOBER, 1917 PRICE 25 Cents THE ONTARIO PUBLISHING CO., LIMITED, TORONTO",
         "tORY Whatever You c4sk Ivory Soap knows no limitations. It wi11 meet ail your needs. It is equally satisfactory for the toilet, the bath, dothes, dishes, because it is pure, high grade soap and nothing else. IVORY SOAP 499 4 % PUREf Matide in Mhe Procte \u0026 Gamblefactories at Hamffton, Crnidé",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER BOARD LIESE MEN -'WILJL EI' YOU DECIDE you liable to t\u003e. selected for service under the Mfilitary Service Act ? answer t'\u003e this question is being made readily availsj\u003eie for you. Remeauber îbat class to bc\u003e cslled includes only mnen between the' ages of' 20 and 34, botb inclusive, unniarried or widowers wlthout children, those inarried after JuIy 6, 1917, being single for the' purposes of the Act. Jical Boards are now beiaç established througbout Canada. These Boards will ý, free of charge an~d obligation, ail men who wis\u0026 to be examined as to tbeir pby'sical or military service. Tii.y wili tell you in a very short time wbether your pliysicsJ ,n absolves you frorn the call or maltes you liable for selection. 9 important that yoii obtain this information as soon as possible. A certilicate of s fr\u003eom a Medical Board wili secure for you fre.domn (rom respoasibillty under the 'Service Act froui any E-xemption Tribunal. A certificate of fitess will flot Preclude ai for exemption en any ground. \u003erder tliat you may bc able to plan your future with certalnty, visit a Medical Board as possible and find out if you are hiable t'\u003e b. selected . Your fs.mily and your ,r are interested as weli as yourself. Isaed by Mie fltary Service Coc l.",
         "Cana\u0026dian. Magaz i Contents, October, 1917 o -Painting by G. Horne Rlussell F 0D FRIENOS OF' TUEF ELM CANÂDIÂN WOMEN - -ýN Lq CARRID MATILDIA DEURICK. IGER. VERSE - - - - - - ,ND) TRUN-K',S NEW PRESII\u003eENT UT 01, MR, 1IOWARI\u003e \u003cLý q\u003cLLET, LUENCE OF A\\NCES'TRY IN TIIE ITW AR - - - - - - - y HOME. FICTION - - - - Y. FICTION l A PAÀ.;Tl1G - - USE OF TIHE BIDF. FICTION D IN A RMJs -- mTTING TluB MNI 'EÂRE'8 ENGLAND -- - - JONAUTF. FICTIO-N --- R 0K F PiN,.sI. A DRAWINC, OF THE REDCOAT RIt'ER8 - - Hamilton M. Laing - - - Emnily P. WÇ%eaver Grace Murray Atkin Professor Johin Cameron T. R. Elliott -- - - Thevodocia Pearee - -Alice Brown - Liaeey Amy - George C. 'Wells - - - Morgan Robertson - Louis Raemaekers- ,W. M.ýeD. Taiit - - - - - -- ----Professor Herbert L. Stewar - - - -Book Reviews--- -- -- e-at Britain, Ireland and moat of COPIES, 25 CENTS8. should be r.gistered and addri :00-206 Adelalde Street West, ent Street, London, S.W. $8 Ru ,ouvre. Paris. XLIX",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER a erial Royal Flying Corps Group of Officers and Men of the Royal Flying Corps ations are now being accepted for the Cadet (Pilot) Wing of 'Iying Corps. didates must fulfil the following conditions (a) Be between the ages of 18 and 25. (b) Be of good education and show evidence of good upbringing. (c) Be physically fit in accordance with the standard of fitness laid down for the Royal Flying Corps (Cadet Wing). are put to no expense and are paid from date of attestation. :al knowledge is not an essential, but a good College educa- :adets are trained in CANADA.",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Canadian War Herc ln the August number of 7\u003ee Canadian Magazine we published an article on the rise of several non- professional military men from Canada to positions of distinction in both the Canadian and the Imperial ser- vice. In the November Number Mr. Frank Yeigh will relate some of the remarkable deeds of valour, heroism and daring committed by Canadians in Europe. It has been demonstrated time and time again that the average Canadian soldier is unrivalled in genuine prowess and fighting capacity, but it will b. doubly interesting to review some of the outstanding ex- ploits as related by Mr. Yeigh. This article will b. ad.quately illustrated and will b. followed by others, equally timely and valuable, on various aspects of the war. $2.50 PER ANNUM, lacludlmg Great Britain, Ir.laud and most of the Colonilu SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS THE GANADIAN MAGAZINE 200-206 Adelalde Street West, TORONTO REQUI wMENDS ITSELF ~ANtYL\" TN NO HEAT. WARRANTED INDELIBLE Of a COOPER",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER f You have Var Bond-ol u cao double your estate by using e interest you receive te pay the crmiumn on an Endowment ýter youz live or die, \u003evu cice as much as before. Put Vim in Jaded Muscles b \"y stirnulating and arousing the c 'irculation with iht a ppica. tions ofAbsorbine,jr.rubbed in thoroughly. T'his invigorating liniment aces quickly and surely. It is fragrant and pleasant to use-leaves no greasy residue on the skin. As Absorbine, Jr., is a powerful ger- micide, as weil as a liniment, it 1 s effective for prophylactic and aseptic uses; it destroys the germs In Cuts and sores ; it mnay b. diluted and used suc- cessfully as ari antiseptic and germicide for the mouth and throat. Farmers and znechanics wiIl find Absorbine, Jr., especially valuable in taking care of the littie injuries that are -\"part of the day's work,\" and in re- lieving soreness and straLinu-. Athletes will find it efficient for limibering sore stiff muscles. A good formula for a rut\u003e. down is ne ounce of Absorbine, irn, to a quart of water or witch bazel. Absorbinet, Jr., will not destroy tissue-it 's si tively harmnesu. Iti. composod of(vegetable ex- tracts and essential oi- contaiis no acids or minerais. Get a boulie tod.\u003e' and keep it in your dessk in lrour traveling bag, in your medicine-cabj,,eg or lu the side pocket of yeur auto- mobile. It ia heatth in- s-urance of a high type. $1... a sottle at drugglsts or postp\u0026sM A Liberal Trial BUsth will b. sent to y.iir aMy... on raoeipt ei 100 ini stamp. W. F. YOUJNG, P. D. F. 187 4ssna 05uUld _ MMý - - __ . . . ........ . . . .. - - ------------",
         "B \u003cJANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ohndon GiloireCop CMEAPSIDI, LONDON, IENOLASID The Great S/iecMitts in OLOVES, HOSIERY9 and UND)ERWEAR Ans usrivalI vailety Ini stock - AT- 'TTMWLY MOU ERATI PEICES Fuuy d.mdsed Price Ustos of FuUly detailed Pric aU deparetsmt. b. ali Departments obtaim.e3 FREE, onap obtained FREI pk\u0026teis, direct from the plication, diect Ontario PubllIg Co. Ontario Pubist 200-206 Adisiaide Strt, West, 200-206 Adelaide S",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER Import Your -Own WINTER CLOTHING FABRICS! You will find it to your advantage to get your supplies direct from England, whetber you require Fabrics only or made-to-measure Garmonts. Many Ladies and G;entlernen in Canada have already proved this to their personal satisfaction. WiIl you investiga te ? EC.FRTON BURNETT, Ltd., will send yOU. 011 requesi, saxnplea of Fabrics suitable for Ladies', Gentlemien's atid Cbildren's Wititer Clothing, and these will enable you tojudge of the quality and vaks of the miaterila they vSupply. Ir wi il cost you 2 Cents only to get these Saniples. Mai] a card for then to-dy. Hall' a cmuture* worid-wid. reputatioa for QuJlity. B f THE HALL44ARK OF R lBy Appoitount Many fl.X theQuceý INRINSC WOTIIAppoinletqls Ldes and Gentlemen requiring a aervieaMe, truitworthy Costume or Suit. Fahr- titdu ,boa atmp.rp~u andi partcularly coumomudabie whse utrssgth asti \"uiàAnce tuwcsr are essent a1 iet,,rex.t ar.coaîsiended tote Ev LB. . £ersuajet cý,\"r - R al Naiy Blu Srg. atraLThrv arc Pure Wool Fabrica which av in as lncnluah.io it o atisfcuon for nearl) y y esru. rives range fr ois 9\u0026 . toý s .0 per yard, d o ue w d sfha iand r-Li. Mern-t 131ansa etc., màlhd \"ot P.idto any addmams. on nequett. Address: GRO UNTLnie LU__ R. W. WAIEHISF, WEUNGTON, SOMMET, ENGLAND Capita A.l oekU - *V 000d 000 C.C. Dalon W.F-P\" 1.PI1kd W. A.W 1101 j. p. oeil, Gen«al maamr",
         "8 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBIIER ST. MARGARETS COLLEGE 144 191100 air. a., Tro NTOCr, ONTràallO A Roeid.util a\" Day School Mor Girls Pounded by the. late George Dickson, M.A., former Principal of Upper Canada College, and Mr~ Acad.emic Course, from Preparatory to University Matriculation and First YeE Music, Art, Dometic Science, Phy*Îcal Educatio-Crcket, Tennis, Basi Hockey, Swimming Bath. MES. GEORGE DICKSON, Write for Prospectus MISS J. B. MACDONALD. .. Proeid.ut. hIac 110*4 Magtor: C. S. Y..bey, U.A. J.unior aud Senior D.mpartmou.a. -su ... 0.. 1917 R.M.C, KIUnfoon Ni .... Eo.o.- -A* Ent,,..- R.y 1 C nad N.^Y. Fo.. Nu., tiou. MCG111. MONTREAL ~IDLEY CLEEII8bbe pw-m*,mq uU C24LMIA LADIES' CO OPENED ITS THIRTY-SEVEN' ON SEPTE1MBER SEVENTEEJ TEEN 1*UNDRED 'AND SEVEI 7hruk courses in Music, Art, Oratory, H1gk Schoo4, Businev Dûmes\u0026iý Sciene and Superior Phvsl;ral Training For ternis, addrems: R. I. Warner, M.A., D.D., Presidnt, St. Princ",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER EtorttW=bBu t.n fur tW' CUt P-ed-iA TAERIA LORDOL TORHO OPOYUNr JO -0 . -w Princpal. OvwisI Whug Anrrfo LâT .Aý1D RFV. D. BRUCE NMÂCDQOAL». . Lt.. VaJendar sen on application limdEmauf Zbe fDargaret Eaton %cbool of Itterature anb ]Expreseton mo.tlà Btw..t. T.w.to. 1 - - 14w. O.Mowde Nau.lth. P'imoeIi Euglish. French. PhYuical Culture, Voes Cultume tnt.rpotatiou. Public Speak.ig, and DrAmatie Art. Fo.nded Iff9 by SIR JOHN COLBORNE. Oovernor M Uppoe Camilda U\u003ePPER % BF3A\u003c\u003eIN 13I1bv PQ CAAAAUTUMN TtM BEGINS TIIupsoAy, SPTEUt 1)th, e 10 aM TORONTO tia Pyuial 1 ýztrmct.e of the C4olLeZ. Schbo alena -nt-inoeIa'1' .Lwill b. USHBURY COLLEGE Rodoeliff, Park Ottawa RESIDENT SCHOOL FOR BOYS Beautiful situation. Modern Fireproof Muildings. Ten acres playing-fleigds. R. M. C. Entranoe 1916, six canddte assd. m*ae/r lstrated Catensdar :- Re. C F. W ocmb., M. A, H«domter uISOP DETHUNE COLLEGE, OSHAWA, ONT. A FORGIROLS jp\u003em\"ationfo he .Univertity sud for thei. .xainotti Toronto Cosefvatoey oM Muic. The, Miuical D.,partnt (PianThery and flarmba) wil b. under the direction ofa M.toe,. and af à Bliter, wiio fer aitjiught in the. Sciiol ithmre uc\" l\"Ir .1eMItre b l iarge of a qualified miatrea. r um,\u0026dprc6a s*pW e.k SUIflh INCNAaaG.,orte T-UuSIMR OF ST. JOHN THE DMlUE. k_ îonrOI. ~(I1T1 ANNr1~,, Pats~. bideauta Sula\" for Ghi .1 Aceso.G* . Lak. View Limited n.nnbers, SCholarsbip Matriculation, Singing, Music, Art, Conversatwial French. Healthiest district in Canada. \u0026inimer and winter sports. Miss E. NI. Elgood, Miss E. J. Ingram, Mlle. Shopoff. g o w FOR PROSPECTUS ÂPPLY TO THE PRINCIPAIS",
         "L0 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER DEPARTMBNr OF TUE NAVAL SERVICE. ROYAL NAVAL COLLEGE OF CANADAk NNUA exaitiaionsforentry of Naval sio i ay echd year, auccesaful candidates joining the Colale on or about the lst August followigthe Appications tor entuy are ireceived up to th1e lStli Aprl by theSecreta ry. Civil Service Comission, Otwfrom whou blank entry fora,. can b. Candidates for extaminatcon musthaviedtei 5.ute ith birthdav, and not reached hir .izteentb blnbhday, on the liatjuly following the xaumination. Puthr deal. cn b.t obtainon plcaint N al Service fýaretm oh Naval Service, G. J. DESBARATS. D.1pu4y Minlater oflthe Naval Service. Departc.t ofthe Naval Service, tc. Marcb 1, 9fl. llnauthorized. puibication of this advertis.ucet L I. HOME STUt\u003eY Arts Courses c SU MME SCHO O jw and Amal QUEEN'S UNIVERS KINGSTON, ONTAI ARTS EDUCATION M. SCHOOL OF MID~ X4INING CHEMICAL MECI CIVIL IELECTI ENGINEERING GEO. Y. CHOWN, Etugl",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER la the. Best for Childre -it ia healty, soft, c, durable, absorbs and perspiration s prevent ing colds. mily naturai cover- litile one's body. bildren there is -, Stockings, Caps, waters, Night 'Jight Shirts, Py- lppers, Dressing * Jaegoe Stores and ffl..sraied caoefreco pewio Iriii,h \"founded 183 nhsome 1bat Elmz Avenue. Roedile, Toronto ITIAI. AID DAT SCHOOL FOR GIEU IN PRINCIAL.: Mies M. T. Somrr eiAL Mm. Entrm M. RiAw, M.A. Lration for the. University andI for ions ini Music. Art andI J)omestic \u003e.partaeats. Thoroughly efficient rge playgrounda. Ouldoor garries i. Basketball. Rinlc. Healthful The Beauty N of Youth W 7HILE you have the healthy vigorous Beatity \u003c'f youth you *houldcontantlypreserv. andI prot ec Il forthb.year to cerne. Neglect ha: caused many wouuen to look far older than theyshould. A little attention pitI to the snadcomnplexion no yteuse of u 41 Gouraud's Oriental Cream will be arly repaid b your YouthMu Beauty in later yearà. ri net 0111Y Pro- tecta andI preserves the complexion for the future but greatl lrnroves y@ur apperane ow. ýouce\u0026l\u0026 facial bleiishs. I u. 70 yeare. S.nd 1 Oc. for Triai Sie Perd. T. Hopkins \u0026 sona, Nhnm A Ro.idetleand âyg \"fo Situate4. o.ite Qu.eso Park, Bloot Every Edctiona faciiiy pmvi.I.iL P.qzfl lHoncur Matriculation. Mu.kic Art and l'hy.ni The Swéoo\u0026byan unfail15inephasd*u' true wornanhod. Jchn A, Paterson. lU F1vr Calrodar spply Mr%- A. R il. c Moral..u ient ci\u003c a l'reien. Prldta.",
         "12 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CANADA, Put Your Hand To The PIow! r7 fresb furrow mcans Leater sucoess for you, added pro mncreased stregth to th mie andsurer victory for t] ier of Canada are today playing an ail-important part in the i. W. T. White, Canadliau Minister of Finance, sys: lIn interest payinents abroad, sustain our share of the burden oi otetothe grapible degree prospeuity throughout the 1 dut of0 Cnadancitizens to co-operate irn producing ain )f whtca be used or sold. For Canada at tbxs juncture ti: the hotu should be production, production, mnd again prc fulInfuormaation regaxdlag farilg opportuaites in Canada write te T, Easq.,",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Production I NCREA\\SED effort and elflciency in labor, more econorny and less waste in living, building Up capitld by harder work and greater savings, will enricb you and your country. The men and women at home must produce more to cover wa?'s wvaste. I t is easier to make money than to save, it. A Savings Account at The B3ank of Toronto will help save what your increased effort provides. 119 Branches îu Canada ASSET - - $73,000,0,M DIRECTOR5 W. G. GOODERHAM, PRESIDENT JOSEPHI HRNDERSON, VICE PRESIDENT William Stone, John Macdonald, Lt.-Col. A. E. Goodueham \u0026lig.-Gen. F. S. Meigheu, J. L. Kagishait, William I. Gem, Pautl J. Ilyler, A. H. Campbell. THOS. F. HOW, GENfflAL MANAGER Tohm R. Lamb, Supt. of Branche\u0026. D. C. GRANT, ChiW LImpwcor.",
         "14 CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER THE RO Y AL BAI 0F CANADA Inmorporated 1869 Capital Authori.d - 8285ý000,000 Rssuwe Fungis - $ 14,324,( Capittal Paid Op - 12,911,700 Total Aouets - 295,00,C HEAD OFFICE -MONTREAL DIRECTORS: SIR HERBERT S. HOLT, PNwdeU B. L. PEASE, V-Preg\u003ceM\u003c E.B.J,OHNSTON, K.C.,M4d Pte jamesRedmnond G. R. Crowa ft K. £JUatt Ho.W.H.Il orne Hugb Patoc Wm. Robetti A. J. Bo.., K.C. W. J. Shepp.,d C. S. Wilox A- E. Dyneot C. E. N4eill Sir Mortimer B. Davis Li. IL. Duggati C. C. Blackadar John T. Ross R. MacD. Paterso n G. G. SIL *xeoutlve Offiers. E, L. Peaue, \u003eMaaging Director C, E. Neill,. General Manager W. B. Torrance Suiperintendent of Branch\" F. J. Shernmn, A.elhtant Ge.era 36-BANCHES THROUGMOUT CANADA AND NEWFOUNDLAN Als Brnchs i Cuba.. Porto Rico, Dominicau RepoMlic. Costa Rica, Vettela. At BraoDominsca, Ga-enada, Jamasca, St Kitts. Tirdad \u0026cd Esbam~a Issandu Brtiskh G uia\u0026d Brtish Hondurs Leu,19L Blank BNWp., Priam S. E. C. lW TOhK, \u0026Wue tia, aC SAVINOS DEPARTMENT RANCHÈS Why Worry? T HE prevailiig war conditions bave muade maiiy me dik seriously of Ue ln Our b.utinmu b. bes growing more rapidly dia. ever uince thdi. enemn war, largely 1ecause mn who are uninsured or under-insui.d are rea$izing tbat i sm t.igt woufy about aud find in Lii. Insurance a ready means of overco.",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER -U Ca\"ia ;.,000 ,ve Fund - 7,421,2 S2 I kpoIts 92, S102,072 IAsoats - - 21,130,568 233 SaaukeS In GentiUL. Extend.ng frorn the Atlantico t1he Paeific. vingt Departmeut at \u0026Vl DrsacL.s. its r\"eoevd of $1,0 and upward. an~d intertg ailowd ti beet current rate.. Geaia Baaking Buainme.. Thne Depositor of a Dollar is as welcome to open an ac- count with thîs Corporation as the depositor with thousands. We know by experience that the large majority of such ac- counits steadily grow. The. accumulation of smnall savings in this way is a satisfaction to us as well as 'to the depositôr. Do not delay the opening of an account because the first deposit may appear to you to be too smnall. Begin today. We credit interest at Tbnree and one-haif per cent per annumn, and compound it twice each year. Canada Permanent Mortgags Oorporatlon ESTASuSUES 1818s PaNd-up Capta and Roserv ELIVIN MILIONSS DOLLARS Toronmto St., Toronto'",
         "1 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER , dY~ e3m l There is a distinctive tone -about Marquess Papeteries which appeals to the womnan Of refinement. The. paper is of the. finest quality and the envelopes have an exclusive appearance which conveys a pleasing impression. SuppUied in white o01y. Ask your stationer for a box. n9-17 Wnnipeg .Tt vat m ue. You Look, for SECURIT' Whether with the intention of talci out insurance or associating yourself w some Comipany, you look for security. The latest figures emphasize the i excelled\"financial position of this Compai UUses In Force u\u003ever sooo ASMes 4' 1,400,000 Net surpus 46 2,,00000 ny is knciwn as \"Solid as thse",
         "I",
         "Froin Lhý Painting by G. Horne Rt;*scII THE SAILING BOAT Ruskin han said that the sailing vessel in the only thing made by mani that harmonÎ2o, properly with nature. The harmony in thie, pîcture certainly in very pie asing. It in a viewx of Paeeamaquoddy Bay, New Brunswick.",
         "7?CmG WNAPIN *NAQAýZN TORONTO, OCTOBER, 1917 No. 6 11bwoo0b frtcnbs of tbe lmt C1UMIp BY HAMILTON M. LAING HE camp in the elm cluxup stood upon what xuight be called popu- loua MNanitoba soil. With a prairie lake near the. front door, a marsh not far from the back, and tic- nid heavy Woods of elm aud oak telter round about, tiiere were ood folk iu pleuty for neigh- aud iu variety that may flot ud about many camp uites. were grebes and gulis to ery ail from the open lake, ducka )ots and heronsand waders to lui the. marshes, wrens, yellow ms,. robins and eatbirds to sing cherry thickets, and iiawks aud nough over lu the. big Woods te Stouch of the. flerce and preda- ýde of ivild lite. There were uot of every kIud; it seemed that ,Id folk fouud tis a good place lui or at least to pass the. sum- There are some campers who advo- eate corulug early, some who prefer te stay late and enjoy th mellow days of early auttumn. For myseif, 1 pre- fer te do both. Amng the. wild tinga June is the month of marriages,July the. ionth of younglings, Augu8t brings the wondrous foregatherlugs, and eptmbe i8thetime of tare- wel.I wsgodt e them ail. There were fewsaek days during the summer lu the elin elump. In June it was a musical spot, indeed. Catbirds and yellw wanblers and otten a clfty-celoured aparrow or two always uested lu the. thicketsand the. hop-tangled edges of the. Wood, and nesting witii tii.,. ehaps means song. A dozeu songe to te minute is no meau record, yet the. little varbiers kept itupso for hors The catbirds, of course, 11k. the. great artists that tiiey are, sang much less etten, but every one of their song-sessions was a treat.",
         "THE GANADIAN MAGAZINE THE CAMP IN THE MANITOBA HLMI CLUMP Then there were othars that came across from the main woods te sing. The. black-billed cuckoo, the orioe, the rose-breasted grosbeak and the. magie- tbroated thrasher ail stole over to the ilump and took a turn hara, aven though their wives sud nasts were elsewhere. The. isolation of the tiny wood seamed to appeal~ to the emo- tionàl artistry of thesa feilows. When thineadlark came up from the Iow ladtoo* pereli upon the elm's tip over the tent and with abandoned as ne ,as alm of tin cazus nailed here an about the littia wood ineree wreu population by several j know of no use for old ca yields such profits. Tan son@ minuta tiiesa vivacioua f eUoý tained in long stretehes. 2. them tan-hour days-thare unions ini the 'wild, and uiXteE would bc nearer the. mark-sx rapidity means six thousand zUgb al *onth !",
         "IIIE ELM CI",
         "A PAIR OF KINGBIR1)S and as suddenly stop; and in of bis maie throat I fear ho churl. i. song period is al- onei of the shortest, in the woods. ýes to sing for a purposa: to 'or himself a wife; and this ae- lished, he shuts up bis beak. He gret deceiver; but evidently Iaoks awife. No art for its sweet sake for him I He may L bit while bis mate la brooding, .t the first chlpping of a shell al festivlties are off. Only one neiglihour of note here waa so mualelaxis o! the North have been so churlish is The eatbird and wr were the only bird nel really friendly. The the picing-up excellen- ed space about the tent. ing that I gave hlm; bi ical to see hlm watel aparrow ebewing the 1 the oats that I put out 1 aquirrels. He often ma Iiterest ini the sparrow",
         "ONLY A VISITOR IN THle ELM CLUMIF able for it, but mine showed no trait. H1e had no particular use le and merely accepted me as a of the landscape. 1 faney, how- that lie was wise enougli te know he cows and hawks did flot corne about the tent; but 1 do not wiah one to infer that lie had any bude. H1e never said, \"Thauk even for the drink or bath with that h. aecured when I fergot te 7 the wash water frein the basin;: le would drink or bath apparent- th preiation in suds that were e day iny catbird amused me thanusual. I saw him out on odded patliway pe*king at some big thing, and w-hen I trainied the glasses on hini 1 was treaited te a comical bit of half-tragie acting. Hie lied cauglit a litge hawvk mnoth rater- pillar, three inehies long, thick as my middle finger, green, ridgy, a tougli cuistemer, and now the bird wa,, try- mng viinly to puneture hi. The. lus- ejouanie-,s of sucli a rare mnorsel wuu on the inside of that tougli skin. 11mw he pecked and pounded and flailad tuis stubbern thingi 1 ouglit to have been qerry for the uinfortuinate, but 1 was net, because for two weeks the. wretch liad lived ini the elu branehes above my table, and lie had ne respect for me. Bang, biii!, ehuck, ehuck the. bird went at hMn but neyer au im-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE A YOUNG PIED4UILLED GRIBE pression did h. make. The song row hopped around and looked if offering advice or e»courage I fanucy that hi. aeed-crushing ¶rould have mnade a hreach ii tough wall i no time, but the ci gave him no opportunity. F when I could not stand to se eye Jenny seolded angrily as; I was intruding inher tent, \u0026 ed out of the. door. Sompti pun we! ed the Jenny of usel e black-",
         "WILDWý%OOD FRIENUSIz 0F THE. ELMI CLUIMP YOUNG BLACI\u003c MAKSH TFRN iotonos, ventriloquil chant that midnight was almost nncanny. ýy were always sly at their neat- ,and thougli they raised two Dds, both sometimes escaped detec- i. Such youngsters onglit to be 1 bidden. They are the uglicit, iijet things ini the woods; carry h a miserable, wet-hen appearance t they inake onie feel sorry for M. n June every bird with asong in Lgeta it out to the beat of his abil- Even the kingbird tries to sing. ie of the flycatcher tribe eould be roned as musicians, yet the king- 1 in the very early morning, at ; time of year, sings a sort of li- cribiable solo in a manmer deserv- Late June and July, the time of yonnglings in the 'woods, was a sea- son of keen interest. Young mparrow hiawks rai.\"ed in a fieker-hole aerom in the woods and young lickers ulso nsed to icorne to set up a dii li the big elm. It is sixto half adoen be tweeu these two as to which eau raise the most rumpus when the parents are distrlbntlng eatables. Yong puls and terni were oftenunpou the lake- shore, aud a clisse by canoe sornetimes bronght a near-flight youngster to bag for the camera. Old Red-tail, the big hawk, always ueated somewhere in the oaks and as the youngsters are tardy and stay a long time iu the nest I usually ronlid find thexu and make them pose. Though the early-uest- ,iug horned owls always had thefr yonng off on the wiug by Jue, 1 eonld couxit on findiug a nestfuil or two of the amaller, long-eared owls. And there are no more iutsreutlnq yonngsters in the woods than the~ juveulles o! the hawks and. o'wks The appearance of these raptorial younptens is the worst of them. Theroe seareely conld be fond a more eom- ical make-up than that o! the yonng",
         "\"THE BROWN THRPASHER CAIME ACROSS PROM THE MAIN WOODS\" long-ear. When he îe big enougli to sit on the neat-rimn aud sec you com- ing ho lias a most ludicrous trick of stretching himself tail and thin quite out of ail natural or normal propor- tion. If lis home is in the dark he will glare upon yon with most devil- isli eye, a veritable bogey-eyed leer; but ho ie rathor mucli a bluffer and does not scratch our hands so hard as we might expeet oven when we give hlm every provocation. He lias a way of using droadfully bad language oxpressed by snapping hie beali, but lie knows littie about biting. After ho leave the noat he has a peuliar habit of squealing iu the niglit; it is a signai, 1 believe, lntended for the par- ents that they may fluxd hlm and bring hlm food. Thougli the long-ears sol- dom come close about camp, I hear them often disturbig the silence of the niglit in the obus across lu the main Wood. No more lnteresting visitor from the wild than Jimmy the young red- tailed hawk perhape ever was studied about camp. True,, hie visit was a forced one; for thougi lie could fly, hoc wae tee amateurieli to be a suc- cess at it, and we cauglit hlm and lield hlm mildly captive for a shiort time. Insteadc of being the demon hie 444 appearance at ifirst denoted, ho so smootlied down and bocame reaily amiable chiap. The only time evinced mucli ferocity was when was liungr; but a inawful of frE meat turned hîm almost instari frein a ferocioue Hyde into a w( mannered Dr. Jekyil. Ho was a w( der ail througli, and lie furnisb much nature study food. Hm marv lously cloar oye was hie greatest w( der, but hie wings that always drox ed wlien lie was approached, and 1 moutli that insisted on staylng op bof ore company, his mighty talc snd liooked beak- and feathered troi ors ail rewarded intimate investl tion. Not ail the neighbours of the siu mer were feathered. The gray grou equirrels liold the fort stronf throughout the wood, the chipinur claimed. the trece, aud a strip «goplier» (spermophile) or two\u003e uix ly hung around the grassy entrat where they couldmake a ash in and again and share the eatables wý their bullng gray neiglibours. I1 not so sure that any of the three w( oeood friends to, have. Tlhat Iv",
         "A STRIPSI) SPERMOPMIILE was a proved certainty; and wlxen 1 eaught this tree-living chipmnunk aise ini a wren's nest murdering the hait- fiedged young in spite of the utmost efforts of the parents, I feit that per- lisps I ought to take out the littie specinien gun and make a kiiIing my- self. But I stayed my avenging hand, and the littie gun wrecked vengeance on the Ieng-tailed weasels instcad. For now and again one of these tawny yeliow ehaps came up fremn the lake- shore and wandered about the grove; whereupon the other denizens always set up a sort of \"stop thief» din, the birds and the wrens especially rais- lng great to-do. There are more tragedies in the wild than ordinarily one imagines, and it is enly when we live close te nature snd keep aiert that wc sec realities. There i. nothing iu the way of a leaguie among the wild things; comnninterest is the oxily tic te bind thein. Death staika by day aud niglit and is regarded indWfereutiy, save iu its relation te self. More than oe tragedy has been enaeted almost at w\u003e' fireplace; anRd one must be a keen erlininai deteetive te be able nlways te name the, killer in the wild. Whleu I finid the feathers of a guil on the sand nt the landing, 1 guess duek hawk. When 1 stuimble upon a de- capitated cathird under the elms. 1 gne.s sharp-shin hawvk. A mepadow meuise warmn aud liixnp wlth a tiny, bleedy bite about hi. hedling in the erotch of my look-out tree,. speils wcascl, A decapltatcd coot, with its breast torii, lyiugr near the sleuigli margin, tells me that the heorned owl ha. been huuting there. But thioul I know that 1 am otteu correct, there are man\u003e' guess-again deedu of dark- ness that def\u003e' my solution. Death comes aise in les.l violent ways. More than eue littie grebe hw. eome \u0026shore te die: young gulls lest or abandoned die each seasonl at the landing, and it i. probable that the same silent tragedy gees on in wood sud thieket. It i. mereiy easier to observe it iu the case et the water birds. The yoing fal1 eut ef the nest and perish; wvinds aud rain aud bail, play havoe. Denth seemi coutinuail\u003e' abroad in the wild. Uusually the visiý1- tation is sudden, but net always. The gul with broken wing that mopes on the shore must await hi. end by starv- ation, if net by a visit trom the marsx hawk or duck hawk. Man\u003e' a siightly ailing bird ia able te eare for himself in a half-way nianuer, but belug un- ale to migrate muaiit await the cern-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE yellowlegs, the two laut mentio species were the moat companioni and confiding. A callow young lowlegs freali from the North is to be found wondrously tame and scliooled ini the ways of man, nimble-footed sanderlings were sea, ly leus trustlng, and ini attemptinl photograpli them they have fooled mo¶,e than once by rwmning aroi ray tripod. The godwits were friendly ini the lest; the willets Nq more kiiidly, but when they were r( ed they always shouted noisily raised a linge cry. T~he spctted sa pipera alwayu were found consister nervous, acary fidgets, ready at a ment's notice to go darting off j4 ily over the water. With the eoming of September the thinning of the leafage the v neighbours of the summer seemeé inelt away. The cuckoo, grosbi thrasher, kingbird, wrens and v blers are birds of the leaves anid t now stole away without a word leave-taking. 1 did not; see them 1 xnerely missed tliem after they gone. The ground aquirrels h\u003c away; the chipmunks came out c in the sununy hours. The woods N silent save for a rustling by day the feet of the new sparrow nei bours and juncoes moved ini the t OWL kets, and aquiet whispering at ni@ a letting go of tired littie leaf ha \u002bh smnd a riohinu, in tlie fill À îdma.ý",
         "ISy \u0026Mifr9?7kve IX.-MISS CARRIE MATILDA DERICK: UNIVERSITY PROFESSOR lISS DERIOR a the honour of being the fit weman aPpointed to a la professorship i auy Canadian univeruity, a whieli witnesses ineentestably to distinction of lier scholarship in cliosen field of study and researchi iorpliologieal botany. At present ne» are far more adequtely repre- tLed in the student than in the -lhig and governing bodies of our vermities; ideed, wemen have al- it no volce in the deciuions whicli p. the courses cf higlier education, ri for their own sex. n the scientifle and prof emmeiai Id Miss Derick is a unique figure, lier career iu of far greater sig- ,ance to her time and ceuntry, be- s alie lias net eiiesen te 'stand df s well as alone. Despite the. rated to Canada early in 1783. Rer Misser Edic CôtDnAerlos» aidy Mif gEda faml.n ahni daugera lady rfi oo M a il, vas eir ongher Car- ri4 tl i ld86 , a Clarn lo Jau tat corner cf62 Qube Plronvice, ien sua tcoatrnero TueecProipnce Ti.n ais tahe \"Eaeun Twn ships\". The, vit tae lies befleel Lskesuo Bhaylat anehd of Rchele River eChtmrlain n the 'ihieuay asve tof pterribl otoi. rinuols tey the rnlisttie- of thei o ui o th r n h s u e minss eikla .. otnt i rMcissvin tha ee ftooitratin wleivie ga as 80orug iprtaint«e' suceshi regard ausnsac imotant sd profess in onsSht upsss fren tnd pcofesson\" e le nativ pc teo hei Nornial ofSebol native pa.cre4 offMei Noe rinae Scfol wae sh eai ited ohf terie ofI Wnales dl tk prse lu hues, zooilog Uiesitd tany, sudz graduated in 189, ing fist rn lioeours inntrlscience adthe Logan gold niedal. Imzuedlately ulie began the. toacli. ~ig ef lierfavourite science, as demon- strator at McGill University snd spe- ciai teselier of botauy at Trafalgar Ihatitute. I 1895 sh. vas apoint- .d lecturer at the unlversity. e-",
         "THE OANADtÂN MAGAZINE while ah. continued lier studies at lier alma mater and teck lier M.A. degree in 1896. V.ry frequently she teck advantage of the long vacation to take special work. Tliree times 8he at- tended Harvrard University summer schools; one summer ahe spent in Eng- land, studying at the Royal College of Science ini London, and once, ob- taining a year's leave of absence fromn lier duties at the university in 1901- 02, mli. spent almost eighteen montha in Germany. Duriug the first sumn- mer alie gave mucli time te visiting the laboratoriea and betanical gar- dens of the. Tniversities of Munichi and Berlin. The. remainder cf. the. time-a year-she devoted to study at the University cf Bonn. Several years earlier than this-mî 1895-ah. had taken an advanced, course in \"cryptogamie bctauy\" at the. Marine Biolegical Station, at 'Wood's Ilol iu Massachusetts, and lier. ln the. following summer sh. be- gan an investigation, under the direc- tion of the late Dr. J. E. Humphrey, of \"the early development of the Floride\". 8h. continued the. work lndependently in 1897, and the re- sulta were published, some twc years later, lu The. Botanical Gazette, Chii- cage. The. article, which attracted a gecd deal of attention in scientific quartera, was included in several lista of new lterature, and an abstract of it wss given in The Journal of the Royal Microscopical Society. In December, 1904, Miss Derick read a paper before the. Society for Plant Morphology and Physiology, iu wiicl sh. set forth the. reaults cf in- vestigations into Nuelcar Changes lu (4erminating Seeds\u003e'. Her conclusions ehallenged discussion, but furtiier in- vestigation confirmed the. results of lier earlier work. 14ke other true scientists, iiowev.r, Miss Derick is inedeat. Reviewing the. work of Canadian wonlen iu the. l.arred professions for the Govern- ment book prepared for distribution at the. Paris Exposition cf 1900, sh. wrote: \"I science wcmenn are but beginners and though a f.w are en- gaged iu researchi work, this is sec- cndary to the demande made by busy professional lives; the product ia neessarily limrited and of little inter- est te the. world\". In 1904 Miss Derick was appoiuted assistant professer of Botany. ln 1912 ahe becaine funl prof essor, but, for more than two yearshlad had charge of the. department, with ail the ard- nous work involv.d of planning courses and preparing and delivcring lectures te the advanced students. In addition to lier university work, she lectured for a number cf years at the MeGill Normal Sehool, and later con- ductcd «summer schols and winter classes, especiaily adapted te meet the requirements cf fourth year students cf educatien and teachers cf elemen- tary botany and nature study\". Flurtiermore, Miss Derick has la- boured botii witli tongue aud peu to intereat the general unscientifle pub- lic lu the study cf plant life. At varions times and places ah. lias given many popular lectures, lucluding a series cf «Saturday Afternoon 1Half Hour Taiks te Childrcu\" on \"The Sleep _Movemeute of Plants\", «Insee.. tivorous Plants\"', \"The, Dispersal cf Plants», etc., etc. In 1900 tiiere ap- peared in The. Weekly Star twenty.. eight illustrated articles by Miss Der- ick, containiug much information on Caniadian plants net easily accessible te the general reader. Scm. cf these were reprinted, under the titI. of \"Flowers cf tiie Field and Forest\"\u003e. As a recreation. penliapa, from the. severe atudy entailcd by ber profea.. sional work, Miss Derick bas gleaned frein tixue te time in the, field of the folk-lore cf plants. \"In thie Eastern Townships,\"\u003e se. says, \"are~ te be still found lingering superstitions and quaint ideas which reveal the stcry of the. past. Clareneeville . . .i t\u003eeoffled bv the descendants of rik.",
         "Portrait by Mm. Minna Kýc 1'R.PýS. MISS CARRIE MATILIDA DRRICK A PiOo- Unieity Profosor i. C.nada e current folk-lore cau often be aced to English, Scotch or Irish arces. Nor is the yieldf plant-. -as rich as might have been heped. !oming, as they did, more than oee ndred years age, te hiew out a new me in the heart of the primeval rest,\" the early settlers «lived close ough te nature te lay axp a rich Sre of weird faneles and strange rends for the delight of their chil- en\u003es chldrena. But the struggle for istence was tee keen.» They had ne nie te weave new storles or even t\u003c\u003e ap alive the old. «Moreever, the ects of the late war were se, deeply preused upen their hearts that the uhulseences of eld age were of the ýense realities of the immediate paat ther than of the superstitions about As a mnatter of fact, American and, Canadian plant-lore la largely of a medicinal clhars.cter. In some dis- tricts a potato, in others «a double cedar-knot» la carried ln the peket te eharm away rheumatism. As \"the dyspeptir, nature of Clarenceyille peo- pie demanded varied treatment\", and. \"the effleaey of inediciue was meas- ured by its uupleasantness\", boneset, dandelion aud tansy teas ail feund eager advecates. Eeme-made reme- dies for the prevalent throat and lung, troubles were aWs numerous. Amouat, these time-honoured deoetl\u003cms many are \"stili censldered useful ln hoe pharmacy\u003e'. In parts of Canada, as elaewhere, certain plants are ussd, with the pro- per incantations, as love-charma, Iu Campheilten, New Brunswick, love-",
         "THIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE lor damsela have beeii known te try te divine the. future by means of this- tle-heada under their pillow. Miss Derlek is greatly interested in the coxmon anxd local names of plants. Many have been borrowed indiscrim- inateIy frein eider lands. Ùthers, ucli as '\"meeting-houses», (Âqtuilegia caina- denais) ; \"quaker-ladies\" (HoLatonia caeruli6\u003c), and \"white man's foot» \u003cFia*ago major), the st named of whicii was supposed by the Indians te follow in the steps of the white man, suggest an American origin. 'There is aric fld frinvesti a- liefs ef the. Indians and thie poetie tancem of thi. French CanadlansY In the. namlng ef plants are hiuta of black spirits and whiite; saints, f airies, and the. quaint, briglit fancies of child- iiood; but «early superstitions are rapidly vaxiishing before the light of modern science, and all should record at once\" [the suggestion cornes with peculiar force frein se notable a sciezi- tist] \"any legeud or peculiarity met with, before it is tee late, for lin them lies xuuch of the. hlstory of our people; its nature legends are often the only iimertal poseso ef a race\". Amougst Miss Derick's 'wnitlngs are biograt\u003ehical sketches of several werk- tured upen «Tixubers and their eases\" before the Montreal Societ: Canadian Engineers. Despite ail lier achievemente may b. said once again that '1 Derick lias not allowed lier scien interests to absorb or make lier sided. 8h. has identified herself i the work of a number ef educati4 and philanthropie associations. Girls' Club of Mentreal, organiao\u003c 1891, andi parent of the Univer Settlexuent, was suggested lby I Derick's paper on \"Women W EarnerW\". For many years she lias been of the leadiug spirits in the Cou of 'Women, and, wlien in 1912, retireti froxu the. presideucy of Montreal Local Coundil, she was sented with a hundreti dollars in g represeuting the. lite patronage of National Couneil. \"lIn ail the wor] the. Council,\" saiti Lady Drumm\u003c whe madie the. addtreus, \"Misa Deri trained intelligence and lier inft capaeity for taking pains lias beez the. greatest value. One objeet abc. followed with especial. suceess- educâtion of women ln civie aff, and the. stirrlng up of the. wexxu conscience and senue of municipal spensibility. HTer efforts were nifleant of the. hope that men",
         "J;JU-Ix.rJ might b. raised Wo the rank of a i'ofession, like nursing\". 9«The coun- 7y did not need the addition of greac iimbers of womn to those already igaged in the learneti professions,\" ie said, «though in these woenen of \u003enius would nieet with littie diffi- ilty and could rentier services of in- Jlculable value to their fellows. rhere women would finti fields worth mquering would b. ini agricultural irsuits and domestie service.\" With few exceptions\" [this is in- resting considering how littie troti- mn by women bas bee» the path o! las Derick's experience] \"a Cana. V lu-MU 451 dian wornan is free to pasue any eall. ing for whichi shie may be fitted. Tii. public will riot question her choie, and she miay do hier work with the cairuness and self.-poise of lier who bas arrived! Then, judged bY the eharacter of lier work, whihis ian tiie nature of things sextess, she will sou» reaeh lier level, ho it high or o. . .. «Without ageson, wlthout any noisy obtruaiveness. a few Causclian women, by deep thought, by olear vision, or by honest service have pre- pared the way for those who wlll fol- low, and have proveti the ri\u003cht of al Wo work as they are able.\" The. aubject of the. next sketchi of thimsûmries is Mother Uanna4 founmdrss of tiie ýerhiood of St. John the Divine and a ploneer in war nursing in Otuada,. PLACE VIGER BY GRÂCE MURRAY ATKIN ()N morning watching froru my om I saw the daw2n Quicken the shadows in the. gloom Andi show the idiers in the square The night bati sheltered, sleeping there. The tulips siiook their soarlet heatis Âeross the lawn, That from their painteti woodeni beds I such a lonely, bopeleos way These sleeping men shoulti great the daY, DT A /l?~ ~",
         "Zbe Oranb Crunk's lRew IPrezti'el - ter. Ibowarb 0. 1teIIer HE4 presidency o! tie Grand Trunk Railway la regarded as one o! the most highly' prizedi posi- tions in tlie railway world. A systeni whieli serv es practically ninety per cent. of Cnadah's rb an population, lias more t ha iglit thousand miles o! line and la a great international traffle artery ranks among the great railway organ- izations o! Aýmeriea. Mr. fioward G. Keiley, who succeeds Mr. E. J. Cham- berlin as president o! the Grand Trunk Railway Systeni, the Grand Trunk Pacifie Railway, and associated companies, lias long been known in the transportation field as an able executive officer, and hie wide experi- enee flts ii adiuirably for the bigh position to which lie lias been eailed. That experience lias been gained in tblrty-lve years o! railway work, dur- ing whieh time lie had charge o! the construction aud maintenance depart- mente o! important railway systeuia. His ability as a rallway engineer wus recogni l i is election te the presi- dnyo! the American Railway En- gîc*n aud Maintenance of 'Way The Jate Charles M. Hay brouglit Mr. Kellky to the Grand Trunk ten years ago as Chief Engineer. Fd years later he was promoted to position of Vice-President in cia o! operation, maintenance and e struction, an office whiei lie held to the date o! hie appointinut President o! the road. In addition to splenid scient and practical training, Mýr, Keiley the qualities of mîmd whicli nake thc anccess!til handling o! big tai fis railway associates speak of I as a man who, inspires the loyalty i affection whieh lead te efficiency i accomplislient. His courtesy is a veneer, but part of the nman humu and it îs~ extended not only to the fluential cailer, but to ail who e( i contact with him. His capa( for work la a tradition in a busir where liard and exacting labours demanded of aIl. Work, it la said his only hobby. He delights i fie find i the daily crop o! probbd relative to railway administration tie exhilaration that lie needs. H a big man i a big position, and achievements wiil be watched m close interest by all wlio reallas important part whiei the (3t Trunk lias played and contiuu play i the development of tihe ininion.",
         "MR. HOWARD G. KELLEY New President of the Grand Trunk Raiiway System and the Grand Tronk Pdci Raîlway",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "tn tbc 1presenit ZUar 13Y PROFESSOR JOHN CAMIERON, M.D., D.Sic. 111 fo1lo»wing* refl(ectis havr heen1 insqpired hy a study , fo the ancestral bistory of the different com11batants engaged ini on Itue preient wvorld war, in whciit will ho found that Dar- win's theory of evolution le playing ne0 siiali part. 1If it ho truc, as bar- win affirnis, that man is descended frein loweri types of the animal king- dom, thon lie oughit te exhibit traces of this aincestry at varions stages of bis developmnental history. To put the inatter terscly, eaoh individual animal during its developmnent lias to elimh the ancestral treo, on the topinost bough of whichi is man, alone in ail his glory. -Man, however, occasionally slips off his higli poeh and aliglits on one of the lower branches. This ten- dency to revert te a lower ancestral type la freely reeognized by ail biolo- gists, and ferms the main toit o! this communication. Applying this idea te the human brain, one finds that the expansion of the skuil is essentiaily due te the de- manda made upon it by the develop- lng brain. Therefore, in lower types both of mankind and o! the animal klngdom ln goneral, one finda low forms of skuil comamensurate with the stage o! evolution whîoh the enclosed brain bas reached. As a reminder o! this !act, one regularly meeta with cases o! humai' reveralon to lower animial types. Mroehieidiots furit-sh\"I one o! the hoat exam1pleýS of tri ncncy te a Itro-ae\".L these hall humai' ereatures, whnt real- Iy bappens is, that both the birain and skull cease te grow and remnain ll aL primitive statge almnost comparable te that of the ape. The nest signifleant facts of ail regarding therse nnfortun- ate individuals are that the, cliii is markedly receding and apie-like, aind they are frequently devoid of the power of speh In this rolationship it is important to note thnt in sl the only member o! the animal king- dom wvho posse a chin, an anatom- ical feature which is of the greateet significance, for its evolution le assro- ciated with the developinent of the gift of speech. Darwin, in order te support bis theery of evolution, madle the asser- tien that the «miiissing In\"between man and lower animnals would b. found aomewhere. As a matter o! fact, houes of a very low type, se low indeed as hardly te b. ralieil human, were discovered in the islaud of Java in 1892, that is ton years after Dar- wiu\u003es death. These romains are now known as those of the Java man-ape, who, geelegistq declare, was in exist- once about half a million years ago. Pro! essor Oshoru, of the. American Museum o! Natural History, bas re- cently made a reconstruction o! the head nnd features ef thia ape-like",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE creature from its skuil. xI carryxxg thia out, a considerable amouxit of imagination h\u003ead to be brouglit itt play; but ît exhibits a low reeeding foreliead, flat wlde nostrils, and prom- inent jawa and teeth, particularly the eye teeth, whîch overlap eacli other li lower animais for offensive purposes, but i maxi are on the same level as the other teetli. The moat significant feature of ail, liowever, is the ?eceding chîn, whicli probably indicates that this 11missing link\" was devoid of the power of speech. Axiother \"missixig link\"' was un- earthed in the Neanderthal i Ger- maxiy li 185C6, at the time wlien Dar- win was liard at work on his theory of evolution. The diseovery aroused the greatest interest amoxigst coin- parative anatomista, and lias i fact proved a controversial question We tisi very day. Of course, it wau i- convenient that tlie remains should 'have been fouxid i Germaxiy, and ae- eordigly certain Germaxi uxiiversity professers were called upoxi to dis prove that the Neanderthal maxi was onie of the «mîssixig links\" which they ne donlit felt oxiglt to have been dia- covered elsewliere. Now as la well known, a German professer caxi be got te prove anything, if ordered Wo do su from headquarters, more particularly since the comimencemnt of the pres- ent world war. Accordingly the bones were examined by several German ln- vestigateru and, as was tW be expected, they came te the uxianimeus decialon that the Neandertiiel maxi eould not have been a normal beirng, but was a sporadie axample representlig an ex- treme departure from the xiormnal con- ditioni. Profeasor Virchow, thexi Germaxiy's greateat pathologist, anid the bearer of a famoua name i medicine, aIse made an investigation of the remains, and his conclusion was that the skele- ton had been modifled by disease. This was nothing les. than a deliber- ate misrepresexitation, for the bones have sixice been proved We be perfect- Iy normal li every way. It ia ixideed lamentable to thînk how a man of Vir- chow's reputation eould have demean- ed himself tW sucli an extexit. Axiyway, the strategy of these German profes. sors absolutely attained its object at the time; for thiey totally misled sueli a shrewd observer as Darwin, mast as so many of us have been xnisled by them, xowadays. The Neanderthal specimen was exactly one of the. \"missing links\"' Darwin was search ing after to prove has evolution theory, yet lie aecepted the report of the Ger- maxi prof essera anid ignored it eon- tirely. The other traces of Neander- thal maxi atSpy, Krapina, and else- where were uxifortuxiately not un- earthed uxitil after Darwin's death; but their discovcry absolitely refute4 botli the sporadic and thie patholog- ical theories of the German profes. sors. Truly one'e ains always fixid one out 1 The episodes chronieled above cleax,- ly ixidicate that the \"Prusaianlzixig» of the Germaxi university staffs has been li existence for at least fifty years, and la therefore flot a recently developed movement, as xnany seexu te think Apparexitly their gospel is that the Înterests of the Fatherland are tW be the prime conalderati\u003cm. Anything that le to benefit it la to b. scrupulously, or even uxiscrupulously, cultivated; -while any fact which may prove to be detrimental We its rejnxta-. tioxi or honour la to be immedxatejy suppressed. People of this stamp are not fosteriug the advaxicement of science and learxiing in the slights dcgree. On the contrary, their opin. ions are su swayed by national bis and so ixiluenced by the «higlier au tliority\", that they become groslj mlsleadixig anid fallacious. Prof essor Osburxis recent recon-. struction of the buat of the Neau\u003cIer-. thal maxi froxu bis akuil exhibits the feebly-developed foreliead, heavy pro jectiug bony ridges above the eyes, tlirusting foreward of the jawsan moutli, and a reeeding ehin-align of racial ixiferlority. A compaio of the bus wih the skuIl will serva%",
         "THE INFLUENCE 0F ANCESTRY IN TITE PRESENT WAR te cenvince semre anthropologiets that Professer Osborn lias licou a littie tee flattering to Neanderthal man iii his reproduction. For example, the de- ficlency of the frontal, reglon et his skull does not warrant the amount of ferehead eonferred upon him, îu the buat; moreever, the whele aspect ot the features ouglit te have been repre- sented as decidedly more bestial. When oe, ecompares the Neanderthal skuil with thjat of the Java man-ape, one really begins te appreciate howv low the Neaindcrtlial type of skuili is, aud how Darwin would have wClcem.1 ed and acelaimed it as one of hia \"Cmissing links\", had lie neot been 50 gros.Iy misld. Poor Darwin! To think that lie did not sur-vive te sc the einmation of bis life's work. The great River Rhine and the peaks of the Alps appear te have proved formidable obstacles te Nean- derthal man's advance into western Europe. H-owever, within quite re- cent years fragments ot skulls show- ing some et the features ot the Nean- derthal type bave heen uneartlied iu France snd even iu tar away Gibral- tar. This latter dliscovery la interest- ing, fer it suggests that Neanderthal man was attempting te escape into Africa, across the Straits ef Gibral- tar,, durlng the enset ot the ice epel iu Europe. At any rate, if he did penetrate ite France lie appears te have been exterminated there by the more recent Cro-magnon race, se call- ed troni the caves in France, wliere oine et the remains were found. The ànull et this race was of a hlghly evolved type, the amount of frontal development belng censiderably great- er than that ot the Neanderthal speci- men, as la weil illustrated in Professor )sberxi's reconstruction et the head. Iu tact, the. terni et kuil compares quite favourably with that ot modern Erpeans. This Cro-magnon race also inaultested the first glinunerings of culture in the terni of rude draw- lugs et animaIs on the walls et theli, caves. They appear te have been ot greater stature than the Neanderthal man, whose average hieighit was ouly about five feet four and one-haif ichles, whicli la, of course, consider- ably below the average stature ot a maie aduit ait the present day (five foot seven ,rnd one-haif inclies). Ever «ythinig, thven, seemas te point te, the, tact that the Cro-mnagnon rac.e was et a very mucih mnore higlyl' developed type than the Nieandei(rtlial, and ws indeed well worthy te represent oe stop iu the velution et the aneestry et the Frenol(» race, snd terni the tounidatiens of its art and] culture. One caunot, et course, tell witli cer- tainty if that be se. lndee-d, at very spîrited centroversy lias been waged ovor the ltimiate fate et Cro-niagnon muan. '.emre geelogiets dvelare that ho may have died eut as a consequence et the inexorable law et natture, whereby grewth la tollowed byv decay and doath, while othiers assert'that he may have follewodi the rindi(efr uorth- wVards into the, polar regieus during the retreat et the ice harrier wlien the. glacial epocli passed away, and lie- corne degenerated inte thev Eýskimo, Ou coming now to the, question et British ancestry, one finds there la mncli te inspire iuterest. Tt la only tour years ago since the tossil remains et real primitive mani weýre discever. ed i l3ritan at a place called Pult- down, near the south coast et England. These reinains, which have becomne knowun al] over the worldl as the Pilt- down skeleon, are deelarvd by geelo- gists aud anthrepologists te represent the moat anciéent traces- ot Homo sap- ieIs yet dlscovered. The generie naine Eoihrops, whieh lias been applied te this bunian type, la mot appro- priate, for it meaus the mn et the. dawn. Seeing that the Piltdewfl re- mains are more ancient thaii the Coe- magnon or Neanderthal speclmens, then accordlng te, the Darwlniau theory, the sknll ought to show more primitive features than eitiier et tiiese. As a matter et fact, it does net; compare taveurably 'with the. Cro- maguon type, as oue would expeet; but, on the other band, it la a much",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE filuer type of skull than the Neander- thal, wichél, or course, one would not hiave ex.p(ceted from its inuch greater antiquity. One notes, for example, that the frontal deýveopinent is xnuch better and ilot nearly'50 simian or aipe-like. The lower jawv exhibits the features of flic Neanderthal type ini the absence of a chin, which means, of course, thiat tile- powver of speech was probabl 'y feebly developed, as in the case of Naetalman. The eye- tecth show, hiowever, a great al- teration, for thiey are very simian in the Piltdown skill. This means that they proecet above the level of the other teeth. and overlap their fellows, mnanifestly for purposes of offeuce and dlefence. Îu the Uepidelbcrg jaw, which is elosely allied te the Neandertli type, thioe yc teth are on the saine level as thv other teeth, and this is the con1ditionl iii the Modern hluman il1W. It is interesting to compare the out- liues of the Piltdown, Neaxiderthal and Cro-magnon skulis, for they re- present al remnarkable study iu the evo- lution of the brain, and demnonstrate very etfeetivei 'y bmw the skiill hias had to expand, particularly in the frontal region, to accomnmod;te the develop- ing brain. A storm of eontroversy has been aroused over the eapacity of the Piltdown skull, but it must at any rate have been greater tban that of the Nee.uderthal, though, as was pointed out in the previous para- graph, it ought to hate been less, con- sidering its rnueh more aucieut char- acter. For example, geologiste de- dlare that the Piltdlow;n man existed at least 100,000 years ago, wbile they say that the Neanderthal mnu could not have appeared until about 50,000 years afterwards. Now, if the Dam- wilan theory bc c.orrect, the capacity of the Neaiiderthal skuil eught to have been soinewhere intermediate be- tweezl the Piltdown and Cro-magin types. I3ielogistq, therefore, assume that the Neanderthal mnan must have been a degenerate offIioot frein the m~ain evoliltiofly stem, a fac whieh we are ail quite willing to admit at the present juncture. Every citizen of our great Empire will bc îutemested and ne doubt rclieved te know that no traces. of Neandcrthai man have s far ben iseevemed in the British lsl es. Prof essor Osborn*s reeuit recqn- .structîin of the head and features of tlic Piltdown mani exhibits uIally points of iîterest. If lie is our anees- tor, the flrst point that strikes one is that thie modeler ]lias not been very flattering ln hie reproduction. A large proportion of the reconstruction hsý, of course, been putrely imaginative, buit onc, would expeet the promineat jaws and teeth to be reflected iu the forwamd thirust of thie xuoutli and lips. The chun is represented as distiuetiy receding, but on the other haud the forcead, as the skull indicates, le well developed. Thkese four types that have jua been euumemated, namely, the Java man-ape, Piltdown mnan, Neanderthal mian, and Cro-inaguon nian, represent four very definite and deeided phases ilu the Darwinian evolutiouary seheme. The evidence certainly seems to ind1iý este that the Java man-ape, the Pilt- down aud Cro-inagnon types wero situatedi in that order from below up- wards ou the main stemi of the anes- tral tree, with the Neanderthal mian as a degeucrate offshoot, occuirring soe- where between thec positions oceupied by Piltdown mari an~d Cro-itgo if degeneration, or reversin to type as it ought te be termed, was h fate that 'befell Neanderthal mansin by-geue ages, why sheuld it net occu ini the case of modern mani? Thise idea was eertainly advanced by Darwin\u0026 as oue of the stmongest agmnsi faveur of hise volution teory,an bicdogistm are constautly meeting wt exaxuples of it not ouly ini mn bu aiso threughout the wh*l ania kingdonx. The writer was iuch struc by the reeent rema2rks oif anAnei eau author on this point. Hie sa that \"unuly animais corne ix4ç\u003e, t",
         "THE INFLUENCE 0F ANCESTRY IN TI]1' PR J'ESE1'NT \\VAR 4 h9 worldwhytfot devgenerate humans? Evéry stocýk raiser on flic plais kws whlat a 'trwbe'ineans. Why shold one doubt the sainle condi- fions iii the hum11anl speci0s?ý ]ik- manrck, for- eýxample, mas eMAid The Tro ('aneilr'and 'Thr Man of Jloo !nd Troii'. Ilc hail brass tacks in hi art eries 11e mas a 'fhrowamek ta the poriod of Attil. 11e will be recgniedin futuire toy proli- ably, as flic greatest mental savage Iflt e-(vident that; there are inany mental savagePs of the Bimarck type amng Qe(rmausn, froim thc \"ail] higheýst-\" foth flIowest at the preset day. In- deed, thc senseleas britality of tlie (lePrman qoldicry \u003cturing thie Franco- G'ermn camipaigri or 1870-71, and in tlic present war, bas servel to con- vince onc ftrongly t flic chvii taint of Cain i,4 not yct destroyed, and cant sf11 rnake if vay in fhe surface in certain instances. This tcndrey to reversion to ancient ancestral types is Jhe only explanation those who !lave sztiedP( heredlity eau ofrer for sucli an outburst of animalismt at this ad- waneed stage of the morhdi hlstry. Onue muait recoulet that civillization after ail is bult a thin venerer un fthe surface, so thin iudeed lin nany in- stnesfat it i% flot difficult to rub off. thus exposing the crude barbarous H4enent underneatî. Oue of the obvins duties of the Allies, then, la f0 sfamip out hils vielous element, and thua rescue Germany front herseif. The wrlter iade mauy good fricud- sbips axnongst Qerman sient las whbilst engaged in post-grraduafe Study and rpseareh nt one of their iiiversi- fies fiffeen yea.rs ago. Hie met somne fine intellectual types of men flore, and was treated on ail aides wifh kindness and courtesy. If la, how- #,ver, xnost deplorable fo note how fthe devotees of ieal German culture me- presenfed by the universifies, have absolutelY capifulated to the domina- tion of fllrmian iliary caste, and have applaildc s te veho ecdi frcsh utroc-ify coininitted by that iii- faiînous organlizaitioni. The nie quieion ue %511 natural- ly ask la.\"Wha difforelwe, if any, la 1ltere in flic, con firatIion (if Iie lB- fAh sud Oernanu types cf sknUl nt fhe present day T\" TIc, answer is thaft a, very stirikiig differencct dus oxist. lin order in appreciaf e this Pect more full, one muast indersfand that f he are- two groat tyesf skull, the doi- cli ocphalie or long-heded, aud the brahycphaieor birusd-hesded. The skullls of whitc races lic, in an inter- mediafe group beweufes w types; thaf is tn way, they art, neither exfreýnxely' lorig-henaded nom cxtremnely birond-henaded. thwvefe Britishi skulI fends In approaci the long- livadedl type, w-hile fthc Teutonie ap- pruoxiniafes, fo fthc broad-headed type -u 11111y cases decigiedly se. Frm what bas beni stat od ne Wil now li e fur a ppreciate c wac thlat fhelic hpe of fIe Suluisl entiey de- pendentit upon tIc direction in whbiehi the brai vbooses te grrow. If wuuld, therefome, appear thaf there are cer- tain enttres developedl in fIei Teu- Ionie brain whieh mequire more ruoin in a siet-iedircimn, wliereas tho direction of growflh of fIe centres lu the Brdifh Qte o! bralu la sc thaf the skull las to expaund more lin a forpesd-att direction, to ise a nau- fleal terni. Que eau, therefore, argue fIat fIe psyellology o!fli fh wo races must be differeuf. Their mental ouf- look on lite, fleir standard o! ethies inWa also vary eonaiderably. One reachns fthe inferesting conclusion that fthe present terrible world war really resolvea itselt intu a l! e-and-death atruggle for world domination aud supremaey between the loug-headed and ftxe broad-headed. or in oflier words, betweeu the long-brained and ftxe broad-bralned. We muafs sc In if that the long-headed race wxus.",
         ")iý'mbc TMa*g ibonie BY T. R. RS. GREAVES was a littie woman ýwitli a big heart. Hler kindly eonn- tenance neyer eeased to refleet lier sympathetie soul, and except for the ripples ot silvering hair over lier brows, there was nothing to indicate that lier lite had been oue of Vicissi- tude. lIt was always liard for Jeanie Carson te tell when lier companion was troubled, and 110W as alie watch- ed the eider woxnan reading a card with a toreigu postinark, whicli lad jixat corne with the atterneon mail, she eould detect neither surprise uer despair. Se she waited patiently trnl Mrs. tireaves finished reading, band- cd ber the card, and spoe. \u003c'Not a trace eau they flid of hlma, Jeanie,» she said calmly. \"Seems m5 thewuli tliey have scoured all tlie pri- sons in Germauy. It's a lieap of trou- ble te take for just you and me, my dear.Y \"Oh, it's from the Swiss Red Cross,\" said tlie girl, with a disap- pointed air. \"I theuglit tliey would do something. But it must be a big task te answer ail tlie appeals that are made te tim. lIs our searcli end- ed nowv, mother?\" she aàked quietly. «Something will turn up, child. Il can't believe Geoif is gene-for good. Just keep your heart up, dean?' Nearly a year had passed since the battle of St. Julien, when Pte. Geof- frey Allan Greaves, ef the l5th I3attaion, (Janadian Expeditionary Force, liad been reported rnissmng. Everybody lu. his home city of Lion- ELLIOTI don, Ontario, believed Min, dead, anud wlien word came frein the Mllltia De- partmeut that Pte. Greaves was un- doubtedly killed in action tlie verdict was accepted as final. The soldier's mother was the eue exception, and slie stiil elunig to lier thread ot hope, sIender as it was 110W becoming. Sh. had net been content witli waiting. Appealis liad been made lu succession te the United States Ambassador in Clermany, the Y. M. C. A., and te the Red Cross Society ef Switzerland. Hlospitals iu England were caretuily seanclied. The remuant et the Figlit- înig Fifteentli was appealed te, but tliose of hie comnades whe sunvived the interne et St. Julien liad smaU place in thein memory for Geoff Greaves. Any eue et hie fermer mates coula desenibe helw lie miglit have met death on that terrible Apnil day. IPerhaps lie was ln ene of the mainy trences whîcli were obliterated aud gougea out agaîn by the nain ot higli explos- ives; or lie miglit have been in the track o! one ot the huge «coal-boxes' aud been beaten into the mud like raany another. But net a mani et the l5tli could recail that Greaves had actually met sueli a fate; se that the colonel, writing iu reply te the boy', inothen, -was forced te admit lie could supply ne information in addition ta that whîeh liad been torwarded te the Department. And lie added a mes- sage et sympathy. Sympatliy Mrs. Greaves did not -want. She wauted someone ta sup port lier in lier belief that lier boy",
         "THE WAY HOME would turn up alive, snd in Jeanie Carson, who had been Geoff's sweet- heart, she found the hopeful spirit isle desired. But now, even Jeanie was beginning to despair, though she would not let Mrs. Greaves perceive a shadow of it. \"Read the other letter, mother,\" said Jeanie, poînting te an envelope which tili 110W had laÎn unheeded on the table beside them. The eider woman looked at the ad- dresa. '\u003cIt's front Mrs. Cooper,\" she said, noting the handwriting. \"I've had thiree letters front lier- since bier son Bob was made prisoner of war, and she always bias somiething cheer. fui to say. i wonder what it is this She rend indifferently at first, but soon ber face brigbitened and she turned eagerly to lier comnpanion. \u003c'Wbaýt is it 1\" asked the girl. -Oh, l'in sure it means a new chance, Jepanie, girl. Read this. Mrs. Cooper sends it,\" and shie hianded over a newspaper clipping, a paragrapli in lengtbi. Thie younger woxnan read: ,\",iu.t pci i ne cannot d o everythlng. Whilp the be8et of surgieral Skill is mend. itng tiie boi of mnny broken soldiers, thiere nre, thoseo arniong thern whose minds mWl1 !lot resplond, to treatmeut. The ter- rifie, strain of isomo bittlte ha. been too ranch for them and their iiervea or their mainds ill1 never becomne normafl again. $orno of thern have but thieir mnemories and do flot even know their own narnes. In t1ie pconvales;cent hospitals of Engls.nd it is estirnuated there are hundreds of shat- teri-d me(n of thlis typiel. Borne ot themn are domeid te spend the rest ot their days ini a sanaitoriumi.\"' \"Thiere i,; jut a chance, mother,\" said the girl, as Mr.Greaves turu- ed to lier expectantly. \"-We inust write-ý' «'Il go over to Bngland myseif, dear, 1 thiuk. Pin sure our boy mnust be one of thiese poor fellows it tells about. Perliaps l'Il bring hlm back te you.\" The girl rellected: \"These are Eng. liali soldiers. Hie eould flot be among thenu. lLow eould Gepoif (4reaves, now lest te us sinee the Canadians saved the day at Ypres, be one of these de- niented Engliali Tomimies ?\" \"Don't you think I shouild go?\"' asked the mother, who hadl been watching the girl's face. «Why, yes, indeed. Lt will do yoin good, even if-, and your aister wiiI be glad to sec yoit, tue.» Su it came about that ten days later, with a letter te the War Office froin the officer crnumanding the London Military District, Mrs. (Ireaves was on her way te St. John. The Mis-. sina.bie, with a psegrlist made up mostly of mern l aki, waa due te sai i two dayvs. The littie, plenaat- faeed womnaw froin London founid comnpanionsip among offlcers\u0026 wives who were going as far as Bn11gland wîth thieir htiisbands. They' thouiigit the *y could appreviate the littie wvo- man's sorrow, anid 9ymathn)izedl with great feeling, but shel askedi011 oul t they admit ahe had still morne ground for hope. Down a tortueus, cob-bled street in the town of liythe, past a row of shops unlike those to be found any- wvhere but iu England, two soldiers ini \"slacks.\" -were malzing their y, One aided himacîlf with a cruteh,1 whule the other, yeuinger and taller thtan his eoruniiiondeene onily slightly on a stout cane which lie car- ried. At the cathiedral corner the two turned, and strolled slowlyv down a byv-street to a cominion near ther out- arta. They seated theinselves on a beneli by a little streaini and laved thinsiielvea lu the warmn A1pril sun- slune, \"Y'ou know, this place seemni lilce honme te lue 110w.,eotty,\"' apoke the, younger nman. \"'Evert the cathiedral spire there, aud thc trees yonder with thecir burIy trunksansd funny little branches look familier.\" «Well, you won't be lookin' at 'em long, Brb,. now that the doctor la througli with yen. You'l be a-salug- gin' pig-iron iu a slbeil faet'ry seon, Ls-pose,\" replied lia coinrade. \"L'd go back again aud fight, if",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE they'd jet mie, Scotty, old chap, but my kniee will neyer be quite riglit, they tellinie. I don't know about tackling the pig-iron. I tbink I can dIo better thian that. The only thing that seems to have gone baek on me is My memiory. DJoc. Bowmian tells me 1 shall neyer beý able to remnember people or places I knew before St. Julien. 1 can remember the flghting as well as you can, Scotty, but bow 1 got into it, or who my comrades. were, I don't know any more than youl do. \"For a ehaip whose only injury is a stiff knee, 1 have a mnrveloiis pedi- gree,' hie eontinued. \"Take a siant at this.» And lie took froin the poc- ket or bis tuinie a folded paper, baud- ing it to bis pal, who spread Ît out Ccp\u003e' of medical record of No... Pte ..............., Penw Military Convalesncent Homre, Ilythe. -April 23, 1915; fotund patient on the Ypres\u003e.St. Julien rond, nnconscious, wound- ed in loft log, clothing ini shreds, tag miss- iug, unidentifiable; sent to No. 1,' Cas5. Clear. sttation, A. m. martin, Capt., Dur- ham Light Infantry. \"April 24; No. 1, C.C.S.; patient treut- ded for concussion. Trainsferred to Bou- logne, May' 2.. Scotty read on down the page, to: \"Jul\u003e' 15, 1915. Patient admitted to Hyvthe Military Convalescent Hlome. Treat- ed for amnnesia. Leg healed, Jan. 31, 1916. Memory unimproved. Dkselarged as physiceal\u003e' unfit for further service, April 20, 1916, Martha Talbot, mnatron; A. R. Bowman, M.»., Capt.\" \"Aýn' they start youl out in the -world with this, eh 1\" mused Scotty Wadd. \"That and ten pounda or so,\" said Ilerb, \"and a ticket to anywhere in the world ahuxost. 1 guess there are place-, on the face of the globe where they wouild be glad to give a job to a poor cove who bas done bis bit on the rigbt side of this affair.' \"Especially when the cove looks so much like the Ilonourahie 'Erbert Kitchener as wot you do. But wot'Il yon do for a naine, mate ?\" \"'The matron bas loaned me, biers, Scotty. From 110w on, l'in Herbert Talbot, at your service. And, by the. way, I've near decidêd to take your tip and strike for Melbourne. If Australia is as good as you say, it\u003es good enougli for me.\" \"You couldn't do better, 'Erb, my boy. It was 'ome to me for best part o' ten years. I'd like to be goin' with yoen- So it transpired that th(! passen- gers on the Laplandia, wichýl sailed a week later for Melbourne, includeê Hlerbert Talbot, discharged soldier, whose alin was to seek somne place in a new country wbere lie miight begin a smashed life ail over again. Three days out from Bristol, thie Laplandia, as everyonie knows, met ber fate. flerbert Talbot was standing on an upper dieck -watehîig the mountain- ous waves tbrougbi whicbi the big ship drilled her way wheni lie heard a cry of warning, and the next instant felt the sboek of thie b1cow as the deadly torpedo crasbed tbroughi the plates. A mighity pillar of water, alinost at bis side, followed the exp)los.ion, and tlie air was lllled witb fiying wreek- age. ilaîf daized, the boy struggled to bis feet froin the aide Of the cabin wbere lie bad been hurled, andi looked about, hardly comprebending what bad taken place. One rail of the steamer had been thrown oit along the bow, and part of It projected over the water. Across the rail lay the body of a saîlor. The bow was al- ready settling. Talbot, with the. rest of the passengers, liurried aft, wiiere there was less commotion. There was just time to f11l the boataç and get nuost of thiese safel\u003e' away whien tne~ end came. They were in the smaîl boats but a short time. Simultaneously with th blow of the torpedo the eaft had gone out for assistance, and little wisps of snmoke wcre soon everywhere on the horizon. A few hours later, witli a score or so of disconsolate survivor, Herbert Talbot was taken abroad the.",
         "TTEWAY HOME Donc, ouîid or Halifax. Talbot, thiouigh thanklfull to lie ailive, ut ilI, -oufi rIot bult regret that 1w hald to giv, iip is Melboiirnc trip. 11et' rathier adhis heurt set on Aiistralia. Abourd thle Doris, the p)asenge(rs fromn the L (ppUl i 1ï wecr i r o vally treatedl. The youlng soldier sbared a frteassuite with mil, of the weuilthiest of thep Dor\u0026's siling, list, Be'ned1iet Murquiard. To Maqurd is young comipunion oonfild(e soilne of lhopes alId dis- appontmcts.Marquard lauighed ut his ruiefi1nesu, unid set ut ret is feurs for the fuituire by promiising that Ii 'Montreal, where the MaqadMa- chinef Conimany was one, of thef lurg- est shli ilnunulfuetunling pIlts of til- Dominon, h wolild flud work toi bis lliig ili th1i1p1 to of shleIls. Thero wouldl he nio trouible, in getting thle ap jpoinrt iint. Iltrin bis xork ut thle -igMont- reýal pflant, Taiblot frequently thvouiight oif scotty' W;dd amIi hlis pred'iction abouit \"sugn\"sheils, butt as Mur- quard had if h fouind the work no)t 111(1tan acceptc'd hlis p)osition pli ilosop)hiellyý. Six ekspassud before the wan1- derluist sIied bi. Hie hiad the feel- ing thut hP cold dIo better soinewhiere cc, Witnnipeg£ suiggcs-ted i t solf. There woufld bef fcwer Frenehi the(re,, and Talbot had a liard tine wîth bis French. So he hnight a tickiet for Winnilpeg, over the Graitud Truink, via (Jhieago. Ile ýoufld flot hiave told yoii why h le rejected the northerni Ontario routes in favour of the, Chi- cago trip. Town and city camne and went without attracting any particular in- terest. It was lute in lune and the country wvas luxuiriant everywherc iu a coat of green. The mnaples were at their best. Herbert Talbot found himself gazing with pleaure at the continnus panorama of verdure through whidh lie was passing. It was neariy noon when the flrst section of the Chbicago Fiyer rolled inito the station at bondoil, and Tai- bot dropedof to limber himsef Ili 1)y a tril) nlte latfor.\u003e hovr tile heiads oif liurrying travellers heo euughIt sîghit or a! g\"irl, stnigan e leuth IlIle sta1iti vanopy. S$he was qulite victywaitirng fo)r a train whiehl budt flot yevt arrivoid, and sheo hiad wo eyesý for the thirong arouind lier. Taibot, froni then sheIter of a bag- gage truck, took a secondI glince uit ioserqureatrtdbyteil' shei dIid noti noi e his glanceo, andh self1 for foeling ectdaotntig The second seto o!, bilrai1n puill. edl in, anid Talbot begani to) walk to IrLis w car lui thei irt se tioni. Ailosýt ini his; path, the irl he w'as a rc of sle.Tio tpe thenti, am(i lie1 felt a lump11 r;Pis la bis thiroat as he( heaird a sobi froni one oif the wolxuen. For the oecondl tine he sokhm s-elf etlyaipceddtwd lie lia gone bt a few seswe bis sievei wrs lue, and( he turned to fiind the littie woman it hils side, qayingr lu a vieso tewý, it \\Va searcely more than aisprlGof Geoffrey Greaves!\" \"I e your pairdlon,\" sadTaîbot kiniy, «You hauve imade amitk\" «ch i'ca go train - fouirthi trekl 'lo.ird ! eaIIl l aStationl TIan. \"I lînlst get xnyv train, vou s,\" liý he a ddýied as the woman sîiI1 heid bis arii. \"TFeIl me,\"isisted the wvomaln. ,if you are not Geoffreyv Greaves, who are yol,? Oh, you nuat be myv boy!\"- \"«My naine is Taib)ot,» lie said. \"lier- bert ToalbotY \"Ahi-hi! Then if yen take the train, l'ni going witb you., That's the name",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE they told me yen adopted when yen left Hythe. You must stay with us here. Why, I'm yeur mother!\" Hia mother! Talbot's brain surg- ed. And Hythe--how did she know he had been at ilythe 1 Could it be that this littie woman, with the briglit face bail been looking for him? The girl had now cone up, and her eyes werc a wealth of pleading. He looked etraight into their depths. Yes, l'Il stay,\" lie said. Later, talking it over with the lit- tic woman, Geoif Greaves, eretwhile Herb Talbot, marvelled greatly at the cha'in of circumstances which had broliit him home again. «To think of them sending me to Hlythe, of ail places, niother! And you tell me I was born there. No wonder the cathedral spire and the willows and the river secmed se fa- miliar te me! It was luck ail the way tlirough. Look at the torpedo that took me to Canada instead of Aus.. tralia.\" \"It wae net luck, my son,\" she re- plied. \"I see the Divine Hand in everything. Wliat if yen had stayed in Montreal another day? Or what if you had gone te Winnipeg on soe ether ralroadt Yeu were juet coin- ing back, in spite of yeurself, back to Jeanie and me.\" «'I am not quite reconciled te the loss of my memory, mother, for there must have been some happy things te recaîl in those years that will be blaxik frem now on. Youre the best mother any chap could wish for.\" \"And Jeanie 7\" questioned lis me-. ther. \"lJeanie 7 Mether, dear, don't yen tell, but I've fallen in love aIl over again.\"",
         "fbISoý O' BY THEODOCIA PEARCE orlly 0' paused on the sec(ond lauding and gazed dolefully out of the window. There was -lune in the air, but a frown of dark November on NMollyN O's facýe. Molly 0' was made for Je.Usually shIe looked and feIt Julie. But somehow this daty she was out of tune withi the wuather. Shle didn't waut to go up to lier roomn. B3oarding-house roomas are not particularly de (sirable places for No- vemnber hiearts. She didu't want to go ont to the streets. Sucyit was Julie, buit Molly 0' scarcclyv kuew it. Se she just stood there on the land- ing-just stood there and stared ait the bouse on the other side of the lanle that divided the two places of abode. The nearest wiudow was open to the top. Mr. Julie I3reeze did hîs best to lift the white eurtains and peek iu. But, als! -and. Molly 0' eouldn't sc either. She was ready to turn away, when the nicest kind of a thiug happeuied. A nurse in a white cap snd apron- a nurse with eager brown eyes, camne te the window, parted the curtains and smiled over at Molly 0'. MNolly 0' earried that smile to lier third-storey room, and sat down on the bed rith it. It was like apretty snowstorin, that smile iras, sud it whitened ail the gray of MHolly (Y. Noveinber heart. She took off lier bat and crossed lier little demain to. the window. W6 Why, it wa.q.Junte! Thiere were flowers ini the littie square of park across the way, sud the pluxaipest frienidly robin in a tree qe near the window. A ray of -Junie unushine camne te MolIy O's face. ht wa*l a Smt2e. Shie shoek a warniug finger at tii. bird and laugbed aloud. \"Ilil show you, Mr. Siuarty Robin, that you aren't the only sougater on thisblc. So Molly O0, sitting do'wn nt the piano near the wind(owv, sang aud sang, just aq the birds and the streamas and the breezes sing in -June. That was Molyv O's supreme gift- her wonderful voi(c. Sewas stnd(y- ing so far away fromi hiome, and wheu Slie wasni't stu1dying-for even a song girl mnust have rest, «yvn know-41g, was dreamning of the wond(erftnl things site would somie day do. iladn't hier splendid dad told hler time sud time again that the pent-up munsical ability of Ille O'flagans for y ears biek lodged in lier geulus. 11adu't lier master- Sie'dhoff-p)raisedl lier at xnauy a les- .ou. Why qhouldn't slhe dreai as alie worked-dream sud dreain? Sucli an audience of birds as hiad eolleeted iu the tree ere sie had fin- ishied. Aud wheu lier soug had ended -hirds csu't very well elap bauds, you kuow, se tliey burst forth iu a chorus of gratitude. Molly O' danced lier deliglit up and d\u003ewu lier uarrew reoom. She iras Julie again-positive- ,y Julie.",
         "TUIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Suddenly Moliy O' realized site was hungry-hungry enougli to break. She danceid to the cupheard for jam and bunis anid pickles, spread a nap- kîn on thie floor, piaced lier food upon it, aud sat down to a pîenie ail lier ownl. Moily O' ioved indoor pienies on the fooer, \"Oniy one nionth now,\" she told a bun, and then gave it a deep bite. \"Only a month now, and P'U bo jour- neying back for a summer-a whole blcssed two months with mother and dad andl file.\" Net uintil dusk hadl failen did Moliy O' reaiize that the inurse'3samile hadn't goine home yet. It was still withli er, rocking on the motte, above the piano, Give to3 the world the best you have, And the best will corne bael\u003c to you readl Moily O'. \"Why, v she gave me the dearest smnile,, thiat nurse lady,\" she mnused, \"snd I hiaven't as rnueli as offered her a pieýkle.\" Molly O' laughed softly, jumped up froin the floor and stole out jute the corridor. It was quite dark and se very stiil. Shie feit bier way te the stairs, and dlown te the second land- ing. Thie white curtains still flutter- ed from thie window across the lune. Molly O' hiad just made up lier niind about the poor sick persen-the per- son wlio must bie just the sweetest lady with great bine eyes, and sucli billews of blaek hair-when the nurse person caine te the. window and look- ed out. The sky was scarcely dark eneuigl for stars. The nurse person seemed te be watching for one. MUolly 0~' watehed lier, eoncealed. She look- ed se tired and worried, 'Molly O' feit sorry. Ixnpnlsively she leaned out of the window, and, waving her band, calied softiy: \"GoodI-night, 'Miss White Cap- thank yeni se mueli fer the sinile.\" Moll y O' didn't wait to receive an- other. A burning shame spread over lier. She raeed up the stairs te lier rom and slaxnmed herself ln. \"Oh, you littie idiot.\" she hiissed, \"gwon't you ever grow me inito a sens- ibe lady.\" But the more Molly O' thiouigh- the more sorry she feit for the( tired nurse and the sick lady acrossu the way. \"It mnust hoe awful,\" sho thiought, \"to be siek like that in Juneý. I re- inember once-oh, years âgo, I had measies in April. It was dreadful, but I don't think anything eould be quite so bad as being shut np in June -like a rosebud. that eeouldn't bloom, or a littie bird with no wings. Why, I'd die.\" AndI forthwithNMolly 0' paeked all bier dlreinis away and began to think. She wanted to help sQ mueli, buit what couid she dot \"I've only got about three dolla1,rs, Ood,\" she prayed, \"oniy aboutt tkree dollars left for niy fun. Tlhe rest is ail board xnoney. I've road iM books that one ean't buy real hapnubut 1 can't see where I'm goingý te get any nnless I pay for it.\" The next day Moiiy O' went shop- ping--shopping at a book sl.She bouglit two books, a box of shaded blue nete-paper, a bag of chiocolat. animais and a littie bead purse. The first sheet of blue paper went into oee book. -Molly 0' didn't know it was so liard to write notes to sick ladies until she startcd. The blue sheet held a rosy message. She began like this, did 'Melly 0': The Beautiful Isle of Somnewhere. Dear Siek Neighbour, 1 thought about you mostiy ail iiiglit. Even when I was asleep I had a iuveiy dreain about you. I'rn so sorry you CanIt walk ini the June sunFhine-it mlakes me feel like lernon pie-ail -white meringueê and spilling over with goodness. VIl a. ing you a book ta read that will make r'u glad just ta read it, and heip you ta for get that Juie get s tuck crawiing through the window so thalt very niuch eanIt get in8ide. Piease laugh at the funiny part. of this story, or l'il lie dreadfully hurt. Yours, A Siuging Fairy. Just before lunc~h she went te the",
         "MOLLY O' second landing-whistled long and low, but no one aniswered fromu across the way. A tunibler of water stood onl thc window-ïill. àMolly O' grew reckles,. VI) in lher room was,, a whole row of coloured stones. Shie hiad brouglit thuimi from home. Peliber- ately hv lae up after them. 0o\u003e ' wîas not only a fine singer -sie vould sling, just great. Dad O'laan }a taughit hier in the long ago. The firsýt stonie feul earthwardls; the seon it the sill and bouinded off; the third-oh, horrors !-hilt the glass .and sent it (,rasinig inito the roomi. limmediately the vurtains parted. The nurse person was there. She look-. ed miost friglitfuliy cross. \"Oh1, l'Ii awfuilly sorry,\" Mou\u003e' O' called. \"I didn't think of doing that -honiest. I onily wanted te) inake a ,wee littie racket. Say, are you very in ad VI The nurse srniled iu spite of lier- sel F. Mý1ani\u003ei' people before her had fouind Molly O'Ifagan's pleading brow,ýn eyes irresistible. 4No-not very, but why did you do it?\"* Mou\u003e' O' drew forth lier package '\u003cI've got somnething here for you hrnd your sick patient. If I leave it in your front poreh you'll get it, won't you ?\" The nurse promised, thanked lier, sm iled and withdrew. MoU\u003e' O' tore downstairs and out tc\u003e the house acrous the way, lef t her parcel and hastened back to lunch. The next mnorning as Molly O' de-. seended to breakfast the nurse per- son was watching for hier at the wîn- dow. \"Good-morning,\"' she greeted, \"ni\u003e' patient is really too ill to write you, but we both thank you for your sweet letter and your gift.» \"Did yon. laughi?\" MoU\u003e' O' ques- tioned. IlLaugh! I should say so. Didn't jyou hear us? MoU\u003e' O' shook hier girlish hiead. \"No, 1 didni't. But l'Il leave you1 soithnlllg else. Look iii the, poreki about teni.\" This tinie Molly 0' tuc-ked a blueo envulope in a beaiU puie fllled with chloolalte IniIIaLs. This tinie it wiaa so nuch casier. Skie wroteo: MY Csi i the' Air. Dear VUnýeen Neilhbour. 1 heiirt that you laughe-d, so 1 wvon 't cali you sivk an\u003e' more. You mnust be but- ter or, you rolin't fiaugh realy.ut 't you like thosce animais? Thy re to b.o caLIten iin littIv ele-jrt ahd or ae foot, oir a tait. It 's lkieajs (If fule to) uvo theum go in places. You miiiq promiso Iiot toI vat thenim holv. Mother mould nove%(r ]et iliiie or mie dlo that. Koep1 the, purso, ani wbeau you 'ro tir oi unt aill the besd Ç-lours. It wtll miako jou fcet brlht Your. A \"Singing Fiiiry. 1S-a send you n klaal Ui 'm sur youi are pretty. Could Molly O ' have hecard the( laughter that greetedf tils Ilttr skie would have feit repalid inideed, thaft is, if skie bad Mlot Illnwb te poor sick nieigbbour reali\u003e' laghed. So a week sped hy. lE'very morn- ing Moil\u003e' O' wais *'Joh nny.o-tb-1le- SpIot» wvith a sick neighbour specivl and a littie hîne niote. Once it was, daffodilq-only six-but they wecre 80 brigbit and yellow. Another dlay it was the other furn\u003e book. and yet ant- other day-it was fancywork. 'Woiuld the sick lady care to sew a weeny bit for bier. For a whole week Molly O' lived and laughied, sang and tlioughit- ,June. On the eighth dagy caine No- veinber. \"I juat guiess l'Il have to tell her,\" Molly O' frowned. «Because-how Can I hielp it?\" She stole to the second landing and whistled. The nurse understood that sgnal nowv, and answered. It had been arranged between thein. \"You tell that patient of youra,» Molly O' called without dela\u003e', «that P'm trnly sorry, but V've oeil\u003e got",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE forty cents £uni meriey left, and until dad sends me more-I gUess I getta quît?\" The nurse person turried hastily from the wiridow. She was actuaily laughing. There wau soethig about Moily 0', serions, tha.t did niake one lauli. Mýolly 0' turned from the wiridow, too. She had seen tliat laugli. Uer resentmient was keeri. She went to lier lesson ini a blue mood, arid sang- oh, dreadfully. Siedliofl! told lier se; she knew it, anyway. Molly O' was truly angry. There was two dollars and sixty cents of good money as lied as ini the gutter. She rau up the two fliglits of stairs te lier room-rari riglit by the second landing window and barigcd lier door behirid lier. molly 0' iew from the first that some one bail been ini ber ront. The very pictures, the piano, and the rock- er told lier. And then there was the table. Skie iade a dlash for the let- ter: Dear Singing Fairy, 1 amn auhamed beyond mneaure that 1 laughed at you this mornlng. I trulY didn 't mean to. Did yoU eVer latigh When you felt reallly sorry instead t. Uolly O' paused te corisider. \"Yep-1 do that heaps of times n'y- self-so.--weil-what next 7\" We are so sorry my patient and 1 that yen have sacrifaced in any way. But could you really know how your cheery messages have been appreciated, you would feel Te. paid. 1 was so worried about my patient until you eame \u0026long, little Singing Fairy. This has been a sad case of mental de- pression, and very diffienit to handie. You have helped me just worlde. We are having a littie tea at five. Plesae promise to Corne ove?. Yours sincerely, The Nurse, Margaret Styles. Boom 14. MXolly O'Hagan gasped, then flop- ped on the bcd-a bundle of laugliter. \"Oh, I've beeri wanting something te happen fer weeks. And maybe- liere it is. Tliarks just awfully 1» Later MoilyO0' gowned ini soft pink mui, with eyes a-sparkle and eheeks a.glow, surveyed lierseif in the mir- ror. \"1Well, I miglit be lots prettier,'» she mused. \"But I wasrit madle that wayi s0 I cari't help it. Mether al- ways says, 'Ilandsorne is as handsom, does', se F'IL just 'handsome does' as liard as ever I cari.\" The nurse, watching f rom the aick- reon wiridow, saw lier leave the liouse, and so met lier in the poel. 'You don't know how gladl we are to have you,\" she said, takîng M\u003colly O's two banids and drawirig lier into\u003e the hall. '\u003cJust foilow me-wilI yen 1' At tlie deor of the sick room they stoppcd. The nurse was smniling. l'Yeu go llrst\" she said, pushing the door open. Arid Molly 0' drifted im-a cloud of! pink loveliness. With a littie- \"Good-day, my neighbour»-she trippcd across the room te the bed- theri stopped suddenly. The poor sick ricighbur-the love- ly blue-eyed lady witli the billows of black liaïr waa,-a man! Molly 0' dropped te the fleor anud hid bier face iri ler liards. The sick mari excharigcd an uneasy glance witk bis nurse. They lied don. wrong after ail-not te tell lier. Suddenly the still room vibrated witli sund. Nlolly 0' was laughing. The other two joined lier. The rom rang witli peaks of merriment. \"Well, tliat's one on me,\" Melly 01 flially managed to say, \"and a good one.\" Soon tliey liad lier in the big cit rocker near the bcd. The nurse ber self poured tea arid passed thinga.-- sucli thirigs as Molly 0' lad net de- voured for mariy moriths. \"I've been waritirig soniething to happeri so badly, 1 guess it lad to,\u003e she annourieed, nibblirig at a~ bit of remarkable confection. Let\u003es a e it lappen liard wbile 1 arn he-re.\"' Molly 0' stayed one whole heu.",
         "MOLLY 0' Eaeh one of the sixty minutes came and fluttered away like a beautiful winge.d butterfly. \"IYes, 1 arn singing heaps these days,\" Molly 0' had replied in an- swer to a question; \"I'm studying te do wondlerful things and,-* she con- tinued, \"that, is what hurts me Most. I haven't done a thing yet. In such a littie whîle 1 go home. Mother and dad andl Billie wîll be sa very glad te, se me, but 1 won't have one splendid thing te tell them.\" It was jus.t before she left that MolIy 0' noted the horrible thig. Tiie uan on the bed was laughing at a last remark ef bers--when she look-. ed down and saw on thie counterpane the. right hand of his. The twe mniddle fingers were missing, and ail the baek wa-9 red and] raw. Molly 0' knew it was froim a dreadful hurn. There was sometbing about the band 80 gruesome that the girl shuddered. The man noted her action. The look ef a huntedl thing camie inte his eyes. lIe tumned awayr with a groan. Moily 0' eeuld flot forget that baud -the. baud that lay se stili and use- less. Somewhere before she bad heard about it-onbhad seen it. Try as sbe miglit se could not tell where. It was te ber a tautalizing memery. Again and again shc went te the. lieuse acrosa the. way, but always the hand was hidden from sight umder the. covering. Molly 0' could neyer quite forget it was tirere. \"I wonder,\" the. man asked her oe day, \"I wender what yen would do if yen awoke soe day te find yen had been beaten \" \"I dunno yet,\" Melly 0' replied theughfuily, \"I dune, but I would do somethiug. 1 remember once wben 1 was smail we went oue day out iu- te the country te gather primroses. 1 was sixnply wild with joy-for 1 love the yeilow ef primrose se ver\u003e' much. 1Ithink ail my thoughtsand dreams were primroses. But, aase!- we couldn't find a one--oui\u003e' little horrid yellow danddliens. I st aud cried just qurreunded bY the bated w eud things. Then by and by just because thiere 'wae notbiug else te de 1 picked snd picked dandelions. They did look beautiful ase together in a great yellow heap. The next day we had a party and 1 bad dandielions everywhlie tbroeugh the house., instead4 of priniroses. 1 likepd them best of ail alter that-just weedl dandelieu,. I thiuk if I woe up, as yevu sa\u003e'- beaten-i'd want te take what I had left aud begin ever aigain.» \"But suppose there was notbing left y; \"'Oh, but there would be Mother basq told me se mny trnes that lite is the. only mast4\u003er ot lite. AS long as we have that-we have everything, I'd want te be like the suni that for-. get te shin. oue day, se shone doubi\u003e' bright the. next. 1 don't thiuk we cau b. heaten-just knoeked down te get up again.\" Ife sered te delight i bier simple phileeophy-a philosepby iuterwoven alwaye with fiowvers. Enecb time she carne be aaked ber questions that she streve te auswer. The. day se came te say good-bye bc had a deliglittul surprise for ber. FIe greeted her nt tii. doorway. MoUly 0' elapped ber hande with glaýdue-ss. 8h.e had net knowu ber sick neigh- beur was so tail and splendid-so much of a man. \"ITv. been walking eut ever\u003e' day,\" be said srniling, \"and new 1 arn ruch etronger. I do net care te spend au- ether day in bed-thank.9 te your faim\u003e' medicine. I'rn geing te the sta- tion.\" Meily 0' wendered a great deal about her sick neighbeur during these summer days at berne. He had net writteu-had net even asked if he might. «Seme dayI1ahall hoe. to se. yen again,» he had said at the station. Days of July and August wbeu Uic sun wss het and the. dreams of glery beat in Meily O\u003e, sbe Ieeked fer him",
         "TIIE C ANADIAN MAGAZINE to corne. Soxnething within hier nmade lier believe lie would. B3ut so many manly times shàe was disappointed. J-ot dlays cooled into September. Mol1y W' began to prepare for lier iourney to theo city-her journey to the world of studies and visioned de- sire. She dîd not cease to look for the eorning of the man with the liand tliat hurt. A something liad crept into lier heart that made lier want to touelh it-to kiss it gently. A new life wîtbin Moily O' was reaehing to a life with1out. And when lie came Molly 0' did not danc down tlie gardon patli to mneet liim-she went away out behÎind tlie shied and eried, clutching an east- ern paper to lier. Again and yet again she read the blazing liead.line: MARCO MARTELLO IS BACKI Famous Pianiît bas Returned a Greater Vîolînist. Tiien followed the story she liad heaird, before--the story that complet- ed the memaory of the awful, hand she Ioved-tlie story of a great man' bravery in a liotel fire and its disas- trous result-the story of a man wlio had been knocked down but not beaten. Slie read witli beating liea2rt and glowing cheeks tlie printed descrip- tion of the man who witli but tliree fingerson lis riglit liand, and a fair foundation of violin technique, hiad astoundled the musical world of the East with his remarkable execution. And Molly 0', behind thie wood- shied, realized more than ail the world what an effort it mnust have cost this man-wliat a sonl must have been lifted to tlie heiglits again. Mareo Martello! Marco Martello-the wizard of the piano, and lier poor siek neiglibour were one. Then 3,,olly O' cried into the sleeve of her bine gingham dress. \"IIe'1I-lie'il neyer remember now.» And when lie liad gone, rie one would have known tliat Molly O' lad been knocked down. Was slie beaten? Would she begin again to piek dan-. delions of desire, because of primroses -there was not a one. Molly O's eyes lauglied, lier feet danced, lier iips sang, but wvithiu lier tlirongh long weary ionrs lier leart cried-crîed with an agony slhe dared not show. \"lle'll-lll neyer remember now.» For two days--two eternal day- Molly 0' was down-knocked very low. But she was not beaten. 'U gatlier dandelions, God, and make theni suni ail over thre inew world in me,\" sire said to tire bine sky of a September rnorn. So Molly O', withliher trnnk and lier club bag and lier gatirered dande- lions, journeyed baek to thre attic in tlie city. Sire was not aware of the cordial weleome sire received-not aware of tire snriles sent lier way. In the. board- ing-irouse of yore, witli its second- storey landing, and its lionse acru tlie way, it wvas very liard-to forge.~ )Sire wanted the protectiug walla of lier old room to liold her close. lier old room! MÔlly 0' gasped on the threshold. Tirere was new furniture, new hag ings, riew everything, and on thre table, tire dresser, thre desk, great bowls of golden daudelions. And on thre deïk tlie card- To the Singing Fairy Prom the mani se belped to gatbmr dandeUions. And wiren lie came that nig)it~- came a man with a wonderful funture, and a liglit ini his eyes tire world ol not see-Molly Où was waiting for hi'».",
         "FIDKLITY From the Paintîng by Greu~ze in the WaIIaoe Collection, London",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "Zbc 1bousc of tbe Irtbe BY ALICE B3ROWNl NSEL JAMNES, at five o'clock of the summer afternoon, was ini the new bouse, measuring for a corner sheif. Hie was a robust feliow, something over thirty, with aquiline features and a skin brown and tightly drawn. His bine myes looked out steadily fromn their background of tan aud seemed the keener for it, like the eyes of ail men who live mach in the open. lHe had been thinking about the. possibility of the sheif ail day while hie inowed ýhe east mneadows and answered mechanically the pleasan- tries of the. other men. Ansel was mueh prized by his feilows, but tbey never hesitated ini peltinig him with ail dges of banter, because bis at- tention, they knew, was absent, and h.e never really cared. Actually, his mind was on the new bouse, so per- fect now, except for the furniture whiéh would prohably neyer be mov- cd ln, that it was bharil for him to flnd place for anoiber addition to its prac- ticai uses and is charm. People were gentie with hlm over lais worship of it. They even refrain- cd from asking, \"What you going to do with your bouse?1\" wben they beard bis engagement to liaity Siate wvas broken. Thcy were too sorry for Anseèl. liatty Siate was not, they thougbt, \u003c'mueh consequieuce\", but Ansèl must have set bis heart upon lier, or hie wouldn\u003e\"t have built ber a gem of a house with a soapsione sink and multitudinous elosets, \"ail coin- plete\". But no one could tell wbat Ansel feit, not eveni the uncle aud aurit livinc in bis old home \"up the, ~road. a piece\", snd whon hie had meant to leave wben lie wetit inito a house of bis own. Ail that was certain about bis side of the affair was that he tcnded aud dressed the bouse now as if bie wèe sdorning it for a bride, fluting it witb, magie contrivances, ail to make wo- man's work the essier. One night even, Abel Fellows, going pasi ai sometbing aîter eleven, saw a ligbit there aud thouglit soinebody bail bro- ken in, Soble tiptoed upto the kit- dieu window and peepeil, and there was Ansel, face flhshed and lisir in a tangle, rubbiug dowNv wsinacoting as if lie hiad beeu at it for hours and meanti neyer to stop. But ibis moment of the corner shelf ,was one of the ast ones oui of thc stillest sunimer day, full of green leaves sud birds. Ansel bad taken a lingering look ai the worid before eomiug in, for lie knlew lie sbouid work laie. A feeling of solitude waa upon him, and an intimate sense of communion wiih bis bousc. lie alwas had thai when lie was alone ber., wÈe- iber it was because thc bouse had beeni'thie work of his bauds or that it rebearsed an unfinisli.d dreain, not even lie couid ssy. But lie had no sooner taken up lis plane to ru ht along the strip of board under is liaud iban a step struck thc porehi floor. At that be frowned, though as the",
         "THIE \u003cJANADIAN MAGAZINE door opened aud soute one stood there te bîd bis eyes receive lier before she spoke, lie bad assurned bis old attitude of inifferent calm. But when bie looked up at bier, Ansel did start. This was Janet Gale, wbo lived \"down tbe road\" a muile away. She bad corne ,within the year to bie wîth Gran'ma Gale, and Ansel did not know lier very well. Buit lie bcd seen ber at êlburclh and walking along the coiýn- try road, taller and of finer bild thann any o! the neîghbourliood girls, and almnost to bie afraid of, too, witli lier calmn soft-colourcd face aud lier large, deep eyes. The eyes were wbat spoke and dont- inated. Tliey were a livng power, and even a startiug one because their darkness shone so fromt the cloud of lier soft, liglit liair. Once, et the celebration of the town's two huit- dredtbi anuiversary, Ansel haed stood witli lier for a dilffienît ten minutes in a tableau of the firat settler and bis wife. Tliey two had been eliosen because tbey made, se the uciglibour- bood said, sucb a likely pair, aud tbey bad accepted the caîl 'witli sirn- plicity, as tbey did ail evident duties. To-day Janet bad cone witli a pur- pose, and elie did not besitate in mnn- ning for it straight. \"I wanted te ask you somethiug, Mr. James. Grau'ma said it wasn't rny place, but 1 thouglit I'd rather be the one.\" Anaci was looking at ber in a kind of alarmai surprise alie could not un- derstand. He seerned te corne te sorne sense of bis ewu workiug disarray, and pushed bis fingers up tbrongb bis liair. \"Won't yeu sit down 7\" lie asked. There was eue chair, a rougli kit- dieu one, semetirnes te be sawed on, somectimes piled witb nails aud cleats. Sic shook bier bead bricfly and con- tinued: \"No. r've only cerne for a minute. Mr. James, it's about your bouse.\" Tiere alie fluslied, for site bad evi- deutly feit lier feet to be on ticitliali gronnd. Ansel frowued a Iittle aud stood immovable, facing bier. Who- ever paved the way to talk, it would flot be lie. This she realized, and hier- self frowned with the sudden diftieulty of it. But she was a young, womiau of direct address, and threw down ob- stacles by a dash and onset. '11r. James, maybe you didn't knowv 1 was engaged to Oscar Frencli.\" Here she did besitate, eonformably, as if sncb things were not usually offered witb so crude a haste. Ansel noddled and looked at ber the more intently, try- ing, apparently, to, make ber out. Having got over the initroductory step ste was more at ease, and took ber course with a clear directneus. \"I liaven't sccu him for ever a year. He's been workin' in1 Illinois. But he thinks he'll corne home.\" \"Oh!1\" Ansel accorded. \"11e wants to eome bere te ]ive, maybe set up a shop, or get a piee of land and keep bies. I dou't know bow it'll turn ont.\" She forgot hini for a moment, lie could see, lier fine brows knitted in consîderation of the doubtful question of becs and thejir swarrning, and the price of honey. \"Well 1\" she recalled lierseif and turn.. ed to hîm with a sndden smile. It warmed ber face wonderfuliy, and moved bis heart, too, in a way quit. aside from lier simple pups. WelI, if we settie down bere, the first thing'll be a liouse.\"l \"I sec,\" said Ansel gravely. «li sec.\" lie stood quite still, not looking at lier now, one baud resting on bus beucli, the other at his aide, a perfect picture of the artisan in repose. 8he began again and 110w she liurried. \"I thouglit of your bouse. 1 cold flot help tliinkin' of it. It's the pret- tiest bouse 1 ever saw iu rny life, and gran'nia said maybe you'd sell or let. But abe said it wasu't my place to ask you. She said 'twas a manu' place. But tbere's Oscar way eut in Illinois, and liere I amn on the spot.-I' It seerned a perfect reason, empe- cially when she iooked at him ini that soft, kind way.",
         "THE flOUSE 0F TUE BRIDE 'I -sce,\" sid Ansel again, very slowiy. \"Yon want t(ihire my oue. \"Ilire, it or bu;y it. 1 ,oldn'iit say about buintg. Oscar iiever's gone, so far as thiat. I don'ýt kn\"Shie hesiatc an barrais-sod mioment, but with a certain dignity went on, \"I doni't kno)w whepther lie ond. I don't knlow uxactly' howOsrs id\" AnIsel foi]nid Ilhimll\"f wan ting to Ieap off here ait a tangent and] ask hier whether shie was going to mnarry al mlain shle egtimlatvd at al randomi gue's. Butlie hcpulled bimlll;,f baek to thle bouse. \"Let or el,h said, \"T s'p)ose it's al] on(, to mie. It ain't likely 1 shal exe(r go inito flie biouse.\" Buit bis face Conitracted, ais hie said it, and she bas. tened on. \"Gran'mna said you told ber so. 'Twas whcn she offercd youi some, balim and wormwood. If you hadni't, said als mucbe as, that, 1 never'd asked youY\" Ansel smniled a littie. «Wormnwood's al] right,\u003e he correct- cd, with bis gentie humour, \"for a bouse a man builds sud neyer ]ives in. Wel1» lie sbook bis lead, as if lie tbrew off deatdening dreams, «Want to go over it ?\" lie asked ahruptly. «Want to se the bouse ?\" She briglitened at that, and came at once out of bier perplexity of won-. dering whctber site ought to be in the business at ail. So tbey began their slow and admiriug progreas, for An-. sel was as frankly eager over it as site. He abowed bier ail bis, littie devices for beauty and for saving work, and pointed ont the window lie bad eut after there seemed to bc windows enougli, to bring the tip of the big inaple into the bcdroom. Wben tbey went uipstairs and lie opened thte drawers of the linen closet, fragrant witb ncew wood, site began to feel thte excitement of thte bride, an emotion made up of deliglit in the things themselves and a sense of tbe strange- ness of it ail. She liad not dwclt mucli on the overtlirow of bis bopes. Gran'ma, so oldl that lier opinions got easily blurred and their expression rather negative, had4 saidj ollliv that Anlsel blad ilmant o get married, anld she guessed it never c-aile to anlytbixtg, alnd -Janet, inistinctively solitary Mn bier habit of 11 h ad asked no onr, eiRe. Ein)ally, they wclnt \"Ili attic\", and Ansvl took beir to thie big dlormer bei had tbrown ontl at the bhack, ilist, bie toid bier, to faue MoutEetin g. And there, by vnaturai consent, they sa;,t down on1 thle wrdwseat sud foi-. lowcd tlie purple outfline in flic fat,.. theat sky. J1anot rali er gaze. Shle wils looking straigbit at hlm now, and bier eyes drew blis, Hc thiolgbit lie biad neyer s(een siicb 8oft, dIark elyes except iii %etw' kinid animal, and Ibe alinost forgot hitnet brefin regard. ing tbem, als if they wcre a separate source of power and life. -Janet, oalim as she was by % nature, iookcd ve-ry vivid. She wasq, Anisol sa in love. w.ith flite blouse, Ile too, was. in love witb it, aud be fel it hiri, ahev of thieir accord. «Wei,t said, als if she coi flot hold sileinoe ainy longer. bier desire was so big, \"goini' to Ifl(- tueave it V, Ansci did not answcr. ut bardly sccmned important, coinpared witli tlie riddlc of ber eyca. That recalled hlmn. Hoe secmcd to catch himacif back out of sonie deep musing. \"I'd ratiter you'd bave it,\" ie said, \"titan anybody cisc?* \"Then may I ? \"-Anybodyv I know of,\" lie vlenclled it, and theri wîtli a bllonig baste, \"anybody in file wrd That surpriscdl lier, and bier cyes gravely questioncd. '\u003cBut I don)t't kiowv,» said Ansel, ais., reealled perbaps by hlis own iun- temperate spechb. Il've got to tbink abouit it.'\u003e Sbe rose at tliat, ber mission bcing over, and the dusk outside shuttlng out Mount Everlasting more aud more and so advising bier that te reason for bcing there was donc. «Weil,\" site said, «you tliInk about it?)",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"Be careful of the stairs,\" Ansel bade ber, and sbe returned with a joyous note iu ber voice:- \"'Anybody euldni't fait on these stairs. I don't believe grau'ma eould. Tliey're se easy, and then the rail's just in the riglit place.\" When lie etood in the doorway watcliing lier down the steps, lie cail- ed eut suddenly and she stopped. \"Wait a minute,\" said Ansel. \"Wheni's it gemn' to beVf She stood there, aimost a beroic figure in the dusk. \"Wlie n's wbat gemn' to be V\" slie par- rÎed in tbf tbrilling voice responsive t( chat vearing chiange. The weddin'l. Wl'en's lie commn' 'Lui ibout a montb,\" said Janet. TFý,ts when lie's commn' on.\"~ Tbien tbe dusk enveloped ber. An- sel went in, net te work, but to think it over. The littie sheif lie laid aside. It was net flnisbed that niglit or the n2ext. Indeed, it was not put up for montlis, until a -winter day wlien lie was stiil thinking of tbese things, but af ter another fashien. The nextnîglit lie brusbed bis bair rigorously and went uip te see ber. Janet was sit- ting on the steps of the littie low- browed liouse, and gran'ma, lier chair drawu close to tlie entry silt, dozed and \u003clropped a few words at inter- vals, like leaves f rom an antumui tree. Put Janùi, i lier white dress, looked Like tl'e spring itself, a tree ail over bridai whvfite, and se Ansel theuiglt, in other terns, as lie came iip the path and saw lier risc te meet hlmu. \"Oood eveuing,\" shie said, iu lier sweet, full voice. '\u003cGran'ma, liere's .Mr. Jamnes.\" \"That yeni, Ansel t\" gran'ma asked, frin the deptbis of lier revery. \"Well, you better corne, in, betli o' you. It's gettin' damp. I giess ll polce off te lied.\" \"Yen le-ave your chair,\" Janet bade lier. \"L'il1 feteli it i wheu I corne. Wc'Il sit here a minuite, it's se nice.\" But Axxsel did not \u003esit at once. In- stead, lie stood before lier, bis tait bulk seeming to top the syringa down by the gate and shut it out. But its breatli came sweetly to them. \"When d'you say he's commi'!\"ý lie asked abruptly. \"In about a montli.\" Her lieart beat bard. Janet was a calm crea- ture, but sometimes she wanted things very mucli. \"I s'pose we needn't mention it to anybody, need we ?\" Ansel was von-. tinuing. \"We needn't mention it tiil then. I hate talk.\" \"Why. no0,\" said Janet, wonidering a littie, but thinking it reasenable of him. \"I don't sec'-s we need to men-~ tien it.\"1 \"'Not te gran'ma ?\" \"Not if yon don't want 1 should.\"' \"Well, 1 don't,\" said Ansel, Hie drew a breath of greater case. \"I get so tired of their clack. If yen eould enly do anything, and done with it I But you can't. It's, Why do ye sol' nortb, east, south and west. It's lik. a flock o' blackbirds.\" Janet gave a littie laugli. Lt liad more than the music of lier speech. \"But I ain't got anything to tell,\", Ile answered soberly, with a grave indulgence, as to a beseeehing cliild. \"lWell, I guess you'il get it,\" \"lGet tbe bouse? Sliall I get the, bouse \" \"I guess s0.\" She drew a long, happy breatb, and lie saw again how mucli she cared. We ean. keep our own eunsel,\" lie said, '\u003ctilt lie cornes and the papers are passed. Or if h. rents ît-ts ail oee to me.\" Janet could siiuply say nothing a.t ail. Tbey sat there ini the soft surn- mer niglit, she very hiappy ideed and lie, too, hiappy, in a way, blecause the lieuse was, after ail, fulfilling its pur- pose and coming te beautif ul use. Hle was tbe first to speak. \"Weil,\"ý lie said softly, «'you'-ve got your bouse,\u003e Janiet put out lier liand te 1dm in the darkness, and lie gave it a strong, quîek clasp. \u003c'Tlat's riglit,»1 lie said. \"Sliake banids on it. It's a bargain.\" Ansel was a man of few",
         "THE IIOISE 0F TUE BRIDE wordls, exeptwhn he asdepl i lo v(,d., yet he Ilild al littieo miore lu saY, of al solemnl? imlport as, befiitted thle saereVýdlwess of, the houIr, I hope it'l li 1w se to ou\"he unded, Ii what uised to lie blis fabri praer mleeting mannriler. - 1 11ope yoil by l\" it i a gfreilt mnain year8\".\" Ji tope abrupw 1ýI)ýltlyv, becansl'e lie hlfd a sluddeni vision tieilni of the .1anlet s'he woilId lie Sornimeiil wýItli. er ch1- drcn abouit lier. always vqeallm, antid mir- aeuilouslyJ younlg. Buit this w i1s ton sw i ft a pae (e. 1fitiii 1 ind hlm 1 iglit- Ileaded, aild ble 1r11etrnd, impn[ at1ient of it, to what wa. Now%,\" ;;idflie \"as yVou thînik it over, is thiere anychge \"0h, tno,\" salid lanet fe(rvenitlyv. \"Itfs Iove] «y, ,Just as it la. It's a per. \"I1 can't flnd mueli fainit with it nyef\"said Anse], In the toule of dIiparaigiing pride aeeorded to our hest beloved. fTeestli us now. 1 set out fouir, thirce purpie and one witle, right side thec baulk door. 1 don't know's I calIed attention to She hadn'tl thouglit of them, she owned(. Shbad been toc oceupied w-itb walls and windows. \"Were you anyýways intereated in a mite of a1 gardeni ?\"7 This lie puit almoait tiimiily v fear- iuit semned, lest lier answer shbo1ld not fit bis wi-shI. \"Yea,» said Janet. \"thiere's got to be a garden. You know, it acenis if it happened for ill the world as, if 'twas meant, grau'iina's tot so ont withlibers. ih sv- she (,an't 'tenld ta it, and it .sort of frets, ber to have other folks flddlin' roundc in it. and realize she can't. Se shl' goin' te give me ber perennials if I got a house anyvwheres round lierta\" \"4Well, said Ansel, In his quiet voece, \"conie fail, yoiu eau move it loek, stock and barrel. l'11 kind o' get the lieds ready,. 'meat any time now,. and] melibe put a fence round. You'd like that, 1 guiesa, and a littie gate for you te go steppi' throuigb. nigliti11( aferwrkad e sute if I've pieked out the right po. \"'oit Youl doit't wýanlt .foIks te know. Whaf:iiil hley t hinlk if theby go bY and See 111e? -0h, fo4Iks wou't s\"e yeu!, They'rev to holie that ilmei o, iliglit, dm h eliores. l'11 lie ýl)iiu' up).1,1 s'poae, anybod duev(I(\" go by Tleyi vhn yen stp foe pa. Tfie iucit dlay if cam aoutj as Ili liad sald. Jlaneit, prrlips too prenld teIo -()by dusk wheiu eyaould lie evaded,. appearedi-4 ini the Jutei after- 11oon, als seo001 as' thevri wvas hope of findiuig hlmi. nsl lad staked ont a gnolypît at the haet(k (if the bouse. Ilere were to lielber flowcrs, atid le- hind thein lie had decoreed flic kiteni garden. Just as alie camev round tlic corner, lier face aliglit, ber' liair ailiVe in the suni, Ansel land sitoppedI te verifyv bis corners, aud Ilie looked up) and aaw lier. Ile eauglit i li reath, alie was so alive and loel,so cahai, tee, a part of thec divineness of the dying day; but Ilie askd br qity \"Hlow's this snIo e ou 1 \"1fRs nic,\"' aIe told hil, \"Ita tlic riglit place exaetly. Buit you think it's big encuolgli?\"' Anaci laughed a littie at lier grdi-t(1 nes\u0026. \",you gem'i te talke care of it youir- self?\" Ilie aakedl lier, C«01,. y es. l'In juat like gran'ma.Ita don't want foikz fldidliu' roundi( amiol,; my plants. Bleaides, I d1011t ko- Hlere aie Stopped, and lier face gzrew alinost wimi atl aliaat. \"Wliat don't you kuiow?,\" \"I doui't know whlelier litcares any- thing abouit gardenini'. H1e'a alays worked in a store.\" Ansel turned abruiptly and paced thec lower bouandary once and baek again. 4\"Well.\" he said, as if lie lad been thinking eut something and quietiug hunself te a Conclusion, \"I guesa, whe- ther lie cares about it oIr noelii he ready te do the heft cf it: for yen,.\" \"Is there a gate hiere l\"' He *Saw she",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE was standing already în hier garden. She even seemed te see the invisible gate. Ile also stood in the inclosure net yet made, aud for a moment tasted the deliglit of feeling, not that lie was sacrificing something to a happixxess ho euld neyer share, but that the garden was stili his because she let hinm plan it for lier. \"Yes,\"' ho said, \"a littie gate, green, miade narrow so's to swing easy over the grass. Jlere'll ho a nice bed down by this pear trec. I vowed I'd get the pear tree in. Some things want a mnite o' shade. Tliey're as home- sick as a est, set lem out in the glare. Thon ever by this corner's the old wvell. l'Il pnt a pump ini here; tlie water'll bo terrible handy?\" Janet stood there dreamily, stîli ioeking, it scee'med, at the garden not yot hemn, at other hiappy things lias- tening towprd lier, snd tlie lover who wss the god te summon tliem. Ansel followed lier thouglit, sud stood very still. \"Well,\" she said abruptly,,comiug ont of lier dresm. \"«1'il ho goinl.\" But hsalfwsy te the resd she turned snd hasteued back. lier face was fiushed in a delieste way it liad, a ereepmng of celour under the roseato skiu. She held lier liand ever her eyes to ishield themn fronm the bumning sunset, and looked at humi with a soft, wsrxn kind- liness. \"I ain't tlianked yen enougli,\" .she said. \"I cau't ever thank yen.\" Thon she turned decisively sud went. AnseI stood, sfter she had left ~the garden lonely, and hiniself Ioeked off into the sunset, fading new, yet entranciug i isles aud lakes of col- our, moulntains, aud a green-blue ber- dering shore. He had a faneiful habit of thouglit, and it senod te him now that lis grandfatlier who, being old, lhad uttered many uncemprehondod things te him, thon a boy, lsd kuown wliat ho wss saying wheu lie teld hum, eoueerning the sceeme ef ail thinge, \"It's a mystery. It's a dingod inys- tory!' Hiero Ausel had built lis lieuse and beon doniod the living in it, and ~now lie wss seeing the happiness that enwrapped it like great guardian wings, througli ether eyes. And set- ually througli lier eye--f or lie feit hoe knew, by somne secret divination, the course of lier days liere, lier progres froni oue room- te another, and lier long stili hours of work in the gardon by the earliest light. She would knew enougli for that. She liad leamned un- erringly, lie eould sec, the ways of do:- ing things. And perliaps lie should see lier wlien lie went by on soine early quest, and stop lu a minute, sud she would look up from under the pear tree, again witli that rosy grati- tude. For a montli it went on, the Iast ex- quisite erdering of the lieuse sud the inclosure of the gardon. The boas were made, the fonce was painted green, sud the littie gate swuug easily yet witli seeurity. Neiglibours drop- ped in te admire the cempleteness of it ail, and te, venture irrepressible questions. \"Wliat yen goin' te do witli your lieuse, Ansel ?» tley askod him. boldly. \"Yen gain? te live in it t» But tliey were nover told, snd Janet, wlien eue astute eld body iuquired wliy alie was pokin' round thero se mueli, replied, witl lier liead held higli, that it was the niceet lieuse she ever saw or snybody else, either, aud alie was bewitclied witli it. She eeuld lisrdly koep lier foot away from it. And when the montli was over, Oscar F'reneli came. Ansel lad walked up te grau'ma's the niglit beo e aud given Janet the key. \"Yen botter have this,» ho said. \"You'il waut te show hi round,\" She nooded silentlY, sud Ausei know ho liad doue the irreoueable deed. Ho had lockod himacif ot- side. This was Thursday, and F!ri- day afterneen lie saw hier go pst in Beasley's wagon, driving te the sta- tion, le knew, sud lie felt 'vaguely hurt that she lad not asked lim. for bis ewn team. But whou aIe camse back hoe was dowu in the lower ps- turo, aud Saturday moruing early he wout there again with bis dinnor-pail and axe, and speut theoday. It w",
         "THE HOLTSE 0F TUE BRIDE a long day, wherein lie feit removcdl fromn the world and ail the conditions of it. lie had done the very largest thing thiat had ever been bis hie and by doing it lie had eut hiiacif off from the sialler pleasuires and inhieritances. Ife went home that inîglit a saddler mnan, differeut, older, it seemed to hlmii, and beekause thle day hiad tired juin, le lippe ied bcdarly and (1iuled has mmld of thiollgît, Suniday IN oril- ilig he was late at the table anid portlyV Aunit Linidydln there ais slic liked an excuise for doing, poured his eoffee and settled to a Cosy gossip). Shie lo%.edf to end(owv hlmi with fier e- cumuiilated nothings bveause Ile re- ceivedl thiemi patienitlyv, not like Uneole Rufus, hier huisband, who had seiatica, and was proue to exelaiim, \"Thiere I thiere!1\" «'yvou know Oscar Freucli w\"s hiere ?\" slic asked. Ansel nodded, but shc hardly need- ed thiat sliglit luibricant. \"Corne Fridayv. Janeït went over aftcr hum. llandseme feiler, straiglit as a rainirod. 1 sec 'emi- ride b iv. 7 Ansel drank his coffee. aud found, by an inw'oluntary h atefineais,. of the mind, a godlike youtli, straighit as a ramirod, sitting iu the grandfathier chair beside his hearth. At thiat in- stant, it seemed almnost tee bard a thinig JTanet bas asked of~ hlmi. Whien hie eeiXld lu kinduepýs escape Aunt Lindy's monologue, full of apeculation uew over what Janet, if she slieuld marry this fall, was likely te dIo about grau\u003e;ma, lie waudcred out inte the woods at thec back of the house and sat thiere whittlinig, mnaking littie deeryards of twigs and brushing them away again when lie found whithier is mind ivas tending. It came te hum that lie eould net, for the first time since his building of it, go into bis own liouse; another man had the key and it was impossible te meet hlm there. But about sunset that xight it seemed te him unueces- gary te bear it auy more. It was prob- able that they weuld have visitcd the boulse by dlay'lighit. This was bis hour, as it alwv.aysý had N'cil, tlic emiiig dulsk when' t1sks were dfonce and hie eotuld taike refuge in flhc stron)ghold of serenity lie hadi made, as soiue patient creature miiglit, grain by grain, build its owu fitting sheil. So lic weult avross lots, tIe back way, and apreced te bouse Stealthily aliinost, tîirougi tlic littie garden. leic mounted itetp te tlic biak porcb. It was very still. Ife toek mut bis kuiife, aun lpd it lu at a crack of the( deoor te turu al but- ton lie kiew, and walked in. Ansel drew a breath of satisfavtion, It wias il se somewthing sentient ndmitg, tlint seemned even te return hie love, as gardens oraî ut rapture to- wiard thle hautd thlat fends theln. lie slink dnown ou bis benlh melved iloto a k re te leave a garnished erder for tlic comiug bridegroomn; but that instant lie startcd up again, Thiere was the turuinig of a kcy. and somne eue whirlcd tin.tusy u Hle knerw whe it was, aud thlat neo eue was belhind lier. Janet hadl eliaxiged luto a creatie of wild yet stili emo- tienr. She speke at once. \"I lisd te corne. I had( te have semne place, se gran'mna shoildn'llt know.» Somle place te ery h .le saw, te quiet lier racing pulses and still the blood aflamne up te bier finir. Shc began te pace baek aud forth frein t1whe harth te the deeorway, like anii animal in boundes. \"What le it ?\" asked Ansel, whien she seemed te have walked( hierself lute a calmn. 'Tou tel me what it is.?' \"le's gene,\" sald Janet. \"Gene?\"' lie cheed, his own eme- tien rising, anger for lier, resentaient against the feel who had deserted lier. \"You give me hall a day. l'Il feteli hlm back te yen?\u003e \"Fetch hlm back !11 She stopped and looked at hlm muperbly. \" H e'. gene. 1 sent him.»l 'Tou sent hlm? Wbat for, Janet, what fort\" She cried a. little then, lu shame, it",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE almnost seerned, as if she blamcd lier- self'. \"For vothing. le hadn't donc anyi.thling,. lie was just hiniscîf. But Ansl, u is daze, feit that le could oily' repeat lier wvords after bier, in a foelisli inteýrrogative ecbo. But sbc ,vas ready enougli to tell. \"'vue got to speak to sornebody or I shaHil die. Ui' so asbaincd. How could 1 ever think I liked lin t Why, lic talks about gettin' cold-lie talks about it ail the tirne-and wkiat lodges lie belongs te. I don't like him, that's ail there, is about it. I just don't like hlm.\" Fair, large creature as she was, shie looked like a wilful chîld. -11(e kates gardenin', tee,\" she tbrew at hlmi. \"lie tbinks yeu get your ankles dusity.\" \"Well,\" saidl Ansel. Ris voice sounided hoarse and strained te hîrn, and lie stopped te elear it. \"Wliat about thie lieusie? Wliat'd lie say te that t\" \"The lieuset\" She looked at hîm iu the amiiazernent that kept lier head se higli. \"Yen s'pose I brought hint lu here? You s'pose I'd take lin iu- to this bouse? Why, it's your lieuse, net kils.\" Ansel -was beside himself before the power of lier proud beauty and the thrilling force of lier emetion. \"lIt ain't my bouse,-\" lie cried. \"It's yours. You've got te live lu it.\" Janet calmed at that; she sniiled, and skiook lier head. \"You're sorry for me,\" she told hlmr. \"No, you mustni't be se sorry as ll that. Sometiue you'Il live iu the liouse yourqelf. That's the best way. lt's your boeuse. I-Iere's tIe key. l'in going now. Geod-night,\" skie said. But Ansel reached the door first and stood with kils baek agaiust it. \"Leok liere,\" said lie rouglily, she thouglit, unlike his gentie self, \"do you want to kuew wliy I aiui't humin in this bouse te-day?» \"Neyer xnind,\" she gaid gently. \"l've get te go now.\" \"I do mimd,\" said Ausel. \"You've got to iiind, too. You've got to lister]. The girl 1 was cngaged to broke off with me for one reason. Wantf to know what it was? 'Twas you. You were the reason.\" \"Me, Ansel ?' She bail used bis name uinthinking- ly, and neither of thein riotired. \"Yes, you. That time 1 stood hold- iu' your hand in tlie towNv hall 1 tremn- bled ail over, you were so-so differ- ent. AndlI ouldn'tlhelp taikini' about, you. 1 couldn't keep your niaine off my lips. And I dreamedl about you, and when 1 thonght you were gemn' anywheres, I wouldn't go, for 1 would not see you. 1 didn't dare to. And the girl I was engaged to said te me right out, 'You're in love witki Janet Gale'.\"e She hiad grown quite white, and lier breath came heavily. But lier eyeýs did not leave his face, nor didi lus cease te liold thern. \"And when skie said that te mie,'\u003e lie went on in what ,eernied kils rage at the overwhelrningness of the tide of life, \"I said, 'I arn, God hielp me, I arn? And she said, 'Slie's engaged te another man. What you gemn' te de t And 1 says, 'Nothin'. Tkiere's nothin' for mue te do'.\" Again their eyes seem-ed to inter- rogate eaeki other sternly. \"But tkiere's somnetkiin' to de iiow,\" Anse] coutinued. le threw back liii head and Iaughied. Janet thouglit she liad neyer imagined how lie would look if lie were hiappy. \"I eau give you the lieuse-youir liouse. Yen and grau'xna eau live lu it, and 1 eau tend the garden, and by' and by, -wkien you cau tkiink of a man, wlio kiiews-»1 Hie paused, dlurb witki the eoming wouder of it, but Janet kuew no sasy- iug. Shie was oue of the women who, liaving somethiug to give, must pour it eut at once. «Why, don't yen seeq Anse], don-t yen seet 1 conldu't have him live in yonr bions(,. 'Twas beeause twasyour bouse. 'Tws because we'd got s\u003e well acquainted, Anisel. Dou't you sec t\"",
         "ENTGLAMD INI ARoeS VI.-GE'TNÇ THE VIEN RITAIN, tlle fr(eel Bri- tain, thle demiiocratie0 miona;r(chy! Biritain, tile mistressa of tilesa! lraan tile uineonquer- aible! They were sweet-soundi(ing tributies whose titie andl warranty were never honl est stine in tim1e of pe1 (a(e. Andf the Biritish, nation hiad so ineor- porated theum into its cred that niotht- ing within the r ange fil them t imlaginlative pe'ssimlist hail for gen. erationis cast dloublt On their eternal appropriaitPess. Through enie war Britain lbai struggled with but thle sýuperflity of her energy. Through centuries of peace thle world had bow.. cd te Býritain's -well-deserved repuita- tien. Anid then came war-war of the kind that recognizes no reputationq, filait develops along the ordinal-«v elhannels of guins and strategy andl men. Andl Britain was forceed te ne- vise hen crecil. In that ver y revision came the real strug-gle. Britain, the free, bail te reconstruet the meauirng of the word. Britain, the deinocratie mion- archy, had te acknowledge that de- mrnocy involveil co-operative reality as a prime necessity for the mainten- ance of Britain as mi8tress of the scia. Enitain eeaaed te be free. That was the bitter pull. Andl yet Britain passeil fromn free- 481 dam)T to bondage ol n h itrpe tat ion of' ths 110h1 countf nlot IlgI to al1 nai 1on ili it treiiy É,ondage' laid aside11 its unrgratefu(l nakand bie- for the doiniion of fncedol. nit cd we stn'I eyr Soviiy d e m o n s t r a t e Inlt e w e t n y id o o f heAtintie. Vreo ass1nmcd its truc e nl: th1n1w ilhe ih to prsonal lienty V80 long s t oe nlot infningee onith we11bcu Of the, gtatP. Russia bstIclle uther kini of freedoi for a fcw dssru mloniths ai giviel the ic forever tn lorlibttled, and breil on the., froj- dmof the e'itizon, Britali entlocd the war as, a \u003crusader. Ta is buit Wz the vaniiguard oFf the millions tha't wcr cl 'nOUrifl ngt prs their loy«ilty ' by force, of arum agaliet thle ncy.The Il lions troopil( to thle reenitngoffces triîngtheir hacks on theocuintir r husinesseq, their comnfor.ii aiir tariemiiwa t rhe ianlies.i Volun-.. everY Aet.,nd for six or eiglbt Menths it eeiteb uedng Fastenr than they, coui be traîneingam a mrind patriota raillied te fihe prin- c iples on trial. Greait Britain wae a]- mnost satisfied-.the puli part ef it. But there were mnilitary, andl even pelitical, experts wheo werc net go ereduleus, Lord Kitchener bia(] an",
         "THIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE inkling of what faced the nation. The Cabinet, shamed by its own unprc- paredness, trembled. It handed over te thc lion of thc nation the task of affording voluntarisin its greatest op- portunity. What Lord Kitchener could flot accomplisl in the cail to arms was beyond the power of any mani i Gmeat Britain. And Lord Kitchener's millions arc a tribute te hîm and to bis country. But stili the swecping spectacle of Gcrmany's niight in those early months Ioomcd higl above Great Brn- tain's show of resistance. Kitchener appealcd as only le could. Posters stared wlere bills neyer dared appear before. Rluge red amrows on every London street pointed the way to, thc recmuiting stations. The King bec- koned. Women umged and cajoled. The newspapcrs filled their front pages with petitions to the people. Appeals turned te warnîngs, then to tlreats. And the people thought tley wcme hurrying. Tlcy saw the long lines bef ore the recruiting booths, the long trains leaving for the front, the vacancies at home. But the authori- tics knew that longer lines must forin, longer trains start, more hiomes be manless. For Germnany was still near Paris, was still threatening Calais; and Mesopotainia, Egypt, Gallipoli, Grecce wcme clamoum-Ling for freali ag- gressive battle-fronts. The. Derby scleme was introduced. It was in tuis Great Britain Te- ceived its first taste of compulsion. Tiie pill was sugar-coated at first. It was not a remedy, but a test. Every yoiuig man of military age was asked to report to the nearest recruiting station, not for service at the front, but for the compilation of a national register of fighting power. The sugar coating was very thin. Tiie labour unions saw througl it the first day. The entire country uuderstood with- out aecusing the Cabinet of falsehood in its dedlaration of intentions. But Great Britain was patriotie. It ws aise impressed witl the promise that certain favours would bc accorded those who attested should necesuity for conscription arÎse. In millions the young inen signed their naines and ages and answered intimate ques- tions. Lord Derby becaine recruiting agent extraordinary. It was because the scheme was put forward as his and superintended per- sonally by hum that what obloquy at- taches to, subsequent events clings un- justly to his name. Lord Derby car- ried through the idea. Mr. Asquith perverted its expressed aîi. The men who walked the streets wvith the khaki arm-badge as an evidence of their wilingness to fight uponi nieessity werc called upon before many months to make good. Conscription kulled its reputation only by its naine. Conscription meant force, and personal liberty was the Englishinan's religion. But Great Britain was strong behind the prin- ciple. Organizations sprang up in opposition, of course. There were the so-called pacifiats whose liankern for publicity drowns every atom of their common-sense and reason. There were foreigu outlaws seeking asylumn in England, where they liad fled to escape xilitary mile and other pur- suing evils. There were Socialists whose only tangible creed is resistance to, authority. And there were cow. ards. The noise they ail made ln chorus was deafening. Those who ac- cepted compulsion did se ini silence; it was one of their virtues. Tii... who opposed it howled. And Asquith, impressed a little with lis own breaehi of faith, and fully seized of the. fate of lis party in the event of an elea- tion, made every concession that eoiilt b. made with any appearance of fair- ness and lonesty. A Coalition Gov- ermient was thc flrst necessity. it was at that time indisputable that the. party which attempted to enforce conscription miglit b. on the road t. hari-kari. And both parties in the. new Cabinet lent themscîves with re- msrkable unanimity to eoncesos There were elections coming some day.",
         "]ENOLAND IN ARMS Ministers of the Gospel were ex- f mpt Pd f romn service, some attempt at control being exercised by the stipu- lation that the sect muvst be rcog- ized,] There ore enough religîins in Englanld te reforin thle uhi1verse in tins geniertzion-or wreok it. And with exa,,ggeýrated Britishi respect for coniscience conseicntiouis objeetors were freed wvith the Governmeiint's blessing. The1f iisters presented nly a 8smalI diffleuityv. Bu31t, Sinee a ni's consciencel(lý is a mlore private posses- Sion than1 blis gatesthre was none on thiis earth to devide with authlority wterthe onscience w.is for temn- porary uise or was of thant unifortuniate tpe that becoineos a habit, like drink, or cigarettes. Over thie con- SeenýttiousN objeutor more strife hias arisen than hiad lie beeni forced to assçume( his share of national defenve -his nation. his safeýgua;rd against coereion of lnience'. Hlis exempil- tion was, a political dodge, flot Britiali fair play, That le proved by the re- fusal i flthe louse todeie himi of the vote lie will not assiat in mnaking valuiable. And to prevent the conscription of others whose dlaims to exemnption iuight lie as real if not as spiritual, local tribunals were set up to pass judgmlent. Two conspiciioÜsly' egregiouis follies have characterized the conduet of the Governuxent in securing the mien for the front. One is the brief for these tribunais, the othier the recent efforts of the authorities to squirm around the question of trade exemptions. And of the two the refusai farce is the most complete exhibition of of-. ficial folly. The idea at the back of this con- sideration for special dlaims was be- yond criticism. There must bie thon- sands of cases where compulsion would work npardonable injustice and disaster. Loca.1 tribunal, aeemed to offer the. most available court and the least expensive. But the good judgment of arnch bodies couljnJ~ot have heencosierd These tri- buinals were madeýi up of local repre- sýentaitives of ail classes. There were titled mien. country squires, mier- chants, and aorr.Thetoret.ically there WeBB no favouritismn in thie pier- sonnel. Il5wever. it developed that every elass of citizenl had ies advo- caite on the bee.And tliat was about ail it dlid meian. Eery dai- ant was personally known to one, or a1il of hie, Judges. The iinerehant re- isted tbe conscription of Iiis cusitomn- ors, tbe mnanuifacttrer of his em-. ployees, thie wvorkmnan of ies feýllowv workmnen, the fariner of hi. hiands. Maniy of the applivants were in debt Io one or more (if titejdgs and to send1( themi to thec trenehes ment prac- tically the. cancellation of tlie debts. Tetribunals as a body were. prejui- diced at the -,fart agineit a duty that mneant interfering with the businless of the comniity. lndeed, inany of themr f raxklyv eontended that thieir cie(f duty was to protert local in- dustry. The emloyees of niiembhers of the tribuinals camer before thevn and pleaded their cases, and while the employer iiuually retired for the dpeision, le knew lie eould trust his fellows as they would trust imi whien their turnsecamne. Soinetiies tiie niiexubers themeves were, applicants for exemiption. If it wss an ag!ricuil- tuiral district, a farmepr's helper was certain of favourable consideration. If it was a mnanufacturing town mianui. facturing becamne a national neeessity, The applicant who bad not a keen supporter on the tribunal Nvas rare. Of course, the War Office attemipt- ed to exercise somne restraint on (le- cisions. Thie ndilitary representative uxiglit appeal, buit if he suceeeded the tribunal was Iikely to go on strike in protest. When Sir William Bo4bert- son was clamouring for more mnen there were frihbunais who «downed tools» for a month at a time; and ail that time the cases of hundreda of mien iiung fire. Many of the. exemptions were laugli- able, iiad they flot been so, serions. No",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE occupation or profession eseaped the lenijeney-ý of these personal f riends in the seaits of the mighty. Pugilists. profssinalsportsmiien, entertainers, labhouring men -whose only eoneern vws to) nake enough to spend it in the, pubis; leýrks, workmen engaged on luxuries, inen with nothing more to bauk thieir claims than a ready smile, were freely exemiipted. From hun- direds of applicants for exemption onilyý one or t wo would be turned down. A man would be exempted be- cauise his brothers were at the front, aithougli he and his brothers had no financial or business conneetion; and lengthiy eulogies would be showered on imi for his family's patriotism. Weeping mothers and importunate fathers drew answering tears-and exemption for their boys. Even in JuIfy of titis year a father secured exemption for six of his seven sons and one asitnthe other son refus- ing to share the family shanie. There is even evidence that the members of a certain secret society were favour- ed. Somuetimes, aware of the weakness of their conduct, the tribunals re- tired into privacy to consider the dlaimrs before them. It wa- a riot of favouritismn, of blindness to the needs of the army, of selfilihess. But the tribunals were no worse than the Governiment-not nearly so bad. Premier Asquith thought to lay the foundation to fil- ture political power, as w-ell as to allay organized opposition to con- scription, by exempting the inembers of twenty-eight unions. To give face te\u003e the act the trades were declared as essential to the war, but others, obvi- ously more closely connected with the struggle, were ignored. And no re- strictions were laid on this exemption througli certifiee'ted occupations. If a man were a inember of the Amalga- mated Society of Engineers-even if lie were makiig nothing remotely con- nected 'with warfare-he was exempt- ed from service. The u~nio'ns thus favoured openly advertised for mnem- bers on the grownd that miembership mneant exemption. Mýillionis of young men fiocked to the munitionfatre and other \"essential\" trades, were foreed to, join the unions. aid were îmmedliiately exempt. It did not mat- ter that their work a week ago waa clerking, or following thep races, or systematie loafing. Aýn enigineer waa sîmpily a memtberi of the union and therefore imunei front military ser- vice. Butt flic Government did not stop there. It added thousands or single young men to its depiartinietaýl staffs and refused to relea e h for female or more aged subhstitutes. AS 'with the unions, the f aet that an able- bodied younig iman was performinjg some trivial dutyv in a Governmnent office was his guarantee against khaki. More, the dcpartments reaeh-. cd out and laid a fondflingl hand on hundreds of pugilista, and football players, and sportsmeni, put thcm iiin khaki, and kept thcmi in England, where thcy were permiitted to filht (with their fists), or kielk a football, for the honour of the unit with whielh they were eonncctied. And eaeh de- partmcnt head -was bis own tribunal. 0f course, thiere werc decpartments, like the Postal, with a finier record, but ail, the attemptis of thc flouse to enforce respect for their cowintry' and its danger failed of complete atis-. faction,. The Governiment defcated its own regulation in wa 'ys more open to cri- ticis-n. Tribunapls were ordered by department heads to exempt certain applicants witbout giving even a rea- son except that theyý were neeessary to the country. They took men whose applications had been refused sud plaeed them in easy Governinent popi- tions, They opened their doors to the. sons of friends, without any qualifica-. tion save their pull. So glaring were these iueonsist.. encies that even the tribunais soin. times went on strike against them. While married men approaching the age limit, with large families for the",
         "ENOLANI N APMs country to keep, cl1assed in, thle lowe.1st me\u003clieal eategory openi to tfie arrny, and ownling large buisillesses wh' m-ou]d be forcid Io close Nithjouî theiir heas-wul thsemen were hatl raked inito thle arm11Y hulndredis of thou.-ainds of yong1sngeAime weue posimg as inipisblsa jobi they' had pickd . It was ven the case thiat (lovrumeýnt factories were, enigagiiugý these youngfl linen in IL lale of thle older,% xnarried inenn Mhlieo thec tibun11als we sittinig On sorne of the nesa stook the matter upl, esecalyte NorthliffelTc Pr ss. uchi a ery v a raised iii the IIolisi that certain depaments were forc'd Io rueease al fcw of! those y ouith- fil sîsukers. Buit (,very v month the filht has, t be rcie.Most or thlese youngz men lodydeclare thieir in- ability 10 follow thieir inclinations, but they,. stand up under the restric- tions with dmrbefortituide and Not lng afler the start of thec war loy' d GIeorge's personal wishies on1 the matter wvere dlemonistraited( ii lis contentions for dilution of labour, al task for wihlie was set spart 1by Lis leadeýr. It is one, of hi,, greatest. accouiiplialiments that lie was able to seeu re file consenrit o f the labour unions. even at thie paymient of ex- emiption. Womeni we-re initroduiced, and to-day' they are enitering facetory Shops where noue but iman ever work- ed before. The relief il gave to a situation whose serifiusnesls Will flot be told until after the war wa.s more imnmediste than even its mnoat optiniis- tic supporters expfeted. Indeed, the effec 1tiess of feniale labour, its ver- satilityv, its energy and tristworthi- neýs, are partially' the, cause of the tiks liat disgraeeod England dur- ing earlY May. TPie Eng2lah work- ingmnan is having it brouglit home to hkm lIat hiR future is one of real work-with real psy-for the Womefn hlave, in many instances within myi personal knowledge, exeeded after a couple of weeks the outpuit of the mien \\010hav beenspciliin ou muwh work for. years. I)iluII[onl frtced hundi(rtedsý of thiou- sanids of\" tlun for bbce flhîing lUne. Auld sevýerallIio esrsafce flhe saineo lrtý1ul direetly or idret ly. For instance, thetý ury \"ystV Wa1S suispeilded iii soîne cases Býut agailisl sileli sav\\injg or lab'ouri anid reigof Ilin stallds theu 1nlti- plie it y of officiaJIS. Work tiii ilighit fmore louelyl be doile liy lioys alud girls is ilu hag o! lulif ,orrînd of. fler ud prlts rvt in,, w ol1d be seandalize-d bv thle dpi tion of wonrk iiud iseio.Il de- mands the services o! ilirce offiviaisý fo 1niessu;ro the floor o! il1vrnnu offlce to) delterie m\"hat fi pay the% scrb-oisn Tep tret o! ilin- dloti air full o! khaki-olad officiaIs, ex- emipt froin fighitinig, but per-forrning nloîhiig thait is bieyond the eaciîyýt of'oy or girls. And f'or soie un- -idvertisedg reaison certinii mil-i, likw actorsý, aire permiuted Io dloni khakki arud coninuiie hieir, uisuailocpto Wvinstoil Churchill las staîced in the Ilouise that there were three sudi a lait' men bebind the uncs for evc-ry% one iii the trenehes. And in ibis C a ianilitary*. service, in London or Fraince, i.s said bo he lîttie better, Wheni Lloyd George rode Io power on al platformn of aggrea.,siv-enes, lie organized ilinediiîely île National Service Depairtinenî. It, was al fine. scheme. unlder anexerene bulsi- neas;iiii man ud baekeod b)*y al tlioroughly rouse-d public. Il openied a wvhinl- wiud eamlpigue o! publicify thalt car- ried tbe nation off its, feet. It cilliod for a l!l million mniq hitherto e-x- eînpt, fromn ;ge or phiysic al condi1tion or thr ils,a substitutes for ilie- bodîed worknienr In esseultial occupai- tios Sir Williamli Robeprtsýon haid publiclY denianlded a hal! million More men by Jubly lst. Hireso! thousands respondi(ed...u bat]unt one fromn every hlindred was plaeed. As; a deparîment fiasco National Service stands alone. It died an mnnatural death of violence i the banda of a .. . ........",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE disgusted people whose ardour lias been cooled by this one act of official f olly. Then came the persistent necessity for soxnething of real productive value. The men had to be secured. Thousands miglit have been combed out of the Goverument offices, but out in the munition factories were inany times the needed number without a claim te exemption exeept the tech- nical1 one of membership in specified unions. They were not essential te the output, because it had been proved that wonien eould, do better than many of them, and men graded B3 and C3 as well, and those who had gone inte the factories ince the war wcre openly exulting in their clever- ness in thus escaping service. There was encouragement to the Government te take them, because the union officials, finding their authonity acorned by this huge new member- ship, longed for a way to free the organization of them. Se the Cab- inet announeed a new dilution bill whereby thsse under thirty-one might be taken for the army. But the new union inembers defeated the mesaure in a simple manner. Without the aeknowledged backing of one union official they organized a strike under their shop stewards. It is history that the Goverument at first counselled, tIen threatened, and finally yielded, as everyone knew it would. 1'olities was never more in the centre of the stage than to-day, with the biberal party uplit into two factions and the Unionists watehing their opportunity. (And yet coalition lias been the sal- vation of the country.) ,Since then the policy of the au- thorities bas been one of unmnitigated submissien te a force tley fear more than seems te a Canadian te be wax- ranted. And to save its official face, as well as te intreduce some sense of loyalty into the young shirkers in munition factories who are watchmng every official move, no publie mention of the cowardliness and disloyalty of these young men was breathed in the consideration of the recognized labour unrest until six weeks after the strike was over. Then a couple of indignant members arose in the Huse, and told the trutli that was already 'known to everyone ini toucli with conditions in the factories. Defeated once more in its efforts te raise the new army where the oppor- tunities were greatest, the Govern- ment turned to other sources. The original minimum age had already been reduced, flrst to eighteen years and seven months, then to, eigphteen. Towards the middle of 1917 the other end of the age seale was tackled and men up to fifty were appealed for. To give the move some appearance of justice, it was announced that these older men would probably be requir- cd only for substitution, but in case they were needed at the Front notice would be given. But there was no exemption loophole provided. The tri-. bunal folly was eliminated. Also it had been long suspected that fraudu. lent exemption on the alleged ground of physical unfitness was if e, and the men thus freed were ordered for re-examination. In oue district it waus discovered that one in every four ex- emptions was dishonest. Legal actioni was taken against dishonlest medical examinera. As was suspected, the numbers of seemingly stromg men wearing the badge of diseharged sol- diers were large enougli to merit in-. vestigation. These, too, were ordered up for re-examination. It was obvions that the Goyernimeut was9 attempting te solve the problem by following the snoothest channel. The oIder men with expensive fam- ilies for thie country, the discharged and unit-everyone who was no organîzed for OPPosition-was on the way te service, while millions of the very youths for military life were flaunting their imamunity. -Where- upon the discharged soldiers orga\u003e- ized. First of allthere was a spon taneous and natural protest against forcing re-examination on the obvi- ously unfit, on the nervous wrcs",
         "ENGLANU IN AMIS And there the Governuient bowed to popuflar opinion. And when lte Case of thle dischjargýed soldiera was re-con- Sidered a compromise was mnade ex- veirfntg those wvho hadl already served veeaevenl thougli they liad once aanbeen passed by the docwtors. Buit stilliftic yonng men in the miuni- tion faetories calmnly issiied their de- xuands on threait of strike or decreas- ed production. Other unions proved their loyalty. Thecre were demranda fromn sonie of thmto elean ont their own youing n1In Tie Souith Wales inrera, whose record o! loyvalty olwaa lluctuiating liue, spoke throuigh one of their representat ives ilic thebuse. They held indlignation meetings, at which tliey called upon thic Goveru- ment to take tlie 205,000 unmiarried minera uinder the age of thirty' -one. A't thie same tinie bondon waaS swarmiing w-ith aliens, aulbjerts of al- lied ouintries or of none. whio were replacing Englishmen in thieir jobs. JXt was eatimated that in England were 200.000 friendly foreignera of rnilitary age. Whcn the spectacle be- came unbearable and the public anger dangeroua, legislation wvas introduced Wo force themi into the arniies of this or their own counitries. 0f course, the o-aedPacifists and those others wliose only meeting-ground ia their pro-Germanism, fouglit inufthe bouse of Couinons te exempt these people; but the feeling of the House was overwhelmingly against theni. It was at this tine was held the notorions Leeds Convention, in early June, an aggregation ef Labour and Socialist anti-war, peace-at-any-price advoeatea who poaed as representa. tives of Britishi labour. Lt lias been estimated that thirty-three per cent. of the delegates were Russian Jews, thirty per cent. conscientious objec- tors, and twèlve per cent. acknow- Iedged pacifiats. As their objeet waa solely Wo end the war to save their own skins or Germany\u003es tliey reeeived seant respect from the country. The exple rienc1 es of R a.mnsay Macdionald and hia frierid Jowett will ha1ve done more thian ail the tuansof jgec- turcs and mnobbinga thiey havereiv ed to showý thiem thant there hs a liimit to human pat'enee. Thiat h wer the mian-power pro- blei reat-s to.-day. 'Whajt wiIl b)e thec solution ia flot at the miomnift appar- ont. -Some Say that theo (overnitent pre fers to struiggli, along with whaiýt it lias unitil the millions of tlie tnitod States are available. At anyv ratv, it .~eacertain thait tlic present (loy. ernient will flot voervce the shirkers who have dlefeated,( it so easýily at every moveV. Lt would bit bard to Manie Creat Britain fnr leaving gome of the fightixig to the newes(\",t a1l1Y, alud no one woldi bc less likely Ioprtt than the United S'tates, which enter- cd tlic war after the worst of tlie strain was over and eýau neyer, in ny event, suifer as, have those who took up1 fle cuidgela earlier. That thiere should be a problemn in a democratie country o!f finding the me-n for a wvar like, thýis is not surpris. ing. Lt is rio contemptuoua comnment oin flie loyalty of the Britishi. No other country would have gone so far on voluntari-m, nio coimtry baegiven sucli proof of its patriotismn wiithot coereion., But thervecornies a limiit to voluintarisrn in a wvar wbgre every inan and] womnan bins work to dIo; and the shirkers stand out more proin.n ently than their number% warrant. Where Grreat Britaini failed was in the loopholes she providied to thec shirkers. Withont preparation she found the men to block the armies of a country trained and fitted tW the last unovement and guin. lt was only ini the Iast pound of her strength that ber manhood fs.iled lier. She seeured the men for the worst days of the war. And even without thecentry of later allies alie would hiave found the men for victory when lier baek was against the wall. F'reedom is a misnomer in a na- tion\u003es criais. The nxt article of thia meyie,èsj5 entite T PdPrbm\"",
         "%bahes.pcare'*s £nç;tanb BY GEORGE C, WELLS 1- E T HE R 'Williama Shakespeare was the g-reatest literary genios thle English-speaking lu race has produced, as the playq attibuted to him indicate, or a veycommnon-place person in- deed, as a Chicago judge \"Iearned in law\" recently decided, the England upon whîcb he opened his eyes in 1564, and closed themn in 1616, was one in which changea of immense lin- portance were takîng place or had just occurredi--changes affeeting the social, the religious and the political life of the people,--greater even than those which have taken place within the memory of living man'. Shakespeare'; 11f e eovered almost the whole reign of Elizabeth and more than halfliher successor's, and, during that time, England rangedi herself deflnitely as the champion of the Pro- testant faith, took first rank as a naval power, laid the founidations of lier colonial empire and, by Uinion with Scotland, put an end to the long- drawn-out border warfare and so gave opportunity tn lier northern countica, as well as to the neighbouring king- dom, for development along peacefufl hines. Prior to the sixteexith century al Christendoi. was in a sense a vast commonwealthi, ini whiek the chic£ authorities were the Pope andi the Em- peror, thougli the varions atatea were often at aramong theinselves. Dur- ing that century' haîf the eivilized world broke awa -y fromn the spiritual dominion of the Roman Pontiff. The diseoveries of Christopher Columbus, Vasco di Gama, Magellan, Balboa and other daring navitgators opened up a new world of rîchness beyond the dreams of avarice and, although the King of Spain, by virtue of the Popels generosity uvith that which was net his to give, elaimied most of it, the other nations were not slow in dis-. puting his laîi. The fali of Constantinople before the Turkish hordes drove the wise men of the Eastern Empire to seek new homes in Western Europe, andi the revival of learning there, whieh resulted from, their coming, gave a new impulse to, men's thougitsa nd turned themn into paths previously unknown. There wvas an English literature, of sorts, before the time of Shakespeare, but sucli of it as exists to-day ia reati only by seholara (with the psil exception of Chaucer's poems), and is interesting only by eontrast anti for the liglit it throws upon conditions of life, the development of the lan- guage, and so forth. Up to the time of Elizabeth, England had hati little or no voice in European polities., Though bier knights and mex-at-arms had overrun the fair land of France more than once and hiat woni renowuj on many battiellelds, when they fouight as froc lances in the Italian or Span- ish wars, as Crusadera hadi striven to wrest the Holy Land from the Saracens, with the fortunes of Con- tinental Europe they had practi4ay nothing to do--but when the ea Armada, which set forth with its tow-",
         "SHAKESPEARE\u003eS 'ENOLAND ering galleons and ail the pomp and glory of Spain, came limping back in the- shape of a few battered and dis- mantled hulk and it became known throughout the world that England had heaten the then mîstress of the seas and had done so ]n fair fight, ahe sprang at once into the position of a great naval power and becamne a real factor in w-orld politics. Soon her flag waved on every sea and in the New World, as well as in the old, the English seamnan was feared and hi, prowess respected. Ail dread of foreign invasion bail passed away: a flood of exultant patriotismn ran through the heart of Englishmiteni and thie feeling it produred i, shown i some of Shakespea.,re,'s grandeqt liues, such as those which, iu Richard IL, he puts into the xnouth of old John of Gamut: This royal throne of Rinigs, this svcpter 'd le, .... This earth of Majesty, this seat oi Mars, Thia other Eden, demi-paradia.; This fortress built by na~ture for herasif Againot infection and the hanci of war; This happy breed of men, thia littie would This precious atone set in the silver sea, Whieh serves it ln the office of a wall, Or as a moat deifensi.ve to a houa. Against the envy of lesa happler landa- This hle8sed plot, thia earth, tUas realia, tht. England. Shakespeare's Englaud was not the busy hive of industry it is to-day. The whole population probably 4id not exeeed between five and six million people, and the area eovered by Lon- don was small indeed compared witb the present, but, dirig thc reign of Elizabeth, great industrial changes took place and England's trade and commerce made great strides in in- portance. Ini the early part of the uixteenth century, Antwerp and Bruges, iu the low countries., were the ehief markets of the world, but that diill bigot, Philip Il. of Spain, bis cruel lieutenant the Duke of Alva, and their fierce and brutal soldieru drove capital and industry away. Thei skilled worker and the capitalist were warmly welcomed in the free land 4-- ac!rOs the uarrow Sea, and ere long xnany thousands of refugeff. fromn the Nethierlands had made f resh hiomes beside the Thamnes and, as the. trade of Flandera feUl off, so'that of lng. land grew until, insqtead of Antwverp and Bruges, London becanie the cýhief mart of Europe aud, in bier Ware*4- houses and along hier wbarves were to b. found, aide by aide with) the cottou of the Indies, the Silkeni fabricas of the. Far East n\"ud th e wooilen stuff, of home manufacture, tii. gold and sugar and tobaero of the New World beyond the western ocean. Te iri. in trade of those dJays wss of smail value- sud] silk-wearing had onily just bevii introduced iinto England, perlbaps ) bv the Frcnch HIugenots, who, like theil Protestant kin of thi eteln, were driven to seek asýylum in Eng- lai-d snd who set up a cliiurch o! their own in the crypt of Canterbury Cathedral, but the woollen mnanufac. turc waa f ast hecoming a very imnport- ant source o! national wcalth.ý Forini- erly Euglish wool hiad been sent tqe b. woven iu Flanders sud dyed ait Florene, but that time had passe, aud the spiuuhing of yarn, wenving. frilliug aud dyveig of c'loth spread rapidly fromn towu to town andý through the country districts until tiie trade, o! whieh Norwich was thc great centre, exteuded ail over the eas'tern- counties. Tii. est did niot mionopolize, it, howevcr, for thc broadeloths of the. west were cousidered best or ai the, Euglish woolleu manufactures; and even thc north. where thc people were poorer and rouglier than else- where, began to make a naine for ita friezes aud coarse fabrica. Gevern- ment sougbt in every way to foster the development of these. industries and, as an old-timne example of \"pro- tection\"\u003e, forbade the export o! goods that could be consurned at home. aud ordered the use o! Engliah. produrta, in preference to the foreign articlIe., One o! the statutes, for example, read that \"\u003con every Sunday and holiday every person o! six .,cars old sud. uip- wards (with soie few exceptions)",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE shall wear on bis head oue cap of wool fully wrought in England\"'. it is estimated that the tounage of vessels engsged in English commerce during Elizabetli's reigu did not mudli exeeed 50,000 tons, or about as much as four or -five of the steamships that lie along Moutreal wharves iu the suminer or the waterfrout of St. John, N.B., in winter. They were small to insigniflcance, accordiug to preseut- day ideas, but thcy were manned by the hardicat and most daring seainen iu the world, who \"siuged the King of Spain's beard\"1 at Cadiz, wlio fouglit sud worsted the Armada, sud who faced the fury of wind and wave on every qcean. Que of those bold ses- dogs, Captain Richard Chancellor, Made his way to Archangel, on the White Ses, and began the trade with Ruissia. Others disputed with French seainen the cod fishieries of Newfound- land, and with Spaniards aud Portu- gese for the whale flshery of the Aretie Oesun, sud othiers aigalu, sait- ing fromu South amupton, trafflcked sue- eessfully in gold dlust sud ivory with the African savages of tlie Gainea coast, while the redoubtable Francis Drake, most represeutative sea-rover sud flghter of the time, who believed that iu killing Spaniards sud lootineg gold-ladeu galleons hie was net merely pursuing a lucrative sud cougenial occupation, but also doing a work most suitable for \"the eleet of God7,? left Eugland lu 1577 with one txuy ship, the Pelican, aud some eighty men, sud after circumnavigating the globe iu a three-years' voyage aud passiug through adveutures innumier- able, came back tW Plymuth harbour witli treasure of gold dust, bars of silver, pearls, emeralds sud disxnonds valued at more than £50,000-a f abulous sumis l those days. Eungland was not long escaped froni the horrors of a religions persecution Men still lived who had suffereél either lu their owu persous or lu thosE of their loved ones at the bands el \"Bloody Mary»ý sud ber lieutenants Even the Queen, Elizabeth herself had had a uarrow escape froma mai,- tyrdom, and now that, under lier 11h- eral aud broad-aimed. mie, there was complete liberty of conscience, men breathed freely and compared their present happy estate with the evil days of the preceing reigui. lu1 cou- trast with Philip of Spaini arrogating, chureli functions and Hlenri de Valo\u003eis planning to massacre ail his Protest- ant subjeets, Elizabeth's poliey was 11toleration for al\"'; she wvould not permit men's private thouglits or their personal religion to bie iuquired into, aud it was not liard for her subjeetis to decide who were better off. Though Qucen Elizabeth was not fond of theologieal disputes, was equally friendly to Protestants and Catholios, and welcomed both at lier couneil board, thougli she was not given te the displsy of spirîiual emotion, tuer., eau be no doubt that she possessed a strong religions sense snd in turnes of peril or of special deliverajice shie waa not slow tW acknowledge lier dlepeud- ence upon and lier gratitude for the Divine hclp. So with the n'en o~f ber time, their religion was a reality, en- tering into tlie thîigs of everYday 11fr aud, even if thiey weýre someitimes mis- taken, it euabled themi to dIo well what they undertook to dIo, for they did itý as iu the siglit of G*od. We filid 'Si, Humphrey Gilbert, ou a stormny voy- age, quieting the fears of bis sailors. byv telliug tliem, \"WVe are as near HIcaven at ses as on land\", and atout Sir Richard Grenville, after keeping the whole Spauisli fleet of fifty-tbree vessels at bay for a niglit sud part of a day with has one little ship, the R. venige, calmly laying hinuseif down ta die ou the deck of the SpanibL ad. miral's lagsipl wvith the words, -il have ouly doue my duty\". The utter, ances «f Shiakespeare himself, asDay LFarrar points out, iustîfy us ini b. lieving that this great poet was i Itruly religious sud God-feariug jua who was persuaded, as were his. eon itemporaries, that «there'sa a.viit that shapes our ends\", aud hie eet the religions spirit of the time.",
         "SLIAKESPEARE'S; ENGLýANlD There were, Jand and labour pro- hlem\"ts ii lîk11a\u0026 time ais there aire to-dayv- The lot of thp Iabiouing manii had14 bwei, ild sti01a1 bitterly hatrd in Eulnd ery poor'ly' paid, hal-sarvd.wrt\u003cuhedJ ,h 1oused. fie was, inisut respect, worse ofïf thai thle cattie he wor-ked withl. Statuteos passed in ear]ier roeis were extremne- ly VSevere, and unlder. thlem inanyv ilne Were forced froin wanit inito lwes liess amI crime. Weo read ini one, iu. stance of thei Soietishiý1re mlagis- trate, capiltuirug il gang or onlin 1- dred tramps at oil, timie, anigfifty' of fithe at fonce, and lminfg thiat they vhad to wait unltil thesize Iw- for( e. ey cold hauig the others. The incfreaise ofsee farintiiig, 'onnieted with the growth of thle woollenl Indus- tryv, led to theo layiig. walste of lands forînet(rly cutiatv bY turning theni unto p\u003cistur(e, and thits threw farmi abresout of work. Buit, of couirse, that rightfed lt~ifs suchi things a]- (aI o, ani what waS euit off in one1 direction wiis more thtan inade up in another. Seleritific iiethiods began to he applied to farinig, so that better crops wvere pr-odwned aud one acre yieldied as mucl(Illias two had dlotie be- fore, and( s0 muehol of the surplus labour was tiken care of. Then, wvise, legislation wals enacited wilichelied the worthy. poor, while itfe, ese and controlled theo lawless and coin- pelled the idile to work for his, main- teniance; under it work-hiouses were provided and local respousibulity fix- ed for the relief of local distress. The statuites euacted ait that timie fori the basis of the present English Poor Laws. Great additions were made to the coxnforts of life during the turne of Shakespeare. As mnanufactures in- ereased and comnmerce grew, wealth became more greterally distributed and wider traffle with foreign couin- tries hrought their good things to the knowledge and wvithin the reacli of Englishmen. Love of beauty* , colour and display began to revollutionize Enclish ideas of dress aud soon were, carried to extravalgance(. Men were sa1id to Wear ai mlaior on their hes and uec El1 illabeth'8 wairdrohe, ivitli its 3,000 dreýsess wws rivalled by- thie slaIýIhed doublets, the( rulffa and lwel Ped pouIrpOiItsý (if hier cou1rtiers. Eveni 0h0 I0Or lassadloptud more geal- erous moifdes of living-mIlore, il (at was catenl and less saiftfisit, the woodlen recrsOf' earlier das were replac- ed by ewter andii iianyi y« me vould boast al goo lhow of sivrplate., the r-ougli wa;tt led aiL11 mud1-hedaulblled farin buesgv wayv to) bi)Ilgs lot' brick ani stone. (hm.y amle, iitio general uise, l fetr rre lu ordlin- -Iryv bouses a f'ew years before ano dloublt lessenled simuke, mleantimroe yegh; captsspesde h for-L er filthy fio-ovigof rushiles pil- lows caine into geiieral use whereas tIleyv hadl forxner- vly bee lookeId uipon as fit on]ly for wforiien or for silk peu- ple. The wealthiy unegrets begant\u003e to ereet lofty buse withl parapeted fronts. and oakuinetnard staircases and quaint gables, slncb as miaY he seen to-day in old townsb likeý Chester and (?oventry v Th Statly , homes of [nlandll\" tiII aIlle besuiity of Tudor arci-tt began Io re- placep the( gloomily dungieon sudig frown- ing Stone battileets if mled levaI t imles. GlaIss caelito general uise sud] iucreased liglit and inprovedl ventilation miade for better heaulth among thle people. Naturaily , some ,ouser-,atluves ohjected, snd we, flud Lord Baconi -omp]Iilaiig itaiou bouses were -so flIl ofgls\"ta one Vouild not tell where to go inore «tO gZet otit of the sun or Ilhe cl The sehoohuallster waas aioa Shakespeare's time, Mauy gramiinuar sebools w-ere opeue'd aud tblrouigi themn the Middle Vlasses front squire to tradesman Welre hrouight initocott withi the master minds of 'reee sud Roule. Foreigu travel hleesme gen- ers], and a tour of the continent was looked u[)On as a nccessary part of a getemnseduication. \"«Homeikeepi- iug yot sa esys Shakespeare in \"Two Gentlemen of Verona-. express.",
         "492 ,TIIL rU\u0026-NJ1 ing the idea, of the tume, \"have ever homely wits.\" The study of the Eng- lish Bible, whieh became common among the people, and the reading of it and sueh works as Fox's \"Book of Mfartyrs\" did mueh to elevate and eduicate the lower ranks of society. One of thc resuits of the impetus giveni to learning by the opening up of the treasures of the classies was the, production of Euphuism, a fanci- fui and affcctcd style of language which took its name from a prose romrance ealled \"Euphues\", publish- cd by John Lyly in 1579. Elizabeth was very mudli taken with it, and it becamne very fashionable uitil, as a writer of 1632 remarks, \"that beanty in court whicht could not parley Euphinisxn was as littie regardcd as she whieh now there speaks not French\". Sir Walter Scott mntroduc- ed a Buphiniît, Sir Piercie Shofton, into his nove1, «The Monastery\", and those who have not forgetten the story can imagine how delightful it muet have been te hear sucli ridiculous jar- gon as he talked continually going on. .Shakespeare ridlieuied the craze in \"Love's Labour Loet by cxhibiting Armnado, whom lie speaks of as \"a man of firc-new werds, f ashion'e own knight\"-\"that hath a inint of phrases in hie brain; one who the music of hie ewn vain tongue doth ra'vish like ecehanting harmony\". But whule language was over pol- imhed, the nianners ef the time were rude te our way of thinking. Bear figlits and buil-baitings, at whieh dogs were gored and chained bea2ts beaten te death, were frcquented by the ceurt and, aecerding te eue chronicler, were aecounted \"charming entertain- mente\". Elizabeth ueed te beat lier inaide of honour, and the box on the car, with wvhich she honowred Lord Essex when she theuglit hi inatten- tive, was probably no liglit oee. Great ladies were accustomed te beat their children and servante, and poor Lady Jane Grey, whe was certainiy meek and gentle if ever eue was, bas re- corded that she was se \"wretchedly boxed, struck, pinclied and ill-treat- ed in other manners that she used to wish herseif dead\". Shakespeares great people are not at ail choice i their iangiiage or particular as te how they address one another. In \"'Mueh Ado About Nothiug\" we flnd B3eatrioe and Benediet, weil-bred f olk as the times went and noted for their wit and poiiteness, making several inter- changes of repartee in whiuh, for ex- ample, she addresses him as \"a eew ard, a glutton, an idiot, a biiffoon, a rake, an idiot\", and he responds hy calling her \"a parrot's tongue, a fool, etc?\" Men were superstitions in Sha3oe- speare's tîme. We can readily sec that front his playe: witches, hobgoblia and ail kinds of uncanny things wexe firmly believed in; dismnal legendr, were current and grew in the telling; every éhurchyard had its ghost; wherever a man had been muirderedl his spirit wae believed to, walk, and many dared not leave their village or even their own door aftcr sunset. One clergyman of the time gravely records that, \"Lt in an îiailible rule that everie fortnighit or at least everie ionth, eaeh witÏ,h must kill one e.hild at the least for her part\". Se that wben the witchcs, circled around the cauidron and mnade their weîrd pro- pheexes to Macbeth, when the ghost of Haxnlet's father stalked niajeetiesi.. Iy acrose the stage, the speetatoeu ebivered and believed they were look- ing at -what they miglit very possibly sec in rcality if they were not care- fil. Had James Whitcoxh -Riley bee contemporary with Shakespeare, hi, \"Gobbleums 'il git you if you don1 watch out\" would have had real fore and would not have been regarded g a laughing inatter at ail. Elizabeth'e liking for display i dress was equalled by lier fondnesi for shows and spectacles, and w1hei she traveiled throughout the k-go the universities, the citie and th, great nobles streve te edlipse one an Cther in the plays, revels, msu and triumphal programmes which, il ,.flT.TTAM Xrfl A ATMT W",
         "SHAKESPEARE'S ENGLANI) the in -thological and classical style of the day, they prepared for lier amusemnent and delectation. The mnost elaborate of the.qe that we have any record of was one given by the Earl of Leicester when the Qu1eeM visited hlmi nt Kenilworth, Caitie in 15î.5. and Nich is desuribed lin Sir Walter S-eott's rovel \"Keniilwvort.h\". The castIe %vas flot far fromn Stratford- nAonanid it is qulitu possible, evenl Iklthat SIma1keqpare. thenl a bo 'y ofelvnaY bave been taken to, see die j\u003ectac1 ansd indeed-thouigh that is only conjeure- it mnay first have turned his mmid to the stage. The old \"Miracle Plays\" or \"Mys.. teries» of the 'Middle Ages were in time replaced by the \"ýMoralitieW\", which rcjoiced in such edifying tities as \"Hit the Nail on the Head\", \"The JJog bath Lest isi Pearl\", and so, forth-theu, in the days of Hlenry VIII. were brought forth the \"Inter- luides\", which resembled our farces. The first English comedy, ealled \"Ralpli Royster Doyster\", was pro- dueed about 1551, and ten yearq later the first Engliali tragedy was per- formed byv students of the lmer Tem- ple. Then, with scarcely any inter- inediate steps, and aftcr a lapse of buit a few short years (spriuging like Minerva fuilly armed aud equipped from the head of Juno) camne the inagnificent creations of Shakespeare, whih mark high-water in the Eng- lish draina and whieh, probably,-will neyer be surpasscd-or even equal- led. The theatres in whieh Shake- spearc's pisys werc produeed and where lie himscif acted, were of rude construction sud had but ineagre equipinent. Qood descriptions of thein are citant sud thcy must have been anything but coinfortable or conimodi.. ous. I 1576, when the first liceused theatre was opeued at Blackfriar's in London, it was merely a round wood- en wall enclouiug a central space open to the sky-this central portion was Palled \"the pif\", a naine atili main- taiucd iu the Engliali playhoues, and there sat or 4toodl the cenion herd who paid fromn a peny p to six- pence for their admission. If it rain. cd (sud rain is bY n) m1e01ns1 uncem01- mon iu London)ý the crowvd of bth ers, bakers, \u003cTuIetckaer\" er- eers, sailors and a pprentice receive the downpour oni their huads- not fliat they m1inidud a little th1ilg like that. Men wheo were arciustomed to un1paved and uindrainied streets and whof kuw no(tlhnlg (If u11inreas and waterpruofs, hal Ilitio fear gif caitch- i1jgý cilIdS 10- PISP t-illlured thern11 as aL circule condition. Whue ai1tig for the play to begin, or duriug thc iiu. tervala, this part of the adec drank beer, ate fruit and nuts, howl- ed, fouglit and mnade a genersi pan- demonjui-if the performnce dis- pleased thein they turned the place upaide down, mnobbed the actors and then perliapa fiuished up by going, 1l a body to taes the author lu at blanket or give humi a beating. The stnge was sheltcred frein the rain by a tace roof, an(] there stood the better olais of spectators, who paid a shilling ecd --or, for su extra cousi de ration, wcrc accoinmodatcd with) sools. sud] there thcy played cards, smoked aind inter- changed pleasautries, neot always of a vcry refiued charaeter, withi thie mot. ley crowd1 in thi- pit. At the back of thc stage was a gal- lery eight or ten feet higli, for use of the actors when supposed to spcak froin wiiiows, castle walls, dhurcI towers. cliffs or other lofty places. T'ie stag-'e cquipmlent sud] appîlances were of the rudest tapestry or rudely dauibed canvas sred for arce c- fetsfsd chanige of place was indi- eatcd by tic hsuging eut o! a placard bearing the naine of Romte, Athens or Verona, as the case miglit be. A vig- orous effort o! the imagination en- abled the spectators to realize that, wheu a rickety throue eovered with tinsel waa carried off and a rougb tabl with flgoa ad bowls\u003ek its place, thcy were imniediately trans- ported freom a royal palace into a tav- cru, sud that wheu a thorn brandli",
         "i1T -N - /XP or f wo replaed a pasteboard rock, they saw before thei a waving for- est îistead of an inhospifable sea- eoasf. In \"Midsummcr Night's DreaiW\" we have cmbalmed a delightfully ComItie examuple of f lis sort of fhings, wliere fthc Athenian fradesmen per- formr ftle play of \"Pyramus, and Thiisbe\" before the Duke. In if a wall is necessary, flirougli an opcning ini whieh flic lovers are f0 interchange their vows; se Snouf fhe Tinker, well- bedaubedl with plaster, cornes on flic stage, informns flic audience that he is thle wall, and, with his fliumb and finger mnaking a circle, which serves as the chink t hrough whicli the ap- point ment îs made f0 meef af .Ninny's terni. Then another gentleman ap- pears ou flic scene carrying a lanfen and a thornb-asl and accompanied by a dog. lHe announces fliat hie is thte Mtan in flic Moon, and the stage is now supposed f0 be bafhed ini moon- light; oneeofflic speefafers suggcsfs, howeven, thaf flic man, flic dog and fhe tlionnbush oughit te get int o flic lauf cru, as if is hardly in accordance witi flie dramnatie, properties for the Man in1 fte -Moon to bic scen carryîng fthe lumninary which lic is suipposcd fo inhabit. 0f cournse, Shakespeare ini- fended titis as a picc of fun, but, no doubf, eqmally sorny muakeshifts wcrc of comlmon occurrence in bis dlay and, p)robably, flic boliers-on really* gof more enjoyrnent ont of what fbcy sa11W than flic blasé phlaygoers ef 1917 gef froni tite most gorgeoiis triumiph of flieatrie at-jusf as flic ehild is bief- fer amnused by flic home-made rag baby titan by flic mosf expensive 'ponpé\u003ee de Paris. The performnances began af oee o'clock ii flie affernoon, Sundays in- cluded, and were iisually over b 'y flinee or fouir oelock, wlien fthe audience weut ite fo suipper. The actons were fic costumle of their own timie, witi flic addition of mnaaks and wigs. Tite female parts- flic juliefs, Rosalinds and Ponfias- were ail taken by beys or smoofli- f aeed young mien in woen's dreas. They were but lightly esteem-edl and seeni f0 have been a rather disreput- able lot, whose time off tlic stage was largely oecupied in driinig and brawling, and wliose carcrs ftrequent- ly came f0 an abrupt and violent end. Shakespeare had the advantage, as ail British subjects bave had for near- Iy a century, of living under a popu- lar sovereiga. Elizabeth had the favour of lier people from the timne when site aseended the f lrone, and was welcomcd enthusiastîially as a chiange from hier gloomy fsister, and the early favour grew int o somnething that approached worship, 'Sie said, ini addressing hier first Pakrliimient: \"Nofhing, no worldly fhing under the sun, is as dear f0 me as the love and good-wilI of my subjects\"ý-and that these were no idie words was proved by hier subsequent conduct. Slie real- ly souglit fte welfare of lier p)eople and fully dcserved the love and good. will, whicli she liad and kepIt. Tax- ation was liglf. The Goverrnnienf was firm but just. Af homne were pence and prosperify-abroad the Eniglisit aris triumuphed and thte Englisit flag was lield in wholesomne respet. The days of 'Good Qucen Bess\" were iii- dced happy days for England coin- pared wifh fliose wbichi preeeded hier reign and with t'he evil timies of thie two Clianleses that wcre nof, so fari away. Even so fan bauk as the days of Solomnon mien eoinplained that :the gýood old fîmies, wcre no more, and the wise, king dcclared fteir views f4.- lacions and that the tmsini wbieb. lie anid his confemnp9raries- Iived wene better than any fliat liad gonle before. Se, in spife, of wars and fuifs andj other drawbaeks of the twentietli cea- tury, ne one wiil liesitate te admit fliat wif h rip)enedl knlowedge, muilti- plied comiforts and couivenlienees axud fthc manifold trnimpis of art and science, we are vasfl.y better off to day than were tlic men of \"Shake- speare's England\", great tlieugh flisir advantages were over ftose of earlier periods.",
         "BY MORGAN ROBERT§ON FEW oîîthls aIgo I atf- lendofd a baniquet and loft it as T iwy leave suehl funectioxîs, hungery. 1EIntelrg ail all-igt'i ani gave il]y order to :i wajiter, Mio, wen Ile had filIed it, sat dowu\\-I at thle table, withi me. Il was vecrY late, anid Ilis dulties were lîglit. ~Yîelooking well,' lie roimarkedl, a., bis gilne traveIled over rnyevi i ielote.\"Yur dead sweIL buit the lasýt tinie 1 saw youi. youi were, cvrdwithl mlli, cariga storni lune ashlore in ii th Weiland Canal. , I took to f Ihimi. lie was whlite- hiebuit hlad the( keen, intelligent faeof a mlanl of fortyV-flve whio haid *o yet gvnup the( flght; a liVely, Ilopeful face, one, thalt cornels to those who wili oftener thanl lsc. uls skin was brownj, as thougli the sun and winid of ail1 the Zones hald srnittenl if. Juis eyes, gray, steadfast and humnor- oIS, hiad In them when haif cbosed the- twinkie of self-confidence, but also, in their wide-open stare, the ini- tenaitY of a mnan of initiative and sud- den actioni. Ini his voice were char- acter, individliality, and the habit of coinmnand; yet lie wore the short jac!- ket of a waiter, amd miglit have ac- cepted a tip. 1 couild flot recali hav- ing meot hirn. \"You seemn to have the advautage o[f mey, I suid. \"I know the Welland Canal, however, though 1 arn trying t o forget that ditch.Y \"You can't,' lie laughed. \"No man 495 eauI Whlo ever w-1t thr1oughi it, That 1111 %ilîi you in t) 11o 1i \u0026tmnia wia M.\\ IirS4 anjd iwst. 1 Itruk for Sait waler aIn ýtwe the old 11111 Ipaigl nie 1vfl at Port Coiblorne. \\o' yoi renel\u003ergoling to\u003e selool with liev 1 lie ~ ~ ~ Ml wînioc 1i m e, d ith a littie effort I eaie hili al seiliol- matef al littie vider thaiinimyseif, wiio hlad goie te seak Iri Iii ife and ro- turiird a fuiI-11edgedi saiUwateir navu%*- gatfor, tei slupj, on Ibis rec-tord, as tirst imate in fthe sc1hloone1r that oarriedl mei before thei mast, ani to meeot isWa terloo inii teWibi Cmnal, thloughz nlavigationl of whivch demanaqulities niever tanglit iior aequired ili thev cur- ricuwlm of seafaing. After. grouind- inig thle scholonerill seVeraýl imie,, part- iing every lhue mi board, aîîd driv-ing us tO opeai roI by tIc extra woý(rk coilg ofheiitks ewas dis- Plharged bth kpe.As I thlougit of ail t ile grunxibling-1 sillor rose witinl mcl, andif there t,011. tlîctale, lie, a waîter, 1 a writcr, we foghLlt oit a gruIdge, o! twenity yrs1 stndinIg. 1\u003e3ut it ended aicaly; 1 lcalied humn aI fariner, hc oullid mel a soldier, and %%o shjook bands. Ivelearneod, lie said, as we set- tted iak,« nii the fiast inonth or so, that you're the feliow that writes thiese rotten sea atoneos, Wli donl't yonite real sea atories?» 'Tor the s;amie reason that youl don\u003e't serve a real Welsh T answer- cd, tappiig the now eold eoneoction lie hall served nie. \"I coldn'iit seli a read story.\"'",
         "THE \u003cJANADIAN MAGAZINE \"That's \u00260,\" he answered slowly. \"WVho'd think tbat you could have lie- corne a writer, and I a hash-slinger? MNaking lots o! money, I suppose.\" '\"No, ia not, or I wouldn't le in your society to-niglit.\" \"We're ail bluffers, I guess. You are, here in this beanery with your glad rags on. I arn, too-no, not -now. Pmr slinging hasli, and glad of the chance. But 1 was a millionaire for a time. Not long. But while it lasted r had dreams--big dreams.\" 1 asked him about this, and there followed bis story. It vas interrupt- ed every few mnoments by cals for «habm an-\"2, \"corn bec! and-\"-ý, \"mys- tery sud white wings\", and it kept mne ,at the table until dayliglit. Hie prehuded it by the advice te wrÎte it up as a real sea, story, but asked that T suppress bis naine ntil lie had saved enougli te get hM to Cuba, where lie had new plans for advancement. And now, after mortlis of thougît, 1 amn following lis advice; for no effort o! the ereative mîmd, aud ne fliglit of eonventienal fancy, can equal the weird, grim yarn that lie reeled off lie- tween orders. \"You mnust have read in tlie papers a few weeks back,\" lie began, \"about that biunch of college men that char- tered the eld racer M1ayflower, filled lier up witli diving gear and dy-na- mite, and went down s.fter the trea- sure ln the Santa Margkerita.\" 1 nodded assent, \"Yes, and a hurr- cane hit them and tliey barely eseap- ed.Y \"They're keeping murn,\" lie said, \"aud mean te try again; but it's no use. That treasure is seven hnndred miles te the nor' nor-east new, and I was about the last man te, look at it. It'n resting iu the hold o! a smal schoener, suuk lu four hundred fath- oms. I neyer heard e! that treasure slip until about three years age, wheu 1 quit a brigantine at CJedar lCeys and mixed iu with the boardlug-house ,crewd. There was a, fellew out of a -job named Gleason, and lie had a \u003c%hart lu lis poeket that ho talked about, but neyer sliewed. He teld us ail about tliat old Spanisl slip that went dowu wlth all bands lu the six- teenth century, carrying witli her about seven millions' wertli o! gold, silver, aud jewels; and lie knew the location. Hie lad get it fromn a drun- ken diver wlio had seen lier on the sea.bettom, spelled lier diugy old naine on the steru, and saved the uews te himself while lie wormed out e! the skipper tlie latitude and longitude of the place. And uew lie wanted te en- list capital, or make up a erew of mon that would do the werk. Dead easy, he said. Just te get there, drag the bottoim witli two boats aud a length o! cain until the wreck vas located, tlien te go dewn lu a divirg suit, book on te the cleats aud lioist tliem Up. \"Well,.lu the crowd that lie talked to there wasu't a dollar. We were al dead broke, but we were ail ambitieus. There was IPango Pete, a uigger six foot tail,,wlio couldn't write bis naine, but lie was a searnan rom lis feet up; aud a Dago ramed i\u003eedro Pasqualai. These two w.- re the kînd that willl choke yeu before tliey ask the time o! nigît. Then there was Sullivan, old man Sullivan, a decrepit old cedger who lad sailed second mate ail bis life, aud neyer g4ýt a flrst mate's berth because lie couldn't master navigation. And there was Peters, a youug fellow filled np witl the romance and the glory of the life at ses-rot, as you and 1 know, but le was enthusiat(c, aud that was enougli. A trie of Dutclmen were? taken in-Wagner, Weiss, aud Myers, tliree goed felb\u003ews down on their luek, A Portuguese uamed Christo, aud twe Seu'weglan brothers inamed Swam(en eompleted thc bunch. We talked it over down at the end of the fruit dock, wheie the oyater lests corne lu sud mûse fast, sud where the downs-a-us engregate te smeke aud bst of!the prosperous past. \u003c\"But this crowd tslked o! the prose. perous future.. Seven millions, satd Gleason, lay dewn tIere off Turks Is- land in less than sixty fathoms, snd",
         "THE ARGONAJ!TTS ail we needed was some kind of a craft to get us there, a diving suit in storage battery to light up a bulb to seareh for the treasure. These things seemed beyond our reacli, uintil a schooner came in for supplies. We sized lier up, and Gleaso went wild as hier different fi tiu and appliances ,,howed up. There were the diving dresses we needed; there was the stor- age battery; there were the extra anchors for mooring a eraft over a c-ertain spot. and the air pumps and paraphernalia for diving operations, scattered abouit the deck. She was a aniali craft, and was manned by men who dfid flot act asud talk like sailors. There seemied to be no skipper, and they smiokced on deck while working, and talked back and forth as though ail were equal. \" 'A company,' said Gleason, 'just like us. only they\u003eve got the money, and possibly the secret. Weil, the company that gets the boot owns it, and sucli iatters as the ownersbip of the schooner aud the outfit can be settled afterwards, possibly out of court. 'What do you say!' \u003c'We were. We laid Iow, but watch- ed, and when that sc.hooner was fiiled up with grub, we were ready to raid lber aiid chuck the crew overboard; but it waan't iiecessary Wo do the lat- ter. They filled up too late for the tide and went ashore for the even- ing, Ieaving no one aboard but a Ja- panese cook. W. remembered as we dliibed aboard after dark, that w. hadn't a man among us who could cook, and s0, instead of dropping that Jap over the. rail, we sixnply loeked him into a stateroom snd made ail. \"Naturaily, as Gleason originated the scheme, lie waa elected captain, but, as Iwas the onlynavigaor i the crowd. I waa miade flrst mate, sud the big nigger, Pango Pete, second mate. It looked good for discipline, for even pirates recognize the need of it, and tiie first man that growle\u003cj or iked had todealwithp Pet. H vth.sled a few before we'd got around the F1lrida Cape, but he aigu whaled WabfifUI t*ât. '-\" Mf thât Immh, UcJpfor bad coo-king nd,, ins4olenceý( -hIhwas a ilistake. That iap waIs su educVated inan, aj collegeP gradujjj ate and a niieinber of the Japanevse try that neyer yield, never forgive, and kill themielves whendfetd W. didni't know this; we oflyv kilew tliat lie %vas ai niity* poor coo)k- \"Ateve were. arouInd the, CapIe, Geongave nile the latitude sud longitude of til s'pot, and 1 mnade for it. Il took ie two o)r three days, of rareful nbservations and cînaîu before I announieil that we were witWi in six seconds of the spot, %ich-l is ai]lfthat niavigation wilI do. Theni w'e droppdi i1nehor and began to dragz, We knotted toehor every v ne we bad, and in ti. iiddle we had a lcngOh o! nxooflring ehain that would stick Wo the. bottoin. W. kept two sinail boats, to whichi this was attacli- Pd, a quarter of a mile spart and pull- ed toether, gathering in the. slaek, and when we met, the. schooner, un- der charge of Gleason, came up sud anchored, over the. spot. \"I waa the only mn there who had auy dIving experienoe, 80 1 went down. Say, hanve you ever been under",
         "THE CANADIAN, MAGAZINE watcr in a diving suit, trusting your lif e to the feliows above who pump the air into your helmet? No? Weli, it's a curions experience. 1 had the feeling as 1 went dowu that 1 was nuniber thirteen of that bunci, and that they only ueeded to shut off xny air supply te mal\u003ce their nuniber twelve instead of thirteen. But that didu't happen; they pumped, and 1 breathed and saw the oid galleen, the Santa Margkerita. She lay there, hceled over to starboard, covered with the ooze and the slime of the sea, witb bernacles cverywherc. \"I signailed for slaek and walked arouind lier, takiug note of lier rig. She, hiad three masts, and three tops ver 'y muciili like the flghting tops of our1 ioder» battieships. There were no royal. nasts, but site had two sprit- sail yards, inder the bowsprit and jib boomn, and a huge lateen yard ou the mizzen that took the place of the cr0' jack. But lier poop deck was~a won- der; five tiers of windows one above the ether, aud ou top threc big lan- terns mueli like the ordÎnary street lamp. 0f course, ail cauvas and run- ning gear hadl rotted away, but here and there was a leg of standing rig- ging, preserved byv tic tar. Shewas a big craft iu lier day, ne doubt, but neot so big empared with preent-day slips; at any rate 1 could reach up to lier ehannels, and by titis means cliimibed abeard. \"The dceck and rail wcre a foot thick -with rnud, aud the siail, spar-deck gus could iardly be distinguisited. 1 saw at once that 1 would need help, and signalled te be hauled up. On deek 1 told the news and il hands, even the Jap, weut erazy over it. We get out twe more diving suits, rigged a bulb for eadli, and Paxigo, Peters, and rnysclf wexit down again. \"Now, titis isn't a yarn of the llnd- ing of that treesure. Aniyone eau li- vent sudc yarns, -and I've read dozens of thern. They ail wind up suceess- fuily, withi ecd maxn wealthy anid happy. Thtis is a yarn of th c men who found that treasure, and what happened to them. So, PUi just say that we didn't find a skeieton or a ghost when we got below decks. Ail hands were up, 1 suppose, whepn that ship went down, and the rush of wa- ter as she piunged, washed thiem off. We found seven big chosts in the 'tween decks ferward of the, cabin, and in them ail were coins, and joNwel- lery, and here anid there iu the mess, what nuight have been an opal, or seme kind of jewel. Ail the stuif wa, blaek fromi the action of the sait water; but we knew we had the reai thing, and hooked on tackles. We had tg) corne up to 'help caei time, we hifted a chest, for, aftcr the ch est wis oiut of water, it was too heavy for the crowd above; but at last they wvere ail uip, and stowed snugly on the floor (if the cabin. Then, after finail searech for other loot worthi taking. , cpike p our anehor and cleared Ont, tnt yet having decided wheire wve ve re goinig. \"We wcre piraites undi(er the law, and didn't know buit whaýt al] the rov- enue cutters on then coast were looking for us, for flhc theft of thiat scoonner. But with seven millions of builien and jeweis, inelted down. counted ulp, and translated into cash in sonie bank, we dIîdnt care for tic charge of pir- acy,' . The real trouble was to get that stuiff trnsaedind whlile we ar-gued,( we sailed dule east, out into the broad AtIantie. Peters, the youing enithusi- ast, had been a jewefler, and hie told us that nothing, short of a blast of air in coujunction with the heat of a ftre would meit gold and silver. Weil, where omid we set uip a blast furnace with net a dollar in the party? -TMy sug-gestion-and I was backed by Gleason,. Peters, and old man SuIIij.. van-was that we count eut the oot, separate every salable jewcl, anid make soute big port like New York, Liver- pool, or Rio Janeiro, sell the jewels and get ready mouey withi which to plan for the disposai of the rest; but we lied to deal with men like Pango, Christo, Pedro, and the three Dutch- meni, who didni't know what they wvere uip against. Tliey wanted an immedi.",
         "THEARONUT 'We cou Idn't wakcro him at riglt br11, and ove mew bi% trou bj.a vert oeet,. Mte aut tip and, ii-ion; then, oae(h nîan tu go hi way. The lnmnse of it did flot strike themi; thirteen ie tu div-ide up1 SOVen, heaýlvy elests-eavh one shmudering seven.Hirteonths of a Joad that took the w-hole thirteen to lift wîth a four-fold \\V4le ,W asked the Jap eook w-hat he thought, but he had nua opnin. \"Ils somewhat eurious how, the dif- ferent mnen of that buneh had differ- eut ideas of wvhat they wanted. Young Po,(r wante to go back toi îi,ý u1alive town ami wu, j,~ gir l ht had sour- ed on lmi bvecanseho -lie s poor. Pan- go,. Pedrn, aMoi lhe two sou'wegiana, ani' wanted'( a big \u0026runk. OId Matij fAulivan Kalit-1 a couire ài a nau- tical sollool and a tirst muate's ccx'- ifleate The thr.e Germans wnted tu get ta) New York and set up inii the saloon busineý Ss. Gleason wýanted ta ýtudiy law, and I wantedl tu studyl niedicine and We a doctor. a gentie-",
         "THLE CANADIAN MAGAZINE maxi who covld enter any society li the world. The Jap didn't give ont lis aspirations. \"And se, growlÎng like an unhappy family lu a nienagerie, we sailed east, with the question uusettled. But at last we woxi over the Dagoes and the Dutchnx, aud agreed uapon New York as a port, and the seing of the jewels i some Bowery pawnshop, wbere xio questions are ssked. Thexi we shook banids ail round, gave the Jap blaze for his cookng-f or we had been too worried to attend to that matter before--axd squared. away be- fore the trade wîud for S\u0026xdy Jlook anid a market. \"From jealousy and inutual dis- trust, we ail slept i the cabixi. There were plenty of staterooms for the erowd, though some of us doubled up. None of us wauted to remain away fromi thc seven clests of treasure, and the Japanese eook, who mught have slept li the eook's roomn next thc gai- Iey, stili showcd a preferexice for bis room i the cabin, aud we did not contest it. But now we were million- aires anid essy-dead easy. We stood wstch, stcercd and trimmed sal with no maxi for boss, for now the work was doue, Gleason and myseif axid the nlgger Pango gave up ouar false positions. 'W. were a democracy, and loved and trusted one another, oxily, whcu we rouised out the watelh below aud found that Old Man Sullivan did not come, aud on investigation found him stoxie dead i his berth without a sigui of violence, we forgot our bro- therly love and began te woxider. \"We did not know wbst le (lied of, but we gave himn sea huril that day, axid Gleason read a chapter f rom the Book. 'We concluded that the old maxi had died of hesrt failure, or old age, aud thought no more abolit it aftcr the day lad pssed. But, when we csiled the wateh at elght bells next mornin', we couldn't get one of the Swanson brothers up. H1e was cold aud stiff; and tiiere iras notiiing wroug with hlmn eitiier. That le, le had turned in cheerfuxi aud healthy and died during sleep, leaving no sign. \"The other Swanson raised inerry htIl that day, raving about the deck, mourning for his dead brother. But bis grief was short-lived, for when we tried to waken him next watchlie lwa cold and stiff. We buried Mi wlth the ceremoxiies, anid began to tbink- ail of us. We woxidered whether meni may rake up ili-gotten treasuire fromn a dead past without eoming under in- 1¶uenees of that dead past. We thought of the. conquered and ensiaved na- tives, labouring in the mines for the aggrandizement and exirichinxt of Spain, and giving up their lives in the work, unrecogxiized and forgotten, while their exploiters, the ehildren and relatives of Ferdinand and Isa.. beila, sat back lu luxkury and self-. satisfaction. We wondered as te what was killing our shipmates, glosts or poison, \"Naturally, we suspected. the coek, and Pangor, the Dagoes, and the sur- viving Sou'wegian were for tosuing him overboard; but the rest of us wouldn't have it. There was no0 evi- dence of poison, and as we'd done no kiling so f ar xi our piratical venture, we\u003ed better keep elear of it now, with so much at stake. A court that would acquit us as soldiers of fortune that had merely borrowed a schooner mnigîit bang us as pirates and murder- ers; but we watched the Jap. 'We kept him away from the grub while we ate ît. Re. brouglit it on in twe or more big dishes, and there was no\u003e chance of his poisoning one without the rest.. We weren't afraid of that. \"I exainined Swanson thoroughly before we buried him, aud there 'was not a mark on hlm, or a sign ef any- thing out of the. way, except *wat didxi't seem in any way important, just beiow escli ear, and baSk of the corner of the cheek boue, was a little pink spot; but there was no blood, and~ no sigu of finger-prints on the throat. 'Teters, the. romantie young feUew, got giiosts ou his mind, and as h thought about it, they got on hi",
         "TITE AfflONAUTS ~LJ -Natiirally. wO gu*Pocted the cvok.- nerves. He couldn't uleep, andl walk- ed around, up and down from the cabin to the deck. The others slept in their wateh below, and on that niglit nobody died. But the next niglit Peters was too exhauated to stay awake, and lie went to sieep on the eabin floor a1ongside thie ehlesta. \\We cOulldu't waken lilii at eighit bells, anjd we knew his troubles were over. At daylight 1 examnined his body. Noth- ing wrong, onily the two Ilittie pink spots mider the ears. We bnrieýd in at daylight, withi seant pretenTse (if a",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE burial service. Things were looking serions. \"cAil this time we were plowing along before the trade wind, but it soon panned out and we had light, ahifty airs froni ail directions, with raîn-regular Gulf Stream weather. Tt made us bad-tempered, and Pango and Gasnhad a flght. Tt was a bad fight, and we couldn't stop them; both were powerful meni, and as they b)rusýhed into me in their whirling lunge( alocng the deck, Iocked tight, they knockied me six feet away. 'When 1 got to my feet, Pango had Gleason downi and was choking him. 1l got a handpikeand battered that coon's head] withi it; but he wouldn't let go, anld before others came up to help lie had killed hlm. Hie went for me, but hadl to stop before the handspikes of the, crowd. \"wwith Gleason dead, the coin- niai d devolved upon mue or Pango, an(] this fellow was in a mood to de- mafnd the place. lie could Iick any three of us, but not ail hands; but, while we were growling about it and coinig down, we found other trou- bles to keep us busy. We had piled sEýveral tons' weight on the weak eabin floor t1imbersý of an old schooner, and of a siidden, clown they craslied to the hold below, ieaving a yawning hole in the cabin floor and starting a bnatt or two lu the planking. It was pump, puimp, pumnp, now, for we eouldn't, rig any kind of a purchase to clear tiiose busted chests away fromn the leak. Pango was a good worker, and, under the pressure of extreme fatigue, we forgot our grudges. I didnfot care for the cheap position of command over a buncli of foreigners, aud so we made Pango skipper, while 1 re- mnainied navigator and mate. Pango promnptly quit puiiiping, saying that skippers don't pump. Aund thiat niglit lie quit everytbing. As skipper lie stood no wateh, but at breakfast tueý hie was cold, with the same littie marks under his ears. On his skin, however, they sliowed a brownish black. \"Gleason had been choked to death, and I had examîned the imprinlt of Pango's fingers before we buried him. There was hardly a sign; nothiug at ail to show that the littie pink spots came from the pressure of a strang. ler's grip. Besides, you cannot ehoke a mnan asleep, without wakig hlm, lie would make some kind of a fuiss, and apprise others; but that neyer hap- pened. \"There were but seven o! us now, tliree Germans, two Dagoes, the Jap, and myseif. 1 talked with, that jap., lie was an educated mari, highly trained ln one of our universities; but he couldn't teil me anything, lie said. Tt was ail mysterions and horrible- this quiet taking off of men whule they slept. As for poi1soning, of which. lie knew he was suspected, iV -was absurd. There was no poison on board, to be.. gin with; and why shonld lie, a lands- man, seek to, poison the mnen who could take the ship and treasure to portI Wlat could lie do alone on the ses? This was logical, and as lie was a small, weak and conflding sort of creature, I exonerated bim In my mînd from any suspicion of chokiug the vietinis. \"That niglit the two Dagoes, Pedro and Christo, passed luto the land be- yond. There were the sanie 11W.l marks, but nothiîng cisc. Weiss. Wag- uer, and Myers, the three Germans, got nntty about Vhis time, and talked together in their lingo while tliey pumped; and when tliey were sioe. tb ey talked to, theniselves. 1 confess that I got nutty. Who wonldn't, with this menace hanging over hin'? 1 walked around the deck wheu 1 waS off pump duty, and 1 remnember that 1 planned a great sehool where ami- bitionis youing sailor nien cotild studY miedicine, and e-seape the drudgery of a life \"fore the mast. TIen 1 plan-~ ued free eatiug houses for camps, sud 1 wss going to use somre of i\"v wealth to luivestigate the private lit. of a Sunday school superinteiident, wlio, wlien 1 was a kid., predicted that 1 would couic to a hsd end. YQ1I 5Ce we never eau judge of \u003c\u003eur owIi men",
         "THE ARGONAUTS ti 'onidition at tht' tilli. lt's onlly whcn yo look bakthat youl eau take stock of rse Thteui of thlis mental disturbance uipoin tue wsini- sou îa. 1 (1o11l411't get to sloop; but I kept tracfk of the' ship. unti worried tht' throe Duitchliien and th' ,Jap ino triuinu eud when nessary. \"'*\\dý( go4t lip to tht' latitude of tht' Bvrmuidasý, i tfiik aud I Was egn ing to hîopt. that tht' ourse had loft us; for we hi passedti trough thre nliglts wýithiout ai mlai dyin. Bu on ai Storxnyý xornîing, whon tlle gaf top- sails, wore blown away, and wo four Men for tht' Jap was usl'son deek cre rying to gyet a voupli, of roefs in the miainsai, Wagncir sutdeon- ]y howled out a lot of Dutchl laniguag;te and jumpet i verboard. 1 fliung huaii al line, b1t hie w'ouldil't take, it, andi paseetid astetnl. Tht' poor devil hiat takeni tht' national renîedly for trou- ble1 . Did vou ever notice it in (Ger- mnati, even the' bt't? When thliiga go wrong they kili themue'vee. They are somhiniig like tht'e'ite intis -Tliore were only four O! us now, vountiing tht' Jap, who still spoiled. gond grub,. and it took a long time to M19g that schooner down to doule reefs anti ont' heati-ail. Tht' nater in tht' ho(lti hpd gaixieti andi we pumnpod. wiewe coulti stand it, Ilion knovk- t'd ffr and droppt'd downl on dek for a snot.We were deati IMat andi tolti tht' vook to ean -us if tht' villd frehentior if anythiug happeuied. Ht' didn't eall us, but samt'thing hap.. pvneti 1 wakened in tiit' andi stoi \"P- sleepyý ani e;tupd and colti; for Y 1 t'an't sepon dt'ck, even iu the' tropics, without getting elhilled ; and wVe Wero up to thirty-eix uorth. Tht' Jap W\u0026Iva fooling round the' galley, and tht ecoonrxith the wheel beoketed, lifting Up auid falling off, prac- tically eteering herseiAf bY-thle-winid. 0f 'ourse, 1 thioughlt of the ,atr à, tht' hol(î, andi SOun1ded thtell The wIas four feet Of wet line, andi 1 knew tha\"t thinge w1ere' bad. Thon 1 went to the' two Duitchien, to eni them to tht'Punpeand fouid theni eold, and sýtiff, each wîthi tht' littIr pîik marks ider tht' enare. 1Wll I aturally %vent more or Te orazy. 1 look that Jap by tht' thiroat anti asked inii what had hiappent'd. 11e did flot know, lie salid. Ile liad luft us 0tolup anti roct. eory for lis, antd tryîug to vook si ai gond mlell wheni \\we wakvned. Ile was in ai shak- ing frighit, trembliniz and iiquaveritig. andi 1 taet'd up. W7hat was' the' ulse of angor ani ýuspiriom iii tht' face-d of this terrible throlit of denith while yoiu slopt ? NVe liove the' two boôdies ôor- boatrd, andi matie a stagger et th(, pumlp;: but wt' coull unot lesseno1 tht' water in tht' hiold. ud at last I gave upu oleared :away Ji boat, andi stoeked ilt% with at ani grub, for two, Mocati- while 1 shapeti a course- for tht' Bor- mua.and steered il after ai fash ion, hopitng that I ilight beavh the. ethoon- er and get, out of somnt ourt of mal- vage, a part of that svn iliTio dIowNv in the, hioli -But 1 hait to steer, aîîd hkeep tht' deek, for tht' Jap91 was usles kqpt mt up nIMM wt' cightd oant ind then flopped. donc Ilp' tirevd out, luttcrly exhaustedg by Work,. ald yet uniablo to APeIp. I sang1L Out if) tht' ook, as I la, down on tht' hatoh, to tryv and sf-er towarti that Mlot of blueý on the' hizoni701, und thon 1-aeeed ilto a1 Sem1i- dazod stilte of mind thetl was wot leve nor yvt wake(fulnt'ss; 1 oi hieur. and, throughi xny afpe eyelids, oould se'; yet I %was lnot awaker, for I eold flot guar myseif. 1 saw that Jap ereeping toward mie. 1 miaw tht' furtie, urderous glinit in his beady vyes. I hourd tht' .oft pât of hie fret on tht' wvet deksd I hieard hiesupree hreathing. Biit I could not mnove or speak. Île ouame ani staod over me, then reachied down kindi gsofly Illed h tipe1 of hi-e foreflugeors intlo iny throat, just 14-o tht' pats ami baek of tht' cheek boues SoPtl at cmr, so ota 1 hartlly foit it, tht'n more strongly, and a o~lt f w keeof 1)odY camne over me, socieiting distint frmn tht' w'eakniess thalt 1 hiad feit while sinking",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE down to try and sleep. It seemed a stopping of breath. I could not move, as yet, but could see, out the corners of my eye, and a more hateful, mur- derousriie neyer afflieted men than the face of that Japanese cook. \"Hie kept it up, ateadily increasing the pressure, and soon I realized that I was nlot breathing. Then, 1 do not know why, there came to me the thouglit of that Sunday school super- intendent, and his advice, to pray when in trouble. I forgot my groucli. 1 said to inyseif, 'God help me, God help me,' and 1 wakened. -I found that 1 could move. I shook off the Jap, . and lie staggered back, chuck- ling and eluttering in his language. 1 rose to iny feet, weak and shaky, and h e rau away from me; but 1 found myseif without power to follow. I was more than weak; 1 was just alive, just able te breathe, but I could not speak. Hie shut hîmself into his gai- ley, and, with regard to the condition of the schooner, and my own helpness- ness, I painfully dimbed into the boat 1 had stocked and eleared away the davit fails. Thon I lay down. \"I have a dii rememberance of that sleep in the boat, of waking oc- casionally to drive that cowardly Jap off with au upraised oar; of mny utter inability to speak to hlm, aud the aw- ful difflculty of taklng a long breath. But the final pluxîge of the schooner stands out. 1 was awake, or as uearly awake as 1 could be. The Jap wa8 forward, and the deeks were awash. Cýj, 1 knew that she was going down, and got ont my kunife to eut the falis when the boat floated. I did this success- fully, for, though I could net speak, I could move, and as the schiooner plunged under, and the seýreama o! that heathen rang in my ears, 1 eut the bow tackle, then the steriu tackle, and found mysel! adrift in a turmoil of whirlpools. «I was picked up a few days later by a fruiter, and taken into New York I found my haïr had turned white. I've been working as walter most o! the time since, hoping te en- iat somebody's interest toward salv- ing that schooner; but it's no go. I'm going to Cuba, where I've hbeard o! a pot o! money in the Santiago, hilk Want to go along V\" \"No,\" I answered. «But, tell me, what kiiled those men V \"eThe Jap must have been an expert iu jin jitsu, the wrestling game of that country. I've made a stagger at studying medicine sunce tIen, and learned a littie. The pnuinogastrie nere did the business. It passes from the base of the brain, down past the heart and hungs and ends near the stomadli. It la motor, sensory, and sympathetie, ail ini oue. Gentle pres- sure înhibits breathing, eoutinuied pressure, or stimulus, paralyzes the vocal chords; a continuance o! the stimulus renders yen unconscious, and a strong pressure briugs about stop-. page o! the heart action, and, finally, death.-\" ., ~' 4) ( y",
         "Pr.,m the I)rawitng by Louis Raemaeken- -Before the leaves fall you wîU have pa.\"-Ye Kaiser, Sprrng. lW. TUE MARSHE-S 0F PINSK. AVTUMN, 191b",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "Ztorîis, of tbc lRcbcoat iRibers BY W. MIcD. TAIT ROTESTS from the fur companies of western Canada aud petitions from the misaionaries of l a the West called the at- tention ot the. Goveru. ment of Canada to an outrageous state of aff airs existing at the foot o! the, Rockies. »Whiskey smugglers were ply-ing an illicit trade with the. In- dians, sud something had to b. don. te stop the demoralization ot the. red mon of the. plains. Hoe in May, 1873, a bilwas carried trough thie Commons authorizing the. establish- ment of a force of tiiree hund2red mnounted police. Tiie spice et danger, deviltry sud adventure in the. duties of -the. ew force appealed te the popular mimd. Men of ail ranks tumbled ever eaéii otiier ini tlieir eagerness te enlist. Sons of lords, genorals and fanions novelists enrolled *iioilder te shoul- der wlth casiiiered \"Tommies\" and Indiain scouts; and, curiously enougii, tiie Meuuted Police retain the. sanie heterogeeou lenients to-day as wii.n the. first eulistmeut took plae. lm- ýmediately upon organization tiiey started from Toronto te Fargo by railwàay, sud made a mareh te »uf- f-14m \u002bia h.putnningr of ther f amons On Octobe 1Qtii, in the. very iissrt of the. Blackfoot country, wbere no mau's lite wa s ate, Fort Macleod, tho first Mounted Police fort i the. 'West, was conipleted. Ânotiier force waa sent northward to Edmonton, among the Assiniboines and Wood Crees. The, main body turaed 1\u003e54k across the plains to Fort Pelly, and thence to Duffarin. ln four monthis the. fàrce had travelled 1,960 miles, and iiad e omplisiied, wltiiout lou of lite, that whiei had beeu declared u impossible without the use of an army -takig powession o! the. Great Loue Land. Fort Macleod, on the, Old Man River, wasas smugglers' strongiiold, and here Colonel Macleod, after *hom the. place wss named, niarked off the. square for a fort on an island i the. river. Cottonwood legs were daubed witii mud, whitewaàhed outside sud lined with cotton inside. Tiien the. B~ritish flag was iioigted in opposition te the smugglers' régime. Rere tiien ws a more bandful of men surrounded by a confederaey of Indians noted for their agesv feroeity. Not a day's ride distant ws Fort Whoop-up, muchi stronger thau that of the Mounted Police. witii cau- non, abundance of animunition and4 provisions, and four tiues as muauy outlaws as tiiere we police. bIside the. smnugglers' stoekades waa whlskey enough to win the *iiole Blackfoot",
         "THE CANAPIAN MAGAZINE mortar over at the smuggle: could make. The Blackfoot greatly impressed, and thel marked the beginning of a fri, between the Mounted Police Indians that lias lasted to, the day. The end of open whiskey tri not mean that smruggling hadi ceased. ln those days liquor, onIly forbidden to, the lndia: prohibited to white men thrc tlie entire territories, except cial Government permît for quiantities. The çluty of watcl inceoming freiglit, whether b; train, ox cart or railway feUi police. The Most likely ave illicit trade was, of course, al( international boundary, an iwi line 1,800 miles long, with abý no settiement at its western en deep valleys and rolling hlis countless hiding-places for smit and only the most vigilant pal could check the traffie. In s time, with a good horse und, and frequent relays, this was .ant work for the scout; bù~t winter came, with blinding bi on fenceless prairies and a te turc that drove the mercury ti below zero, there was work to 1 inettle of heroes.",
         "STORIES 0F THE REIJCOAT RIDERS the wind on his face and so gains the points of the Comlpass. Buit o1 ino condition will a scout of Indian blood set out when a stormn is brewing. The choice feil on a younig maxi from a home of luxury in an Estern city. He was a good pathifinder and one of the most trusted scouts. There was not yet miueli snow, so lie set ont on horseback, with snowshioes strap- ped to his knapsack. The storm did not break for somne hours, and it was hoped that lie bad reached the police post. A week passed, but lie did niot return. Another niessenger was sent, and lie found that the first had neyer reached liii destination. 'When spring ramne, by chance a detachrnent set out for the north, and on their Journey the bonies of a saddled horse were found on the tee aide o! a clif. Then it was rernembered that, on the niglit of the seout\u003ea ride, the wind had veer- ed to the southeast, and the rider, travelling by the wind, knew that it shiould bie on his back, and turned nortli. The body was found on the bank of the river, where bis horse had evidently given out. The brave fellow had pressed on tilt the river bank told him that lie was off the trail. Tiien the long frost uleep had elaimed him. Alxnost as unfortunate was another scout sent with a despateli to eue of the snialler outposts. It was towards spring, when the mid-day suni thaws the surfaceof the snow and the niglit fross hadenthe metted eruits to a glare o! ice as dazztingly bright as the blinding lash o! sunlight from nlahr a n igi-hp poliehed steel. The thaw liad erusted iIehroaadAoe m8pa over the trait, and the scout had to keep auharp eye on theway netto The only thing todo was to give lose the path altogetheir. Suddenty his horse the bit. The horse stood the mid..day suni developed extraor- stock still, and by that he knew that dinary hues. Magenta, purpie and he hiad lost the trait attogether, for blaek patelies began to dance on the the bronche weutd have followed any s,~ alternatety with wheels and visible Path. Ile wheeled the herse rocketa o! che elured fire. Then about. Tt atml refused to go on; and the lght went black attogether, then the man inferred that the crust thougli the man knew that it was of! be ha.d beexi so liard that the horse broad day. He had hecome snow- eould not follow baek the way it lad blind corne. That niglit the trooper slept",
         "A private of the. Northwcàt Nvunted I\u003eok. under uaddle blanloets, with the faiLli- fui horse standing entry. For 11ve days the, policemnan wandered blindly over the, prairie, losing ail roeunt of tine, eating snow te, quenrh. hlm thirst, snd sleeping ini the heles that the bronche had pawed through the lce-omist te 'the undergraus. The. troopor was now too weak te mount and koop the. saddle. As a lait hope, the\u003e thought struck hlim that if h. un- saddled hi. herse and turned it loose it migiit id its way back te the. fort snd se notify hlm frienda that lie was lait. He dld this, but the faithful croature refusod te leavo the man ly- ing on the snow, and stood over him iu spite of ail hi. efforts to drive it off. The path6tic meene enacted ho- tween these two, the bliuud and hait- dead inu and the. affectionate horse, well ahle te look atter itself, van bot- ter be imagined than dveribed. On the .ixth day the. mail-carrier found the. pair. The trooper was severely frozen, but rider and horse lived te eA~ mftTW nnnthêi. rlv' grit.v-. from the Territories were confined was at Winnipeg, 2,000 miles by pack trait from the outermnost police postL To have kept a horse thief at the. icone ot his action in a reserve ot several hundred Indians, with only a defence ef twenty or thirty police- mon, would have invited disaster. In oue case, scouts discevered that the. Blackfoots were planning te rescue their brave as h. was being driven across the plains. A detachinent of police rode away eastwamd without the. prisoner. Quietly another detach- ment loft at night and aise rode away te oaitward. Finally a thlrd detach- ment, tus turne with the prisonor, slipped out from Fort Macleod at miduiglit. The first two companies had spread themselves out in a patmol with relays et fresh herses for the entire distance between Fort MNaeieod and Fort Walsh, which was the next fort eastward. euh' stopî,inoe long",
         "The Big Bond rDetachm-t~ ot the Noethweit MutdPl\u003c 1882 the Mounted Police had rie responsible for the lives of copie of the entire West, and for ýrty- scattered over 375,000 -e miles. Tradiug-posts were de- ing into towns, and cattiemein bringig large lierds into the Lry. At this time it became mary t\u003c\u003e iuereaae the force to 500 Permanent headquarters were lished at Regina, and mubstantial Les, instead of the log cabine stockadeïs which existed at other 1885, the il Rebèllion gave police pleuty of work. Twelve were killed and an eqilal niimber ided i thi. irst engagement witb rebels at Dui\u003ck Lake. A few ; sfter the Rebeflion the. force was increased to 1,100 men, the maxi- mum strength to whiech it lia ever attained. One of the greatest achievements of the force was their persuading Sitting Bull and his six thousand Sioux to returu and suri'ender to, the United States authorities, after the massacre of General Custer and hie troops, even when commiasioners frein the United States had f ailed in complisbing this. Mounted Police forts bave been established i the farthemt north, sme isolated, mucha Fort C3hurchill, on Hudson Bay, which is 700 miles from any other trading-post. Otiiers are closer together, as on the tral from White Horse to Dawson, where they are only twenty miles apart. A",
         "THL CANADIAN MAGAZINE p)olice report recently received at Ot- tawa from Hleracheil Island, in the Aretie Ocean, was conveyed 1,000 miles by (log sleigh, 1,000 miles by water, and 3,000 miles by rail. It toolc more than three mnonths te make the journey. As soon as th(, rush began to the Klondike gold fields, a troop of po- lice was sent up) to the Yukon to main- .tain order. The cosmopolitan popu- lation of the iniing towns marvelled at thie adequacy of the force, as new settiers ini Western Canada do yet. Boundary~ patrols are stili main- talned te initercept the horse-thief who drives a ranch baud acroas the lime, to ha trnickiv .nld. On the bouindarv animale e watch- rie fires, e year's ies, muet eign set- nor the bead- LN oi buyui ice frein the te the very trois, frequently have to face the bliz- zards and Aretie \"Ield that somnetimes qweep upon Alberta frem the north. Their reward is in the welcome as- sistance they often are able to render thie lonely homesteader who by acci- dent or sickness has been left ini a prerarious condition. 0f Inidian troubles now there are none. The police always have main- tained a tradition of stern vigilance and swif t retribution towards the lIn- dians, se that besides there being no lynehings and few train robberies in the Canadian West, there have been ne Indcian wars. The arrest of some aboriginal who has been unable te dis- tinguish between meim and t1*%m iii the matter of horseficsh, or thec brlng- iug te justice of some white man who has fov.nd the profits in peddling whiskey among the dwellers of the re.serves to outweigh the rieks, these comprise the chief items in the list of crimes. Not since Sergeant Wilde, who was shot by a renegade in 1897, has there been serions trouble. The Indian, whose name was Charcoal, paid the penalty on the gallows. Listening te the conversation of the mien of the police as one encounters thcm every-where ini the «West, it is distinctly evident that the 'Mounted Pnliea iq -a head- rnt an atoniaton nni,",
         "Cudîosit tî s of fDemovq BY PROFESSOR HERBERT L. STEWARýT IIAT do weý mean by \"eurosiy\"? We may mnean by it soinethiing lu ~which happens seld(om, belongs nly to the ex- Ceptional case, lies outaide the eoin- mon track of comman experience. An interest belongs ta that whieh is rare, just in proportion ta its rarity. The booklaver values a first edition, and lie values it the more if few other people have it. The botainist swells with joy if by aIl sorts of unnatural1 arrangements lie can make an exotie fiower develop in his owni eonsevatory. The curator of a zoological xnuseum boasta to you that the largyest tootit ever grown in a mammal or the larg- est hoaf ever found on a quadruped reposes, neatly ticketed, under bis glass case. Thiere is no lixait ta the enthusiasm whieh one can acquire for getting together such things--old stamps, old coins, oid pietures, aId furniture, oid anything, provided it lu ancient enougli ta be odd. Tt is perap te ane~ impulse to get out ,ZenseÎ inii iehi Thavued the wordl; if was ani evelit eomtparativoly'\\ fre- que1nt. Sa, too, thie formation of snow and ive, thie alternaitiug appeatr- -nce of siimmiier and wînter, and an iindeinite numnber of sueh naturai phenomena. Yet ail those thinga, un- tii their causes were discovered, wvere curiosities iu a sense far deeper than that wvhieh belongs ta thie mnerel ye- ceptional. Thiey wvere curiosities in thlat they stood, outaide the knawn prineiples of explanation. Hlowever far knowvled(ge proeeeds, there remain groups of sueh facta that lie ýstiLI ahead of otur science, and they are often facte; wich beiong ta thie iuost abvious circle of our experiences. An oddity chiallenges aur investigation at once; the commouplace is taken for granted and remaixis unprobed. Tt has heen said that the central puzzle about meinory la just the fact that we are a~ble ta remember at ail. Perhaps you know hal! a dozen lsn-' guages. You May be able, an1 occa- sion, ta think in more than one, 'Wkore at the present moment la your know- ledge of F7rench. o! Latin, of Span- lit? When you say that you kiow tiiese languages, what you mean is that, if required, yoii could turn your thouglits inta one of these linguistic channels. French., Latin, Spanisit modes of expression can b. summon- ed upat will. But how could they be sumnmoned up unlesa they were somnelow theref Are they stored in a kind of mental warehouse ta *hich you can make a visit at ehoiee ilit",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE as yoa go down to open a trunk that hias been laid aside in your cellart \"ýonseiouaness,\" uaid Dr. Bain, \"Ire- sembles the scenery of a theatre act- ually on the stage at any one moment which scenery is a mere selection .froin the. stores in reserve for the many pieces that have been or may b. performed\u003e' And it seems as if, like cther objecta, an experienee of long ago may bc buried under more irecent accumulations, until witiiout ceaeing te exiat it ia no longer acces- sible te its ewner. George Eliot speaks of the jeys of early childhood as hav- ing \"vanished utterly frein our memr- ery\u003e, although doubtiesa that joy la wreught up inte our nature, as the sunlight of long past mornings ia wrought up in the. soft mellowness of the apri\u003ciot». But what shail we mak. of suob a case as tii. famous oee in (Joleridge's Biographia Literaria, wh.re a servant maid repeated in ber delirious fever whole passages of Greek and Hebrew ? Soe thought she was inspfred f re\u003en on high-like those at Gorinth who speke wlth tongu.a-and we may be sure that others tbought her premptcd by the. devil te profane the. sacrcd text. Tii. only explanatien fortiicoming was that ah. had been at service iD the. houae ef a theolegian wiio was accus- tomed te read aloud frein the. Talmud and frein the Greek Newr Testament. le it fair te suppose that tii... pass- ages, witheut being understeod, had Jedged in ber mind, mueh as a gramo- phone receives a record?7 But, if se, iiew did the. hidden reservoir workl Why should it bave been tapped by the onset of afever? Penbap this retentiveness is ju8t one ef those ulti- mate facts about human nature wich may b. izaed to explain etiier facts, but *iiich theaewlves defy explana- tiony, and m~uet ulmply b. accepted. As Aristotie onc~e said, \"If water sticks iD your tiiroat, what will yeu drink te wash it down 11 Intuth tiere is jhst the saine sort as we make an engagement for the. future, and manage te keep it. lu seme sense tii. appeintment must ne- main \"in»\u003e our minds durîng the. in- tervening days wiiile it la net being tiieugit ef. But wiiy siieuld neit every experienee remain witii equal vividnessI What determines the, par- ticular-thinga which we shail remexu- ber, and tiie particular*thinga which we shall forgett An adequate ac- ceunt of the. lems of memory muet b. at the same tme an account of the. laws of obliviseence. On. theery on the. aubject weuld deny altogetiier that the mmnd can «ccontain\" an idea wiiile it la net con- sciously r.flecting upon it. Tii. sehool of Locke bas insisted that there can b. netbipg \"ini\" the mind of whieii the. mid i8 net aware, for an idea ineans juat a f act of consclouaneas, and tins an uncenscious idea would be a contradictien ID terme. Con- cret.ly then, why la it that the. en- gagement wiie I make fer five o'elock on Tuesday recurs te my tiioughta about the, time I have te fulifil itf Becauae-se runs the. tiieery--every event of our past, including the. nak- ing ef an appeintment, leaves a de- finit, trace upon our psychio-neural systein. If yen crease the. leaf of a boek in a particular way and tien straighten it eut again, the. ledf will tend te feld itself iD the, sanie hie next thue yeu open the beek at that place. The ecase doe net remain when the. book la clesed; only the. dis-. position te double up in the. former way at the first eppertunity. Se when I make the. engagement the. tiiougiit of wiiat 1 have te do become8 associated wlth tic thought of five o'clock on Tuesday, and wien thie sec- ond tiienght recurs the. firat tends te. revive. This view seems te bc con- firined by the circumatance that at",
         "CURIOSITIES 0F M1EMfORY impaùÉing of memory in nerveus dis- ease and in advanced old age; hence the impossibility of trusting a mem- ory which Îs over-burdened with a multitude of details. If your leaf is twisted lJi a dozen places the. marks will quickly obliterate one aixother. \"Old paths fade,\" writes William James, \"as fast as the new ones terni in our brain.\" But the. difÊeulty inx this view lies in the. tact that the recai of fixe paut is neyer a mere reinstatement ,of the. old experience as we Wa it. It is flot enough that at five elock on Tuesday the theuglit of goixxg to meet my friend A. B. shonld occur to, me. Join- ed with thÎs there must b. the. ex- plicit recelleetion of my promise. Otherwise there wotxld be nothing to distinguish the. thougiit of A. B. frein the. thought of C. D., or of anyone cia. whom. accident miglit suggest to me at the moment. In the trxe act of memory I muet flot only bring A. B. before xny mind; I must reach back in imagination to, what passed between him and myseif; 1 must con- seiously identity myseif with the per- son who made the. engagement, and who is thus bound te be at a certain spot and ne other at five o'clock. In- deed, the. theory of a \"psycho-neural disposition\", though true and import- ant se far as it goes, fails to account for just that specific elemeut by which memory la constituted. Light would be at upon this, anxd upon very many other oddities et miental lite, by accepting ths.t sensa- tional hypotiiesis of modern psychol- ogy knewn as the. doctrine of «sub- liminal consciousnems\". Briefly put it amounts to tis. The. thoughts and feelinigs, impulses and purposes, of whieh we are conseieusly aware con- stitute only a fragment of our spirit- ual activity. The. mind resembles oe of those coral islands or one cf tiiose enormous icebergs in the oeean, whoee bp alone projects above the. surface, wlmlle lby far the. greater part is con- cesled, reaching to unknow-n depths below. The, judgments that w. form, believing ourseives te be guided by evidence consciously considered, are often the, resuit of reaaoning carri.d on unconscieusIy;- the. emotions by which we are stirred, sud which we think we eau appreciate by lookiug inward, extend iu reality to, depthis of our nature that are unknown even to ourselvea; the projects we cherish and for whiclx we sssignl superficial, reasons are prescribed te us by forces that lie far beneath our powers of introspection. As George Eliot said: \"There la a great deal of unmapped country withiu us, which would have te be taken into account in an ex- planation of our guasts and stormma! This view, into thie discussion of whicix 1 have net space te enter, ha very obviouq bearing upon our pro- blem. It would enable us at once te accept the notion of a storing up ef past impressions in that great mental area which lies \"below» our consejous ,waking lite. And that somethuig of the sort takes place semus te b. sut- ficiently attested by the. tacts of hyp- no isnd nt crystal-gazing. Wlxat change 1 s produced in the brain by staring fixedly into a bright globe ne patixologiat has ever made clear. But there is a trance of some kind, dur- ing whicii pictures appear as lu a dream. They are often made up of skreds aud patches taken fromn scenes which had been actually passed througii by the. clairvoyant, but wiiicii had been long sine. forgotten. Only by an effort, atter the. tranee is pass- cd, can they b. identified and placed. Thns, as has been aptly said, the resi question about memory is net se mueh \"How do we remember?\" as -How de we forgett» If tue past buries itselt in our subeonscious werld, what is that seleetive agency wich enables us te recail somne things, but net otherst Professer Bergson has given se, far the elearest solution, tiieugh he was te some extent arxticipated by Fred- erie Myers. 'W. remember, broadly speaking, and, et course, with num- ereus exceptions and tailures, that",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE sort of experience which it is of prae- ticail importance that we should re- ieniber. Our tbinking is subsidiary teo our ,action, and it is as needf ul that we should forget ninety-nine hun- dredths of the occurrences cf 11f e as that we should retain the remnaluiug oue-hundredth. Otherwise our mninds, like that cf Domninie Samnpeon, would becomne elogged withi rubbish. It le an incident cf thc struggle for l! e that we should exercise such powers cf obliteration, just as one must per- iodically clear one's desk of accumu- lated papers. This dees not, of course, mean that we neyer fait to hold, cither iu memory or iu desk, that w isl of consequence, or te get rid o! that whîeh is usetes But sucli is our aixu, and we are practically effective iu proportion as we achieve it. Mcem- ory la neyer diainterested. Once lu a white we may permit ourselves te tock through the old litter, but te do se la a spocies of¶ luxuxy in general, we use our past as a stepping-stone rather than as food for reverie. As Myers otaf prsrai-W t aware of in order te escape ,Ives the question: What -rmember in order te aet )f which I amn awarel Tho LFa of memery tdllew the is ef Bensation; whlLt by B power of netirîng at the i. the power eofircalling perform- er a for- zet the date words are judgedî and dlisesirded. As WAilliamn James put it. we seein to have a sort of \"wraith of the name\", which sufflees to diseredit the varions claimiants. At last the correct oe sxnehow pops int our minds, and, as has beun neatly remarked, the effeet is as satisfactory as a completed saneeze. Psyehologists are now convinced that we should speak rather of mcm- cries than of mkemory. For example, the psycho-neural system may be re- tentive for sounds but not for sights, for perfumes but not for colours, for names but not for faces. Thus we have at 1cast as mnany memnories as wýe have sc-nses, an auditory, a visual, a gustatory, an olfaetory, a tactual. It is oee sort whichi serves the musi- clan, a~ second the artlst, a third the tea-taster, and so on. Naturally enougli, lie who lias get one but not another is surprised at his neighbour's delloiencies lu recollection, and lucre- dulous about bis saperiorities. The author of this article combines a sin- gnlarly poor memory for faces witb an eccentrie facility in recalliug init- ials. Macaulay, who was able te repeat te hiniseif on a voyage from India the whole of Paradise Lost, had plainly a word-memnory, aithougli whether for the written or for the spcken word we have ne evidence. And it was a dub- loua gift, not suffieiently cmbiued, with satutary powers cf obliteration.",
         "CURIOjSITIES OF MEMORY asked: 'Macaulay, do you know your Popes?' 'No-,' Wfts the answer, II ralways get wrong among the Innocents.' 'But can yûu say your Archbishops of Canter- buryl' 'An-iy fool,' said Macaulay, 'could say his Archbishops of Canterbury back- w\u0026rdq.' And off be went ut scoret, da ing breath oruly once in order to remark on the oddity' of there ha-vin1 been both an Axehi)ihop Sftneroft and an Ârch- bishop Biincr \"ft, unil Sir Davidl stopped him ut Cranrner.- The. late Prof essor Oonington, of Oxford, is said to have complained that hie could scareely forget the copies of Latin verses which were sent in by candidates for college seholarships, and that after' mnany yeara of examiining lie retained scores of Lhem in hie inemory. Anyone who bas exained students' pa'pers will feel wvhat a buirdp.n poor Conington muest have had to hear, and will give thunks for the mervifuil oblivion into which miost of what h. reada at sucb timneç immediately passes. Some y ears ago an enterprising psyehologist issued a circular to a very varied multitude of persons, ask ing eacli to pîcture in his \"mind's eye» the objecta whieh hiad stood on that mnorning's breakfast table, and to write down the list. It was found that in this trial woxnen were most succesaful and scientists were least go. Some of the latter protested that e\u003cmind'e eye» was a mere metaphor, and that no sueli thing as visuial mem- ,ory existed! They kneiw, more or less, what they had had for breakfast, but i no sense wae it possible for them to pieture it. llow signilleant thie i. of the extent to whieh oxie's personal dlefeets of fieulty may lead. one to a talse generalization! Fancy a novel- ist, who ean make a ivbole acene alive wvith eolour,. aeeoniplishing thie not MIaqazine, A certain lithograýphie( artist ini Belfast hias a set of playing cards wvith a series of numbers written at random on the baok of eacb, e.g.: Jark 371,129 8ý315.C,-, 198.357 '27,391 31,872 of ýSpades 70,89)4 9,963 5211,318 Thesu numibers wvere written down 1,y his friends as ail mr test, and were purposely inade as mniseellaneouis andl( confuisrg as possible. Wlien given lhie face value of a card lhe litho- graplier ranl repeat the whole set of figires on the bacpk, and so for ah Ille carde of the fifty41wo. Il(,e explains this through association wvith colour. Bacli digit has for him a particular hue,ý and even a particular weird colour-shape. On studying a card lie eonneeted flic figures wlth the. eeriea of colouir forma, and lies. latter re- main stampcd uipon lis very sensitive volour inemory- . 'Whleni one mentions, for exaniple, «Jack of Spades\", liese formis rise before his niind's eye, and lie translates into figures, s one inight fromn oue language to ano0ther, But lie lias no special memrorY powers iii any other direction, and. so far as; the writer eotuld judge, hlis general inentality appeared low. An initeresting question bas been raised as te the. relative faeility with whieh the impressions of the diffei,- eut senses are revivable. Apart frein the exceptional case, like Beethoven's memiory for sounds, or Turner', mem- ory for coloura, eau we say whetber to lhe average person a eound or a siglit ie more eaaily recalledi Can w. arrange the data of the. five songes in anytbing 11k. au accurate series froin thi, point of view? ?robably a little refleetion will convince inoet of uis that il i% easier to imagine with vivid- neas a landacape that we have seen than à perfurne that we have smelt. if you try te bring before yi\u003eu, for ex- ample, the. old Parliament buildings at Ottawa tiiey seern ho corne up, at, once. If you try tû revive the odour",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE of a rose you must llrst revive the vis- ual appearance, and thon the odour indirectly through this. lI moet cases I think the impression upon the nese will net reinstato itself, no mat- ter how niuch you try to bring it back, with any such clearness as the Par- liament buildings wiil have for \"the oye ef the mind\u003e. Sound scems to ho li a uimilar way more dilatory of re- cal than sights, and perhaps it would ho difficuit te adjudicate between smell and teste, because thoy se commonly secm te reinforco ecd other. Pro- fesser Ribot endoavoured te state a law on the subject which ie at lest interesting, and covors a good many o! the f acta. The. poet's dictum that sight lu \"the meut despetie of the senses\u003e will be, borne eut by common experien ce. When we have once seen a thing, if we remember it at ail we remember its look. Why la this? Prof essor Ribot has offered two reasona. (1) As a ruIe, ita appearance la coxuplex te a degre i whicli none of its other qualities are se. It has parts, shape, internai differonce. The impression upon the oye lu manifeld, and if we cen recall any point li the visual whole this peint wiil tend to reinstate the. remaider. Ronce we have quite a number of corners, so te speak, by which we may, get held of it, quite a xiunber ef chiances any one ef whieh will giv. us aneceas. (2) lI visuel exploration the perceiving oye moyes backwards aend forwards round the. contour o! the. object, and the move. ment renders the. impression both more distict and more lasting. The. blind mani geta te know an ebject by running his fingors over its surface, and the. mani who can seo uses bis ergan e! sight as the blind uses his organ o! touch. bIthe case of the Cethr senmea the experienco le rela- tivev ffl.mnle and statie. Hence the struet on this principle is,, siglit, sound, toueh, taste, emeil. It is often asked whether, and if se by what. means, memory may b. tramned. Can one who je deficient limprove himacif through any sort of discipline?1 The answer seems te he that just as a boxer's prowoss depends partly up- on strength and partly upon skill, se one's power te, recail a past experience depends partly on a native endow- ment, and partly upon knowing how to use this endowment te advantage. Aristotie distinguished these two oie- mente as Mnieme and Anamnesie. The. former varies within very wlde limita. Tt is a sort of congenîtal tenacity, and we should ail of course, wish to ho, in the old phrae, \"liko wax to receive and like inarbie to retain\". How great the individual difforences may b. ia seen at once by coxnparing a man 11k. Mtacau1ay with the average pers\u003c\u003en. But we can no more improve eux'- selves li this respect by «systema»l than we can by taking theught add a cubit te our stature. 'We noed not go to a «memory man\"» and expeet him to put us threugh a regimen which. will alter the quality of eux' braine. What we can do, on the Cther hand, by judicious practice, ie to ho- corne able to make the host of that endowment which we have. We ean improve enormously our habit of close attention, we can learn te conneet thinge not-like the examination \"crammer\"ý-through the seunds of their names, but through thoir ra- tional relations, we can discipline our mnds to act always in an orderly and systematie way. If we do so we shail find that xnemory has improved itself. And for thoe whose native tenacity ie low, it should be somoe con- solation te refleet that pewers of thought and of reasening are by ne moans very cloeely aseociated with suich retentiveness. Dr. Thomas Chal-",
         "poets, the noveliats, the. general Wi iérateurs. For they have often brouglit home to us in vivid arresting phrase some faet of the mental if e which science has to express iii un- couth teclinical, jargon, and they have not seldom ealled attention for the first time to a mental oddity which the professed psychologist had îinauf- ficiently noticed. They have render- ed both services to a marked extent in the field of memory. For example, the. text-books explain how \"the resi- dual traces of past experience, anid the. laws of association among ideas deterinine unconsciously the way in whieh inew experience will b. asaimi- lated\". But it is Wordsworth who lias spoken of, thie eurious props By whiCh tie -world of memnory and thought Exists and is mustained'. And it is Rogers who has told us how, Luiied in the. countiess chambera of the brai n Our thüughts are inked by many a bidden ehain, Again, there is the recollection whiich is a mere sense of general fiimiliarity; we are unable to say of what we are reminded, but the objects before us give a dlffused impression that they are net wholly strange. With what piercing directness lias Tennyson polnted thia ont: Moreover, aomething la or somF; That touches us with mystie gleama Liii. glmpses of forgotten dreams- Of somethiug felt, like bomething here; Of somnething doue, 1 know not where; Sncb as no laiiguage ean deciare. Penhaps it is because the, sense of smell acta, relatively speaking, with gTreater independence than the. other senses, that an odeur la se potent in making us ask ourselves where we per- ceived it last. George Eliot did not fail to observe this when sh. apoke of 'the plant with waudering seed that glves hefar-off landsa kinship te the exile's home'. De Quincey, i the fanions \"Confessions of an Eng- lish Opium-Eater\", has told us how in a drug dream the mninutest incidenta of his childhood would recur, inci- dents that h. conld not recall or ac- knowledge if told of them in waking 11f. 'but whichi he instantaneouuly recognized in sleep. Finally, there ia the curions circurnstance, which Dirkens lias se ofteni presented witb sucli artistic effect, that in moments o! stralned attention the mind will wîinder in spite of itself to the utterly trivial. Ev.ryone reeahis Lady -Mac- beth's wretched pun at a criais when punining might have been supposed far from lier thoughta: l'Il gild the. faces of the groomis withnI Thit if may beem their guilt. Shakespeare was but signalizing, the truth that an effort te con- centrate will aucceed up to ai cer- tain point; beyond that point, and especially w-hen eniotion is tense, the very struggle defeats itself. In the. closing part of \"Oliver Twist», Fagin when on trial for his life looks up at the. gallery., where a young man ia sketchilng him for the newspapers, wonders wliat the, sketch is like, \"look- ed on when the artist broke his pen- cil-point, and made another witli his knife. . . . I the. same way whun lie turned his eyes towards the. judge, his niind began to busy itsf with the, fashion of his dreas, and wiiat it cost, and how h. put it on. There was an old fat gentleman on tii. bencli, too, whLo had gone out soine half an hour befor., and now come back. H. won- dered within himself whetlier this mnan lad been te get lis dinner, what he had had, and where e lad djt\". lIow truc to nature la the. exclama- tion of Manfred, when lis fancy i apite o! itef keepa reviewing the. historieal fortunes of ancient Rome: 'Twaa such a night; 'Tis strange that 1 recail it at this time; But I bave f ouud our thought. tabe w-Ed- est lght, Even at the. moment wha they should ay Themuelves ln pensive order. CURIOSITIES 0F MEMORY",
         "THE UBRAKY TABLE N the March nuiuber of The Canwlian Magazine Dr. J, D. Logan, in an article entitled \"Cana- dian Poetry of the -Great War\", criticized a in entitled \"The. Hun\u003e, by Fred- àk George Scott. It bis been learn- since that Canon Scott had not iiori7ed the. publication of the xi, for, as he has explaixed, it was ttbn as an experiment, to show t it is.asy to wrteafterthe man- of thie so-called Germai' poemns of B. Ulnfortnnatelv. however. hie ýiate editor of kiider and who ., Sergeant Lo- publisliing. It \u003epy» and duly ý,1ander. From iblished in The view of the Irishi question, whichi, by thie way, it does flot presume to settle. One cari infer fromn the book, if not fronithe title, that it is the Irish espe- cially who oppress the Eriglisli. Soin. of the other things nxentioned -as op- pressions, but which the Irish have escaped, arc the Land Valuation Act, Lloyd George's scheme of National Insurance, and the Military Service Act-«to the black sharne and grief of every truc Irishinan\". Besides eseapmng these oppressions, the Irish have beneflted through George Wynd- ham's Land Furchase Act t» the ex- tent of $500,000,000, which ,ainount lias been added to the taxes of thi. Englisb. But notwithstanding all that England lias donc for Ireland, the author observes that the \"Irish character, cirer prone to dreain and brood, preventa Ireland froin forget- tinir lier anci ent wrnnyp Hi.q",
         "TUE LI13RARY TABLE Lord Chancellor, A. Bonar Law (who is acknowledged to be halif Canadian) as Chancellor of the Exebequer, and Arthur James Balf our as F'oreign Secretary. Lt is at leaet an interest- ing book. THE WANDERER. ONq A THOU- SAND HILLS BY ED»Tm WaIERRY. Toronto - S. B. Gundy. E DITH WHERRY has arranged a rahrweird tale to 'Îllustrate Chinese customs. It is weird, fatal- istie, at moments beautiful, at mo- mients terrible, but in ail these attri- butes it only matches Obinese cus- toms. The reader feels that the author bas taken the utmost pains to be ex- actly trutbful in the portrayal of these eustoms and absolutely just and faithful in presexxtiug Chinese char- acter. If the writer bas been pains- takingly trutbful, however, it bas not spoiled ber bigli art in telling the story; on the contrary it adds te the pleasure. \"The Wanderer» is an Eng- Iish boy wbo bas heen stolen by a Chinese girl and brougbt up as ber son. The tragic episodes in the girl's life whieli lead te ber theft are the uleet dramatie aud absorbing in the volume. The book carries the fascina- tion of all good romance. vIILION BOX Toronto: The Copp, art of wr, new or inspiring or even extremnely iuteresting iu bis pictures of Enjgjish types and their opinions about the war, aud the letter formn la rather tire- some. Lt ie bptter for even so excel- lent a writer as Edward Verrail Lueas Vo wait until an inspiration cornes. A SL ERSSKETCHIES UNDER 13Y H\u0026AOLD UÂRVEY. Toronto: Thos. Allen. TH\",- book contains a great many penoil sketches, donc on the spot, hy a well-known London artiat who enlisted at the beginuing of the war. Tbey bave the merit of depieting, as is elaimed, only what the airtist saw and was able te sketch at the moment, aud are not embellishiments of occuir- rences that really neyer eau be illus- trated correetly. The drawings are accompanied by interestiug reading matter. 4: ACROSS FRANC~E IN WAR-TLME By W, Fi ZWATRu Wnu\u0026Y. Toronto: J. M. Dent snd Sons. la ýi a delightful addition to the «Wayfarers' Library\" and an- other instance of the desire of the publishers te admit to this splendid collection books of the moment that bave literary value as well as books of the past. The book describes France in war-time, but is not a book on the war. Lt is sometbing more than that. THE NORTH AMERICÂN IDEA BY J. A. MACDOINALW. Toronto, Me- Clelland, Goodchild aud Stewart. by Dr. Macdonald aV Vanderbilt U7ni- versity, Nashvjille, Tennessee. The. author long bas been an interpreter of the. national sentiments sud ideala of the two chie! peoples of North",
         "THE CANADIAN M.AGAZINE Ameriea, and bis interpretatien, look- ing forward te a common ideal, whicb he sees. illnstrated iu the present great struggle, ia broad and optimistie. The people of Canada and the. people of the United States are, at bettom, as Dr. Macdonald secs them, much the saine, and it certainly is refreshing to read the conclusions of one who bas not been carried away by narrow ideas o! loyalty and patriotisin. DIVER8ITY OF OBEATURES BY RIIDYARI KIPLING. Toronto.. The. Macmillan Company of Canada. MANY persons who like te read Kipling will find this volume of hid latest work somewhat differeut fromn what they have been used te from tbis versatile author. 'With the exception of thre. or four, most o! the stonies have appeared in maga- zines. They range in size fromthie very short story to the. leugth, almost, of a novelette, and they coer a wide range of characters and studies lu humari experlence. Thierspersed througheut the volume there are four- teen poems, most o! which will not; add to Mr. Kipling's reputation. esting manner the works of Ruai Yeats aud Synge. NELSON'S HISTORY 0F T WVAR 'By jomr BucuHÂN. Toronto: Tho\u003e Nelson and Sons. THE interest iu these monthly unes, whieh cover in detail progress of the war, increa8es each successive volume. The ent1i asmn of the author shows no dim tion. Volume sixteen is devote( the great Battie of the Somme. 71 are many maps, and two append which add greatly te the interes the volume. *k EDIJOATION IN'CITIZENSfl Bv JOHNý- D. HuNT. Toronto: Macmillan Company of Canad presei forin nnr2tir is a very valuable I average citizen, becE him in an undersi ie processes o! govei arly in Canada. It Iso for schools and cý i handbook for literar, mp~rq' o\u003clilhq 'hnme seh",
         "THE WONDERFUL MISSION 0F THE INTERNAL'BATH BY C. G. PERCIVAL, M.D. you know that over five hundred iand -Aiericans and \u003cJanadians are at present time seeking freedom froma ,as well as serions, ailments, by the ,ice of Internai Bathing? you know that hosts of enlightened ýcians ail over the eountry, as weil as paths, physical culturists, etc., etc., reeominending and re6ognizing thia ,iee as the most likely way uow kuowui cure and preserve perfect health 1 ere are the best of logieal reasons for )ractlce and thes. opinions, and these ns ivill bc very interesting to, every- the firit place, every physician rmal- ind agrees that 95 per cent. of hum~an s fi eaused directly or indirectly by nulated waste iu the. colon; this is 1 to accumunlate, because we o! to-day er eat the kind of food nor take the. nt of exercise whicii Nature demands der that se may thoroughly elimin- lie waste unaided. at's the reason when you are ill the of the colon, it absorbs the poisons aud carries thcmn through tii. circulation- that's what causes Aunto-Intoxication, witb ail its pernicions enervating and weaken- ing resuits. These pull down our powers o! resistance and render us subject to al- most any serious complaint whicii may b. prevalent at the tirne. And tiie worst fes. ture of it is that there are few o! us wbo know when we are Auto- 1n toxicated. But you never eau be Auto-Intoxicatod if you periodicaily use tiie proper klud o! au Internal Bath-that is sure. Lt la Nature's own relief and corrector -just warm water, which, used lu the right way, eleanses the. colon thoreugbly its entire length and makes and keeps it sweet, dlean and pure, as Nature demanda it shall b. for the entire system te work properly. The followlng enlighteuing iiews article lu quoted frein The. New York Timnes- \u003cWhat may lead to a remarkable ad- vance lu d'e operative treatinent o! certain forms of tuberculosis is said to have been aehleved at Gtxy'. Hlospital. Briefly, the operation of d'e removal e! d'e lewer in- testine bas been applied te cases o! tuber- culouis, and the results are uaid to b. ln every way uatisfaetory. cTii. principle of d'e treatmnt la d'e removal of the. cause efthde dises. Re- cent researdies o! Metchnikoff sud qd'eis have led doctorg te suppose that many con- ditions et chronlo lU..health, su\u003cch as nerv- eus debllity, niiumstlam, sud other dl. orders, are due to polsoning set upby un- beslthy conditions in the large itsie aud it lias even been sge tb.stht thu",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINEý lowering of the vitality resulting froxu sucli poisoning la favorable to the develop- nment ot cancer aud tuberculosis. \"'At the Ouy's Hlospital Sir 'William Arbuthnot Lane decided on the herole plan of renxoving the diseased organ. A child whio appeared in the final stage of what was believed to be an incurable torm of tiubereular joint disease, was operatcd on. The lower intestine, with the exception of nine inches, was removed, sud the portion left was joiued to the smaller intestine. \"The resuit was astonishing. Iu a week's time the internai orgaris resumned ail tlieir normal functions, aud lu a f ew weeks the patient was apparently in perfeet health.\" You undouhtedly know, from your own personal experienee, how dxxii snd unfit.to work or think properly, biliousuess and many Cther appareutly simple troubles make you feel. And yon prohably know, too, that these irregularities, ail directly traceable to aceumnulated waste, make you reaily sick if permitted to continue. Yen aise probsbly know that the old4fasli- Ioned method of drugging for these coin- plaints, is at best only partially effective; the doses must be increased if contiuued, and finally they cease te be effective at ail. It lu true that more druge are probably used for this than ail other huxuan ils cenxbined, which simply goes te prove how umlversal the trouble caused by accumu- lated waste really le-but there is not a deubt that drugs are being dropped as In- ternal Bathing iu heeoming better knowu- :Fer it la not possible te conceive ntil yen have had the experience yourself, wliat a wonderful bracer au Internai Bath really ie; taloen at niglit, you awake in ti ing with a feeling of liglituess ai ancy that cannot be describe,- absolutely clean, everything je wo perfect accord, your appetite is your brain is clearer, and you f ee vira and confidence for the day's ,There is nothing* new about Baths except tlie way of adil themn. Some years ago Dr. Chas. reil, of New York, was s0 mir2 beuefited by faithfully using the then in vogue, that lie mnade Intern lis special study, and improved ii in administering the Bath aud ià the resuit desired. This perfected Bath lie called tI L?' Cascade, aud it is the one w se quickly popularized and recex itself that hundreds of thousandi day using it. Dr. Tyrreli, in 'his practice searches discovcred many unique teresting facts in connection with jeet; these lie lias collectedl iu a lit \"The What, the \"Why, the Way of Bathiug,\" whicli will be sent fre quest if you address Chas. A. Ty D., Room 534, 163 College Street, and mention having read this inu dian Magazine. This book tells us tacts that knew about ourselves before, aud no doubt that everyone wlio lias ar iu his or her owu physical weil-1 that of the t axily, will be very instructed and enlightened by reai caret ufly prepared aud seientific reet littie book.",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER19 Children love it 30(MloUldn,slr$ I I'FOR AIL OCCASIONS Where refreshments are needied, there you will find Ingersoll Creami Cheesu *first favorite. pkcn ic (4,e1fl)Atrrnoon Tr. Itïs nutrîtious, tasty, convenient and economical, At .11 Grvcers, in roc and isc p ikages. m m ý 1 Maectreu by mi UNGERSOLL PACKtNG CO., LTD. JW rkmensLundses INGESOLL, ONT. lvhtin Tips",
         "10 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The KELSEY Ail Over Cani -is iased in the. flnest city and country homes; the. homes of prominent an wealthy folk; the. homes of we11 known people; tii. homes of architects; thi homnes of heating and ventilating engineers and ex~perts; the. homes( nilversity professors and writers on scientific heating; the. homes of physiciar and health officers ; the. homes of those who can afford the. BEST and thoE best calculated to KNOW about heating apparatus. With those wiio ba\u003e money, braina and sientific knowledge the. evidence is overwhelming in favc of the, Kelsey Warm Air Genera Look itîto the Kel.ey before you buy a Heater. Let us show yenu just wý Kelsey Fresb Air Heatiiig is preferred to any other system by people w\u003eý WRITK FOR ICELSEY LITF.RATURE CANADA FOUNDJ3JES AND FOftGINGS, JAMES SMART MFG. CO. BRANCH",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER I In Every Home a ration of Csrape-Nuts food, daily, adds to health aud Lappiness\u0026 Grape.Nts digests efflilyfor weak stonahs.Stjlitis a 44mran-size\" food. full of sturdy nourishmnen for hrain and brawn. 1tsdê t. iSem, Cr hDe usi» 1cneiafr",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Robinson' s \"Patent\" Groal .Should Be Used For Baby when eigbt or nine mnonths old. Ma the forin of a thin gruel combined wvith three parts and one part water it is a perfect foodi. If the child had been reared on Robison's \"~Patet\" BarI.y uintil it bas reached the above age, Groats and should be given alternately with \" Patent -Barley - tends to promote bane and muscle. For the. Invalid and the. Ag.d, ini cases of influ a bowl of hot gruel taken in bed at night pro-du - profuse perspiration helping t9 drive the cold c the system. Taken: b\u003e' the aged at nigbt it pror warrnth and sleep. Our free booklet \" Advice to Mothers\" tells aill; how to feed, clothe and care for infants and chil W MAGOR, SON \u0026 CO., Limi Sole Agents for Canada 191 St. Paul St. W., 30, ChE\u003c Mn.tr...l Toront CLARK'S SIPAGIIETT WITII TOMATO SAUCE AND CHEFS A highly nutritious anid partic ulatly appetizing dish. Be sure whicn ordering spagheti",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 23 Frood C^,osts Compared' by Calories The Unit of Food Value Nutrition, you know,' is always mneas- ured by calories. Folks need on the average about 3000 calories per day. Every woman, in these high-cost Baco andEggs days, should judge foods on this basis. Cost five times as mnUCh fOr Oats excel ail other grains in calories the sanie amount of nourishment. per pound. They sometimies seli by i the bushel for one-fifth the price of In Quaker Oats-which is qucen grains flaked-each cent buys 180 calories. The average mixed diet costs four times as much. Man\u003e' a food costs ten times as much. Every serving, on the average, Brea andMîlkdivides your food costs b\u003e' four. Brt ted asmu forI a Yet this is Nature's supreme food, satiagfy%,ng mecal. and in an extra-flavory formn. Quaker Qts The Oat-Rlake Luxury 30c and 12e p2r package in Canada and United Statee, except in Far West ,where high freights mnay prohibit. An Aluminumn Cooker for $1.00 Made. t', our oriter, extra large andl beavy, t c Quaker Oati, in the. idal wayv Sn u u ts Muark-, -the. picture of thi. Quýaker-eut front th, f 0f ive Quaker Oatu palces, \"r an ffid.',t sh.wi.g tii. purchase 0f fie pac.kages of Quaker a, Sciai $1.0 -O vith iith e, rk or affda, it, and this9ide.1 co9,ker ll b, ,,nt tor ym b parce1p,t prep.il. We ' quire Ilue tradeinarks or aliavi1 ,t ass3urance that you are a user o Qu i Oat,. The. tradcmrn\"ks have ni , eeption value. Ilus offr pplies to Ca.ada and U.ited Sta e W. pply o-1, one -,oker t,, a faniy. Addr..u The, Quaker Oats Co., Pr.mlu.i Departm.mt Peteborough, Cana.da 7 Sasat\u003con Canada",
         "k GCANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER I w ne Office SÇPeialty\" 800 Lint of Upright Fding Cabinets *Filing System Depenctble ? the important need are \"Office Specialty» Filin~ -ant-speedily ? Systemas. There's a particuk S.-A.~ system to meet your requiremei",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER a EVEREAIW '0W much safer to use light when you shou Darkness is so deceiving that even the sure-finge somnetimnes blunder. re is no reason why you should trust to your sens :~h in the dark-even in the emergency that mnay great haste. an Eveready DAYLO provides instant liglit wl ly and sureIy prevents rnishap or mistakçe. mn the comrfort andi convenience of a light that The better electr mid stationery st md AVOS an 'UNGSTENbatt Ild! ~red Vhfla niistake wold mleanl a tra8i.dy Whnyou m1ust get eoof uIC meicine boule ca] -quick 1 when you're alone in the night andi a atrange noige hich ,,arma )OU wen. a coin or a ring is rOu ndter the table wh.n you tahe the short-cut home after dark cal, WeneVer you need da light for yourprotec- erie tioa or conveaience, that is poweri, aafe and dependable, you nvued an Eveready DAYLO, the highest 20",
         "26 CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The treat that its loyers learn to expeet from a cup of \"SEAL BRAND\"ý COFFRE, is'always realized to the fuli for \"'Seat Brand\"' holds its aroma and flavour to the last spoonful in the air-tight can. In 1', and 2 pound tins. Whole-ground-pulverîzed-alsa fine ground for Percolators. Neyer sold in bulk. CHASE \u0026 SANBORN, MONTREAL The Body-Building Power, ol BOVRIL In feeding experiments on human .beings carnie out by a well-known independent Britisi Physiologisi, when Bovril was added to th\u003c normal diet it produced an in crease in flesh, bone and musc], B:td- Bllldlg equal to 10O to 20 times thi lp-.. _#amount of Bovril taken.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 27 The One Lone Package On the. Pantry SeLiI Shows a Wrong Idea of Puffed Wheat Somne reopie treat Puffed Grains as tidbits, to bc served on rare occasions, These bubble grains, flavar\u003e' and flaky, seeoe like food confections. As somne foiks say, \"The\u003e' seemn too good ta eat.*\" That il a wrong conception. Puffed Wheat and Rice, above ail else, are scientific foods. They are whole grais, rich in minerais and vitamines. They suppi\u003e' whlat flour fooda lack. And the\u003e' are fltted, like not\u003e ther grain foadq, for easy' , eompiete digestion. Every food ceil is expiodied, so digestion cari instanti\u003e' act. And the wbhoie grain feeds \" Th'leir easy digestion makes thein perfect bewe-elfoods, oir good.nlight foads, or luncheon foada. Everybody reveis in them,. Kcep piri\u003e on hsand, ai d both kinids, so chiidren cani have ail they want of tirent. At odd hours or at meai time, they are the beat foods ane cari eai. Puffed Puffed Wheat Rice Roth 15c Except ini Far Westj Serve in the morning with sugar and melted butier, like peantts, or popcorn,. cream, or mixed vvitb any' fruit. For for an after-schooî delight. They a~re lineheon or supper, float in bowis of tniik. Use as wafers in soup, as nut- as wveicome as confections, alid far iikecgarnish for ice creamn. DanseNvith better fo.- the Lhild. The Quaker CafsQCmpany Peterborough, Canada Sole Makers Saskatoon, Canuada,",
         "8 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINEI ADVERTISER B1ABY'S SO A P For Nursery Use you cannot take chanices on Soap. Four generations of Canadians have enjoyed the creamy, fragrant skin healing lather of Baby's Own Soap-the Stan~dard in Canada for nursery use, on accouat of its knowa. purity. Baby's Own is Best for Baby-Best or You. ALBERT SOAPS, LIMITED, Mfrs., il 1/ MONTREL 0OW N",
         "GANADLAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER THFîE e BROWN BRGSe LIMITED MANUFACTURERS OF ACCORNT BOOKS ALL KINDS CARRIED IN STOCK AND THE FOLLOWING SPICIÂL PUBLICATIONS INTEREST TABLES:~ COOK'S. MURRAY'S. MATI E, HIUGHES, BUVRAN, etc. LETT'S INTEIEST TINE TABLES WATSON'S LOAN AND VALUATION TABLES IMFOITE1t'S ADVANCE TABLES B$OOK\u003cS Don't Tâke a Trip Wit h a Corn à D ON'T handi-U cap yoursolf in a business way or socially wlth a paifut corn. There'u noG ncedj to keep your uiid oi your corn. BIue.jay-tbe eay way-brlag. instant relief from pain. Aad your corne are gene ia 48 bout,. Tih.t le, the. average corn, tome very stubbota cases require a secoad ert \u003cird treatmmait. Mlions upen raillions of corau bave been t.naoved thie BIue-jay waY. Mllions of famUiie, krep a supply ea hand, and \u003cbey never have corns. Yen. too, can be freed 80W and toteer. Pari.g cornu brings oaly tenu. petary relie(. And batmb liquide are dangetous. Blue.jay is the s*dentlifc way. BAUIER \u0026 BLAcC, Llmited Toronto, Canada Uaint, of Sutkai Dt.ms\u0026ago, *te 23c. Package t drugiste Ms.o Blu-ja manie. PI\u0026S DIue Stops Pala- 'a-d3",
         "80 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER SPECIAL PALE DRY GI1NGE ALE othoMIOee Fearnan'sStarBra",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER si There is Nothiag Else Like SanI-Flush Nothing else that makes toilet bowls spotless and sanitary. Nothing else that gets down to the hidden trap. Just sprinkle a littie into the bowl every few days. It wilI make stairis disappear and put an end to dip- ping of water and scrubbing. Use for toilet bowls only. $ani-Fogh le needed wherever there is a toilet. it cannot hann the bowl or connections. Aesk Vour Dae Alniost every dealer has Sani-Flush If you do flot find it readily, write Harold F. Ritchie \u0026 Co. Limlted YO 10-12-14 McCaul St ,Toronto, Ontario CntJa Representing The Hlygienic Producta Co.,* Canton, Ohio INWL1D8 ~ The Perfect Prescrption For Breakdawns, Auaqmjc Weakness, Bad Digestion with Los of Appetite, and for the. - peiod of w.akn.us and lassitude - during C@nva1«ece. Ab@irouel no Akooil is .dde. BIG BOTYLE Aux1 VOUA DOCTOP AL BUGIT",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER A RKange You Can Trus The~ \"Pandora\" doesn't require constant -watch- iug. You can trust Ît to do its work while you rest or attend to other duties. The Pandora has features that insure far, greater effldiency and economy than van be found in other ranges. Write for free bookiet. mVaxryi PANIDORA RANGE LONDON TORONTO Z4ONTREAL WINNIPEG VANCOUVER ST. JOHN, N.B. HAMILTON CALGARY SASKATOON EDMONTON",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE AI)VERTISER",
         "84 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ........... ..... Lathes Planers Drili Presses Steamn Hamnmers Punches Shears WE BUILD- Machine Tool Equipment for Locomotive and Car Shops Structural and Bridge Shops General Machine Shops and j.\" DEFtTF\u003eIAM MACHINE TooLs Are Backed by Sixty Years of Experience and Service. The John Bertram \u0026 Sons Co., Limited Dundas - VANCOU VER - Ontario MONTREAL _ _ _ _ _ _ 1CI*ýri TORONTO WINNIPEG",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 8 ww c -dû Fr»ictioned Surface Beiting Ai tixat can b. found in aixy other boit wiII b. found i Dunlop Gibraltar; tlaat is, special quality of duck, spca uality of frction, and, in addition, IIThmt Its widespread adoption by various industries is bas.d on the. use of the fiest quality of selected duck, having the proper teusile Mtreigtii iu the, uigbt direction. This, in comnbination witli a suprios utyIof rubber triction ii.tween the. plies, insurc\u0026 absolute uniiformiityofsrie Years of careful stnd7 of the higb..power belt situation have enabled us te produce the. Original Reud Face Rubbg,' Bot of Canada. In produig it, our object bas been to have, the friction coat of ruuiior betwoen the. plie scaswdl retawn its life indefiuitely, aud tobhavea qulity of rubiier with long -fngers,-' aud flot a quality of ruer the. elasictity of wici has been aacrlflced to obtaiu the. so.caIIed high-pullng test. Dunlop Tire \u0026 Rubber Goods L'iie HEAD) OFFICE AND\u003e FACTORIES: TORONTO BRANCHES: Victoria, Vancouver, Edmonton, Calzarv. Sqaakqtginn",
         "se CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEX ML LAUGHLIN, THE GRAN\u003cD PRIME 0F TH1E OTTAWA-PRESCOTr KIGHWAY RELIABILITY TOUR GOES TO DR. R. E. VMJIN AN IIO 111 LAUGHULN D.SIX.45 Sixty-4ve mnotorists drivmng cars of ail, makes started on june 28th in the. Reliability Tour from Ottawa ta Alexiadra Ba,. via Prtiscott and Oouvenor, N. Thei MeLaughlin D-Six-45, driven by Dr. R. E. Valià,emeried with aperfect \u0026cote of 1000 points trom thegrulling tests to which all wore subjected. So k.eu was the conipetition for highest honors tlwt Referee Edenburn bad to devise speciai tests in which tii. Mr-Lauglin proved its superiority. McL.aughlin supreunacy in points of Power, Easy Conitroi. Efficiency and thqïhaaain been esta\"ised The. results of the tour rellt credit on Dr. Vulin as weIl as on Canada'.i Standard Car. The. Reliability Tour was not a road race nor a speed test. No professional chaulleurs Cook part. Owners drove their own cars and the tests brought out the bLt both in car and driver. Canad.'ans who want the. joys of trotoring, without the annoyance of mechanicBl trouble, willheedih tesloson broughit out by this tour and make their new car a McLaughlin. WRITE l'oR cA-rAWOOUE SHOWINO MODfLS AND PRICES Tk. McLêIAUGHLIN MOTOR CAR CO., Llmited OSHIAWA, ONTARIO DR. R. E. VAUIN IN HIS MCLAUCNLlN D-IX-45, WINNEIt OF THE OTTAWA-PItKSCOT? MIGSWAY RELIA1SUJTY TOUR",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER S eThe\u003eI\u003cRAIL B3LAZER Ifo qroak'r Motor CarValue From the standpoint of dollarlfor dollar value there's flot a car made which offerç more for your money than the famous Chevrolet Four-Ninety A. Before the Chevrolet was made in Canada, good cars were ail high in price. But our mammoth production and manufacturing efficiency enables us to seil the Chevrolet Four-Ninety A at a price much lower thanx its value wvhen com- pared with other makes of cars. With the surplus power developed by the famous valve-in-head motor the. owner of a Four-Ninety A invariably is the \" trail blazer.\" Standard equipment ineIudes~ speedorneter, clectric -starting and lighting, amnmeter, oil in-~ licator, light equipment, one rpan top, dernouft able rimi. non-skid tires on rear whel. atnd mai.\u003e features usually looked for ini cars much higher in price. Clievrolet Four-Ninety A $ 75O f.. b. OSHAWA ~- Tlir. are Chswrolet Mela in Rendter, Toumwh and Seda Bodie s.. Set t en ysu' nearet dealer. CHEVROLET MOTOR CO)., of CANADA, Limited OSHAWA, ONTARIO Western a ~n wd Service Dramcee: Regina. mad Caigary C",
         "GANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CANADIANS! LISTEN, AND INVESTIGATE. Do flot purchase foreign mnade goods if you can purchase goods of equal orË botter quality that arc Made-in-Canada. 0Cr tainly do flot purchase foreign made gooda without invcstigatirig what is made in the same line in Canada. We make telephoncs for cvcry service, the city, the rural system, the factory, the home or the office. Give us an opportunity of showing you what we manufacture. In factory systems our Canadian Automatic has advantagcs over any other systeru on the market.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER se .Ceadian Wot' ok Twom'Ilion Cop - Fiftt*n Ili r; Ltdf rotl ELV E NTHI Y EAR r, s,. Ask Wheret~Ogo Burea. 8 Bescon Street, Boston, W., for r.1i.bll. trà,.l ýfo-,nato and vc LIVE THE SIMPLE UIFE AT HOME If yotx want tc, get the muet out of 111.. you muet five in mvoordame with In hi*. litti. book. -THE SIMPLE LIFE IN A NLTSHELL-\"Dr Kllogg manr 100% efficiency. Tii. book is free. Send for your copy ,ui,. FILE CREEK SANITARIUM, Box 109c, BATTLE CREK, MICI ______L.___hae_1.00,0_ roudv mowIldy w._ 1 . -soo.o U n T 0 v JSEE THE ierii Rockies the 'PA4CIFIC COAST erfio aRna» Jm mpk HOTEL DE SOTO Mlliion Dottar Home fllates Notably mocierate Ne",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Big Game Hu nting Moo'se - Deer The. silent spots in the. *Higli- lands of Ontario' are the. haunts of Moose, Deer, Bear and other big game. HUNT WHILE YOU MAY OPEN SEASONS- Deer - Nov, list t. Nov. lSth.. Moose-Nov. Ist te Nov. lSth. In some of the Nortiiern dis- tricts of Ontario including Timagami, the. open season lias becn extendpd and is f rom NOV. 18110o NOV. 30[h. In tliat part of the. Province of Ontario ling nortii of the Cana4lan Government R.ailway f rom thie Quebec to thie Manitoba boundary, theo openi season for Moose is from ocrobr ioh (o NoveMber 301h. Write to any agent of thie Grand Trunk for lllustrated Uiterature,.f[ul particulars of garne laws, etc., or to J. QUINLAN, Bonaventure, Montreal, or C. E. IIORNING, Union Station, Toronto.",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER \"JULIAN SAILE\" Trhe namie behind the goods is your guarantee for the quality 'RITE-lITE' WARDeROBEu TRUNKSz Every appoÎntment in its construction- every convenience in the makîng- every point in the manufacture of the 'Rite-Hite' Ward- robe Trunk is one more good reason why it should bet the trunk of your choice in contemn- plating a longer or shorter trip, summer or winter......... In a very real way it is the most complete of wardrobes, and apparel travels in it with as littie risk of crushing as it wouid right on the \"hangers\" or in the \"Chest of Drawers\" in the home. (Have it demnonstrated i the, store, or write for special bookiet.\u003e $33c.ý to $9OSý The Jûlian Sale Leather Goods Co., Ltd. 105 King Street Wet, Toronto a",
         "42 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER THE FINEST [IUNTING GROUJNDS IN AMERICA Are Conveniently Reached VIA GANADIAN PACIFIC RAILWAY MOOSE - BEAR - CARIBOU - RED DEER and SMALL GAME ARE",
         "CANAIANMAGAINEADVERTISER *1 ght nowv, wheii defence is the issue -X. e hour, is the time for every mian to e2 the question of complete defence of orne. It's a man's duty to defend bis Ioved from the aggression of prowling burgiars. 1 ver Job nen 11 Wýt«-c - Walnut GripRevoiv\" withb- 1-h b\", \u0026\"ýn h.- i. . gun, it h\" per. ýbalnaýn -.d à a jýd abçt Amidentl difth.M. haPonible. $10.00 . il MAGAZINE CANADIAN",
         "m4 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The Most delicious of table syrups for Griddle Cakes and H-ot Biscuits. Excellent for home made candy. In 2,5, 10 and 20 pound tins- 3 lb. \"'terfect Ses!' Glass Jars. Write for free Cook Book. TMEil CANAUAà STARCH Co. LIMITED, \u0026MONTREAL. 30 .L WEBSTER thi Street by Fifth Avetnu WEST 45th STREET W YO0R K ,*ue o on ofl 010117 qui.teut gtw.*as) One of New iYork's mostbeau- tiful biteIs. Much ifavored by women itravching without ii ecot. Withi The Original and only G enuine Bewa'e ImUttica on the 1 fjHïF",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 4 A sâJe and palatable laxative for chi/dren iVis. XVinslow's Soothing Syrup Abs.Iuriey Non-narcoik Does net contain opîum, morphîne, nor any of their derivatives. By checking wind colic and cofrecting au- .siial troubles common with children duuing the period of teething, helpa t. produce natural andI heahihy sleep. Soihu lA theretbg hahy and) th.re\u0026y give relie Io the tired mSher. Eye. that feel \u0026Yirand id 0ptictl Store ýcm0 f rý ý. n Lit orns out -with finders A few. drop-s of Freezone applied directiy upon a ten- der, aching cornl stops the soreness at once and socn the entîre corni or callus loosens and cari be 1 1fted olf with the fingers witlot even a twinge of pain. I ~ Fireezonme Re.moves hard cornas, soft corna, alao cornu between the tOo and hardeneil 1calmants. Doeu voit irritate or inflatue the surroa ndSng skin or tinsti.~ Yon feel no pain u'hen appiylag it or aS ter- ward. Womn , 1 Kp aL saal botti. of Froeone \u003con jour dri,sser and m.wor jet a corn ache twice. ,;»vW boltcil con be had M .ay dug oSvwe in Canod. THE EDWARD WLSLEY Ç0,, Walke,,rlle. Outi.",
         "46 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB Are-ý Y OU Missing\" Something. that 'Millions ÉqEnjoy Why do you suppose the majority of the men on this continent who can afford the money for shaving satisfaction, are using the Gillette Safety Razor? Why is the Gillette a treasured item of equipment in the kit of practically every oficer and of tens of thousands of men in the Canadian Overseas Forces? 0 Only one reason could possibly holci good with so many levelkheaded men. Its this-the Gillette gives a shave, day in and day out, that no other razor in the would has ever eualled-and does it handily in five minutes or less. Ihat is why over amillion more men",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 4 of The Facuilty of ace in Toronto University mining every make or Player Piano, paid us a .ooepment t\u003ey purchasing al JAN PL\u0026YER PIANO Saturas wbicb 'eme. Perfect Cotnpre3sion, ,n only b. foun Pkyer Piano ha, The Cecilian buted througb- ';e the Cecilian le, Easy Qper- abUity, Beauty tI eciluanAU S ARE CONVERTIBLE .n Upright into a Player Pipno yb. installed quickly. The built with sufficient space and S.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER WHAT 15 HOME WITHOUT A BOOKCASE? just think what an ideai piece of furniture this 18 for your home, and what pleasure and comnfort the whole famly will derive fromn it. Your books are your best friends and deserve to be t ken care of. THE DOORS CAN NEVER BIND When you buy Nl acey\"' sectional cases you are absolutely sure that you wil) nover b. botbered withbidn dors as we use a Patented contrivanze that makes such a thing impossible. ~..lL fl1,1L @.~c ~ fl... nMev StvIe Book\" will L-ive vou a liberal",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 49-",
         "MAGAZINE ADVERTISER",
         "Light Four Five Passnger Touning Sedan The Full Round of Seasons in Luxurious Com fort F the~j winter? A closed They drop into conceaed siots dlosed car %%it I ali i he pir(ter- For the sumner ? An open car . -ost assuredly. The Overianti Ught Four Tour- ing Sedan is both an open and closed car. Andi it is a smart appearing car either closeti or open-in no sense a makeshift, either way. The side windows can easily lie lowered. This leaves the aides of' the car above the body practically Open from end to end when- ever that is your humnor. And it's so limte trouble that youll shut the car up tigbt for even a light shower and bave Ît ail open again in a jiffy as soon as it's over. Then there's the solîd comfort ail winter long of a perfectly en- onV mois 'Ine andi the richness of' cioe Car- tp- holstery alnd intlerior finiish. Mdounted on the eoo îa Overland Light Four clasis, thiS la an ideal eeypro car. Andi you*ll bv delIigliteti 1withl its Iuxuriousness, K-njoy\" the fuLIl round of the seas.'Ons ini lixu;riious coinfort. See the WVilll;4-rlanti dealer about this Car today. \"'ys-%.'veriana, Lîmited WiIlys-Knight andi Overlanti Motor Cars andi Liglit Comnmercial Wagons Head Office and Works, West Toronto, Ont.",
         "Sleepleasneas is, often due ta, tea or coffee drinking. In .uch ca8s a change to POSTUN brings sound refreshing aleep. 'Thr's a Reason*\" O.ky' SIVESIM'SO»P 1 Fo Vhle\u0026ia Pie. 9 S VIE %\"pa,- 1'OLISH ma Cmli.,, A REMINDER In redeeming your Fail obligations-do not forget that there is an urgent ob- ligation no man cari afford to ignore - a debt he owves to himnself and to his family-the obligation to protect. bis energies and interest by ineans of LIFE' INSURANCE. The Great-West Life Assurance Coi- pany, ini its wide range of Policies, provides for every need and circutu- stance. The. farmer, the. merchant, the professional mani, and the wage- earner-may ail find PoIicies peculiarly adapted to their needs. Premiuin rates are low, and the profit returns to Policyholders are reniarkably high. Full informa~tioni of the, Company*s rnany at. tractive Plans~ wfli be gIadly given on requcat. Great West-Lif e Asurance C. Dur'r. \"P' Head Office WINNIPEG PERFUME \" etc."
      ],
